,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Scientist - Intermediate,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, Intermediate level, St. Louis, MO

**No C2C or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee**

Required Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, or another highly quantitative discipline; or Masters degree plus two years of post-graduate experience.
Demonstrated ability to apply advanced statistical methodology and data science solutions to real-world problems
Strong proficiency in Python
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability, with demonstrated ability to build, test, and iterate on a variety of model forms
Demonstrated ability to work in cross-functional environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Applied experience with agricultural science and/or agricultural datasets
At least 1 year of work experience applying statistics and data science to real-world problems
Machine learning experience
Experience in SQL, PySpark, or SparklyR/Spark
Ability to translate complex technical concepts to collaborations, decision makers, and non-technical audiences
Strong drive to learn new topics and skills and to develop innovative products for our customers
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
1,Data Scientist - Retail (Contract),-1,"Data Scientist - Retail (Contract)

San Francisco, CA

1 Year Contract

This is an exciting opportunity for a passionate Data Scientist with a background in retail or ecommerce to use their skills in SQL and R to optimize a new demand forecasting software for a massive retailer. They will have the chance to demonstrate their experience using big data and understanding of predictive modeling, with the potential for permanent hire.

THE COMPANY

This is a Fortune 500 retail company with over 1,500 locations worldwide. They are soon going live with a software product which will further enhance the consumer experience through automated demand forecasting.

THE ROLE

The Data Scientist consultant will be responsible for:

Optimizing the effectiveness of the forecasting software using R and SQL
Identifying and correcting any flaws in the system
Testing the product using their knowledge of predictive modeling and time series analysis

YOUR SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE

The successful Data Scientist consultant will have the following skills and experience:

Demonstrated experience using SQL and R in a retail or ecommerce space
Comfortability working with big data and statistical models
Proficient understanding of time series and predictive modeling

Please register your interest by sending your resume to Asia Firebaugh using the Apply link on this page.

Key words: data science, data scientist, data analyst, product analyst, optimization, retail, ecommerce, demand, testing, SQL, R, time series, forecasting, predictive, modeling, machine learning, software",4.1,"Harnham
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
2,Sr. Data Scientist - Model Governance,$101k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Summary:

The position plays a critical role in the oversight of predictive analytics and robust modeling at Elevate. The Sr. Data Scientist, Model Governance provides effective challenge, review, oversight, guidance, and ongoing monitoring for all models used within our Account Origination (Fraud, Risk and Response) and Account Management functions.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Review models and provide effective challenge and feedback to the developers to action change.
Manage a model review/validation program aligned to OCC 2011-12 / SR 11-7 guidelines.
Perform model stability monitoring to ensure ongoing performance for business applications.
Deliver model variable stability and performance reviews on determined cadence.
Write clear and detailed model documentation coordinating efforts with the model developers.
Work with other members of the Governance team to ensure all documentation is saved in the official repository and meets internal Credit Policy standards for all new and existing models.
Utilize advanced statistical software to validate linear/non-linear, parametric/non-parametric based predictive modeling/data mining analytic methodologies.
Creation of associated decks for presentation to executive management.
Present findings and make recommendations to Model and Risk Governance teams.
Act as liaison between partner banks / third party validators and Elevate.
Complete all other projects as assigned.
Experience and Education:
Minimum M.S./M.A. in a highly quantitative field (Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other quantitatively-oriented degree) or experience in a process related Senior Analyst role in an analytical capacity.
Strong quantitative /statistical modeling capabilities, including with 5+ years of experience in credit scoring and model development preferred.
3+ years’ experience in Risk Management or Model Governance functions including knowledge of OCC / FDIC regulations for model documentation.
3+ years’ experience within the consumer lending environment.
Strong SAS, R, and SQL skills preferred, with ability to conduct extensive data research required. Candidates with experience with other software such as Python, SPSS, MATLAB may also be considered.
Demonstrated experience working with large complex data sources.
Strong PowerPoint presentation skills a plus.
Required Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work in fast-paced environment with ever-changing demands.
Ability to manage multiple projects at one time, possibly including overseeing others projects.
Strong communication skills. Must be able to clearly communicate in speech and writing with Risk Management peers, Marketing, Operations, Collections, Finance, C-level Executives, CEO, and BOD.",3.7,"Elevate Credit
3.7","Addison, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
3,Data Analytics Engineer-Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytics Engineer-Clinical Services
Summa Health System
Full-time, w/benefits

Summa Health System is recognized as one of the region’s top employers by a number of third party organizations, including NorthCoast 99. Exceptional candidates gravitate to Summa because of its culture, passion for delivering excellent service to our patients and families commitment to our philosophy of servant leadership, collegial working relationships at every level of the organization and competitive pay and benefits.
Summary:
Works with a team of technologists (Data Engineers and Visualization Engineers) to deliver insights across various aspects of Summa Health’s operational, financial, and clinical activities with the goal of leveraging data to drive and realize the full potential of the organization’s programs.

Minimum Qualifications:
Formal Education Required:
-Bachelor’s degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, or related discipline
Experience & Training Required:
-Five (5) years of experience in a previous analytics role in healthcare domain involving healthcare data analysis to optimize business operations
-Knowledgeable about the workings of integrated healthcare systems, health plan, research, and community programs
-Experience in analyzing healthcare data using statistical methods to optimize business operations and communicating their findings using data visualization and detailed reports

Other Skills, Competencies and Qualifications:
-Analytical mindset with good problem-solving skills
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Acumen for analytics needs of an integrated health system how to use data to achieve those needs.
-Ability to effectively interact with populations of patients/customers with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Ability to summarize results and develop effective business presentations.
-Ability to interact with populations both technical and non-technical, with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Strong, critical thinker with ability to extend knowledge of information systems and applications to business processes and to cross team collaboration. Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to lay audiences and non-IT staff.
-Basic knowledge of data warehousing, data marts
-Experience with one or more Summa application platforms is desirable including Soarian Financials, DSS, HQ/HI, Epic/CarePATH and tools (RWB, Clarity, Caboodle, Radar, SlicerDicer, Registries), CostFlex, e-ClinicalWorks, GE Centricity, Lawson, Pentaho, SAS, Tableau.

1. Work with senior leaders within a line of business and across the enterprise to establish a measurement plan focused on outcomes
2. Work as a data strategist to identify and integrate datasets, data components, and attributes from various information systems to leverage information for business programs and objectives
3. Communicate, advise senior leaders about utilizing all relevant data, including clinical, operational, exposome, social determinate, economic and financial, to drive programmatic growth and achieve strategic outcomes
4. Gather baseline data information to understand current state and improvement opportunity
5. Identify data requirements based on analytical processes to measure the outcomes
6. Conduct descriptive/statistical analysis of the data set to validate hypothesis
7. Define the business requirements / specifications and user interface (Wireframes and Mockups)
8. Work with other members of CoE to develop mission control dashboards that measures the timely performance to outcome
9. Validate, deploy mission control dashboards
10. Educate Mission end users and advocate adoption of analytical tools
11. Support rolling out new insights, which are a result of discovery and exploratory exercises conducted, by citizen data analysts / scientists.
12. Ensuring that mission control insights remain relevant to achieving the desired outcome
13. Confirming that stakeholders are utilizing mission control in pursuit of that outcome
14. Surfacing new insights to drive continuous improvement
15. Communicate findings to stakeholders; implement improvement efforts as needed.

Level of Physical Demands:
Light: Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to ten pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force continuously.
#LI-AV1",3.7,"Summa Health System
3.7","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1926,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
4,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$54k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking for a fresh challenge and an opportunity to further advance your career and grow with a fast growing company? If you have a passion for data and an adaptive out-of-the-box thinker with sharp analytical and problem-solving skills, exceptional organization, and able to multitask in a fast-paced environment, we have the perfect job for you!

We are looking for an enthusiastic Senior Business Intelligence Analyst who will be part of the USCCAs Marketing team to bring data to life by providing insights and actions through measurement of current marketing initiatives as well as those in the future.

The Analyst is responsible for accurate operational data reporting for specified marketing teams. This includes traffic drivers, lead generation and revenue data for high level and detailed scorecards in addition to ad hoc reports based on specific marketing requests.

They will also perform exploratory analysis to provide recommendations to marketing based on proven data.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Supports Marketing area that includes Strategy, Retail and Product Marketing along with Media (earned, owned and paid) to collect, consume and act on analytics
Marketing traffic drivers, lead generation and revenue data gathering
Filling out scorecards and tracking documents by designated times
Creating ad hoc or one-off reports to satisfy marketing questions
Discovering leading indicators and insights to improve marketing efficiency or performance.
Use data and statistics to support Marketing and formulate strategy
Visualize data for consumption and specific business action
Work with Marketing and BI team, to decide on the success metrics to measure
Organize cross-functional processes
Facilitate Innovation & Growth
Perpetuate a mentality of growth, innovation and ideation by way of staying informed of latest industry trends and methods
Be recognized as the thought leaders of self-defense education, training and trusted legal protection
Process Development & Execution
Participate in establishing and tracking KPIs to ensure all marketing initiatives are performing and growing as planned or better
Build long-term relationships with cross-functional teams, business partners across the organization and outside agencies
Willingness to enthusiastically accept many varied projects and new responsibilities as assigned
Qualifications/ Strengths:
Bachelors degree in Computer Sciences, Statistics, or related field
Work experience in Analytics, Scientific Research or related field
Experience with Marketing and Web Analytics a plus
Meticulous data gathering and reporting abilities
Have a cross-functional understanding of data (Marketing, Web Analytics, IT, & Finance)
Experience with data visualization or reporting tools
High level and granular understanding of marketing objectives
Ability to communicate with Marketing management and leadership
Strong analytical mindset and problem solving abilities
Ability to structure information
Affinity with Stratistics
Basic knowledge about IT ecosystem and programming
Strong organization skills
Ability to think creatively with a process-based mindset
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively to meet deadlines
Demonstrates the Core Values of Delta Defense, LLC
PM19

Powered by JazzHR",4.9,"Delta Defense LLC
4.9","West Bend, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
5,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
6,Research Data Scientist,$72k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"IAI is looking for a talented research scientist to contribute to research and development efforts in machine learning, graph theory, and scientific software development. The candidate will incorporate novel ideas and improve the state of the art on advanced projects related to processing of large networks, analyzing data in high dimensions and implementing high performance computing software. Additionally, the candidate will develop a portfolio of related research by extending existing work and proposing new methods with novel application domains.

You are highly encouraged to apply if you enjoy working with data and algorithms, passionate about understanding how things work, want to solve complex problems and strive to stay current on the technology and literature in areas of high performance computing, network analysis and machine learning.

JOB DUTIES

Design and develop scalable machine learning and network analytic algorithms
Evaluate performance of a variety of machine learning and network analytic algorithms
Debug and solve problems in complex environments
Explore use of novel methods for compression, dimensionality reduction and summarization
Communicate findings effectively in the form of briefings and technical reports
Formulate research ideas/hypotheses to solve new problems

DESIRED SKILLS

Algorithm development experience in Python, C/C++ and/or Java
Development of machine learning and/or graph-based algorithms (e.g., scikit-learn, networkx, mlpack, weka)
Familiar with high performance and big data computing technology (e.g., MPI, OpenMP, OpenACC, CUDA, opencl, mapreduce, hadoop, spark, BSP)
Exposure to graph traversal languages and graph databases (e.g., Apache Tinkerpop, neo4j, JanusGraph)
Familiar with word embedding methods (e.g., word2vec, GloVe, doc2vec)
Comfortable working on linux systems

EDUCATION

A Masters degree or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or related field is required.

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID:",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
7,Senior Research Scientist – Security and Privacy,$77k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"If you want to be not just on the cutting edge of technology but creating the cutting edge of technology, Riverside Research is the place for you. We are searching for an individual to join our Trusted and Resilient Systems research group to help shape a more secure future. This position provides maximum flexibility in pushing forward new ideas, new technology, and ground-breaking research. The team has ongoing research in security of machine learning, cryptography, hardware and hypervisor security solutions, as well as developing cutting edge solutions to the security of open architecture systems. The ideal person for this position is interested in broad areas of technology and can leverage their interests to develop and study creative solutions to some of the most difficult challenges. The current team resides in Riverside Research’s Beavercreek, OH, but we are willing to consider candidates that would prefer to work out of one of our Washington DC (Centerville or Crystal City) offices, our New York City office, or our Boston office.

Job Responsibilities:
•Conduct independent research in the area of security and privacy
•Publish and present research in conferences and journals
•Mentor junior researchers and interns
•Work with the team to identify future areas of research investment and develop research plans
•Author technical proposals

Qualifications:
•Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
•PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or similar or Master's degree Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering with five plus years experience in research.
•Proficiency with software development and revision control (Git)
•Ability to work independently and with a team
•Superior written and verbal communications skills

Desired Qualifications:

•Demonstrated publication record
•Experience with DARPA, IARPA, and government funded research

IND1
CA
Riverside Research strives to be one of America’s premier providers of independent, trusted technical and scientific expertise. As we continue to add experienced, technically astute staff, we are looking for highly motivated, talented team members that can help our DoD and Intelligence Community (IC) customers continue delivery of world class programs. As a not-for-profit, technology-oriented Defense Company, we believe service to customers and support of our staff is our mission. Our goal is to serve as a destination company by providing an industry-leading, positive, and rewarding employee experience for all who join us. We aspire to be a valued partner to our customers and to earn their trust through our unwavering commitment to achieve timely, innovative, cost-effective and mission-focused solutions.

All positions at Riverside Research are subject to background investigations. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history and identity check.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.",3.4,"Riverside Research
3.4","Beavercreek, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1967,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
8,Staff Data Scientist,$134k-$219k (Glassdoor Est.),"Integral Ad Science (IAS) is a global technology and data company that builds verification, optimization, and analytics solutions for the advertising industry and we're looking for a Staff Data Scientist to join our Data Science team. If you are excited by technology that has the power to handle hundreds of thousands of transactions per second; collect tens of billions of events each day; and evaluate thousands of data-points in real-time all while responding in just a few milliseconds, then IAS is the place for you!

As a Data Scientist at IAS, you will be part of a team that is a center of innovation for the company and a major contributor to the company's core products. The Staff Data Scientist will work on challenging technical problems in brand safety, developing and pushing out ML/DL models at scale that classify brand unsafe material across the web.The types of challenges we solve have attracted people from industry and academia with diverse backgrounds, including machine learning, physics, biology, neuroscience, computer science, finance, and economics. We're passionate about maintaining an open and collaborative environment, where team members bring their own unique style of thinking and tools to the table.

What you'll get to do:
Scope work and projects in the realm of machine learning, focusing on deep learning applications in image/video classification.
Work with a variety of data sources to build production-ready ML models
Apply machine learning to novel problems in online advertising.
Collaborate with engineers to integrate solutions within larger engineering workflows
Effectively communicate results from ML/DL models and statistical learnings to a variety of stakeholders within R&D and product organizations
What you'll need:
Advanced degree (MSc, PhD preferred) in a relevant technical field (machine learning, computer science, computer vision, etc)
Solid research background and experience in computer vision, machine learning, and image/video analysis algorithms.
2-5 years industry experience, with technical leadership, and experience guiding ML projects from start to finish
Experience with at least one scripting language such as Python and with deep learning frameworks (tensorflow, keras, caffe, etc)
Familiarity with relational databases and SQL
Experience with source control workflows and deploying ML models in production
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Experience distilling product requirements into problem definitions, dealing with ambiguity and competing objectives
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner
What puts you over the top:
Practical experience with image/video classification, object detection, speech recognition, machine translation, and similar problems.
Publication record in deep learning / neural networks or adjacent fields
Experience working with distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Spark, Hive, etc.) and cloud platforms (AWS, GCP)
About Integral Ad Science

Integral Ad Science (IAS) is the global market leader in digital ad verification, offering technologies that drive high-quality advertising media. IAS equips advertisers and publishers with both the insight and technology to protect their advertising investments from fraud and unsafe environments as well as to capture consumer attention, and drive business outcomes. Founded in 2009, IAS is headquartered in New York with global operations in 18 offices across 13 countries. IAS is part of the Vista Equity Partners portfolio of software companies. For more on how IAS is powering great impressions for top publishers and advertisers around the world, visit integralads.com.

Equal Opportunity Employer:

IAS is an equal opportunity employer, committed to our diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age. We strongly encourage women, people of color, members of the LGBTQIA community, people with disabilities and veterans to apply.

California Applicant Pre-Collection Notice:

We collect personal information (PI) from you in connection with your application for employment or engagement with IAS, including the following categories of PI: identifiers, personal records, commercial information, professional or employment or engagement information, non-public education records, and inferences drawn from your PI. We collect your PI for our purposes, including performing services and operations related to your potential employment or engagement. For additional details or if you have questions, contact us at compliance@integralads.com.

To learn more about us, please visit http://integralads.com/ and https://muse.cm/2t8eGlN

Attention agency/3rd party recruiters: IAS does not accept any unsolicited resumes or candidate profiles. If you are interested in becoming an IAS recruiting partner, please send an email introducing your company to recruitingagencies@integralads.com. We will get back to you if there's interest in a partnership.",3.5,"Integral Ad Science
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
9,Data Scientist,$80k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

MMIT is growing from the leading drug coverage data business into a comprehensive, integrated market access company serving pharmaceutical manufacturers, health insurers, PBMs and healthcare IT companies. Their suite of applications is designed to manage an ever-changing proprietary set of pharmacy and medical benefit information and to provide a structured view of complex market access information. By embedding their data and SaaS applications across healthcare, they help ensure transparency, consistency and informed prescription decisions across the MMIT Network. They partner with hundreds of payers and pharma manufacturers ensuring that their products continually capture and analyze coverage and restriction criteria for more than 98% covered lives.

Team Overview

The MMIT Product Management Team is charged with developing, growing and maintaining the MMIT product portfolio that smooth access to lifechanging therapies. This entails managing products through all phases of the product lifecycle, from concept to sunset. The product management team embraces a market-backed perspective, champions unmet client needs, and is committed to a highly accountable and collaborative Product Management approach.

Job Description

MMIT is seeking experienced Data Scientists to meaningful contributes to the growth and development of the MMIT product portfolio. Ideal candidates are comfortable working with large, complex data sets to help inform, simplify and actualize key product capabilities. They will have comfort collaborating with various stakeholders and navigating ambiguity with limited direction. They will dedicate themselves to understanding the MMIT product portfolio (both current capabilities and future product roadmaps) and key data dependencies to inform data models, architecture, and new product development.

To succeed in this role, you will apply your skillset to

· Inform, create and/or maintain master data hierarchy, attributes and structure.

· Bridge claims data and coverage data – Refine existing rules and create and continually improve new methods for accurately assigning pharmacy and medical claims volumes to MMIT controller entities

· Apply data science to the creation of short and long form geographic market and controller entity descriptive narratives (NLP / NLG)

· Translate product management strategy into actionable data science deliverables, guiding development of data models, business rules and other advanced analytical capabilities

· Excel at communicating across a broad set of cross-functional stakeholders.

· Work collaboratively with MMIT product and data teams to develop and/or commercialize analytics use cases that may include market access, coverage / lives, and RWE data

· Effectively partner with external organizations including clients and vendors to develop meaning and projectable analytics about trends in market access dynamics across payers, geographies, indications, drugs, etc.

· Identify and evaluate additional data sources that could be integrated in value enhancing ways.

· Build reports, dashboards and/or other analyses as needed and/or as specific initiatives arise.

· Support various commercial or commercialization efforts as needed.

· Take a leading role in developing data science as a discipline across product management, development and data operations.

Qualifications

Relevant Skills and Experiences

· Postgraduate degree or higher involving machine learning, statistics, or computer science

· Experience of statistical / machine learning projects in academia or commercial sector end to end with proven delivery capability including capturing requirements, designing analysis plans, interfacing with clients and report / manuscript writing

· Experience in applying Natural Language Processing and related AI capabilities.

· Experience working with large and complex healthcare datasets, preferably patient-level longitudinal data and experience with studies of treatment effectiveness/outcomes, disease progression, adherence, healthcare utilization, patient journey, sales targeting, prescription/procedure volumes/shares, provider networks and prescribing/treatment patterns, etc

· Strong related programming skills including experience with good coding practices and a thorough understanding of the data science package landscape. Familiarity with Tableau and PowerBI a plus.

· Familiarity with agile software development practices

· Excellent written and spoken communication skills, including ability to present technical concepts to lay audiences, write analysis plans for projects, contribute to proposals / grant applications, pitch ideas effectively and persuasively to clients / internal stakeholders, etc.

· Demonstrated ability to work both collaboratively to solve complex problems and individually to research/advance areas of interest and exploration

· Proven ability to develop meaningful/valuable analytic insights from multiple data sources and support value through commercialization

Preferred candidates may also have

· Experience supporting or launching Data and Analytics or SaaS-based enterprise product

· Experience in managed markets and pharma market access ecosystem

· Experience in the commercial health insurance industry

· Knowledge of payer marketing, drug development lifecycle and drug launch process

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Position will be based in Livingston NJ or Yardley PA

(highly qualified remote applicants will be considered)

Travel Requirements:

Approximately <10>",3.8,"MMIT
3.8","Yardley, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
10,Technical Service Field Scientist – Biofuels North America,$58k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Pioneer a brighter future
At Novozymes, we work in close partnership with our customers and the global community to make a sustainable impact. We use science to advance industries, and as part of Agriculture & Bioenergy, you will work across the agricultural value chain to provide biological solutions that help feed and fuel a growing world.

Technical Service Field Scientist – Biofuels North America
The US ethanol industry is an exciting and dynamic place to work and we are looking for motivated individuals to implement our market-leading products and services.

We are looking for an experienced and personable candidate to join our Biofuels Technical Service team. In this role, you will work with our customers at ethanol plants across the US to learn their processes, understand their challenges, and deliver products and services from Novozymes’ wide portfolio. This will require strong collaboration both with the ethanol producers and the Novozymes Biofuels team.

To be successful in this role, you should be a strong logical thinker with the ability to solve complex technical problems and communicate in an understandable and convincing manner. In addition, you should have a business understanding of how the science will impact economic factors for Novozymes and our customers. In this dynamic and evolving industry, you will need to be able to adapt to exciting and ever-changing information and technology.

Location
The position will ideally be based out of a home office in Kansas City, MO or the surrounding states including Missouri, Illinois, Iowa, and Nebraska.

In this position you need to have:
A minimum of 4 years of relevant experience in the Ethanol industry or Agricultural industry.
A minimum of a BS degree in a scientific field such as Engineering, Chemistry, Biology, Microbiology, Biochemistry.
A solid science background, including engineering, data analysis and fermentation.
Both process experience in the ethanol or corn milling industry and experience working in a technical service or technical sales role (would be ideal).
Ability to travel approximately 50%.

Note: The job level can potentially be adjusted to accommodate applicants with significantly more experience

Are you the next Zymer in our team? Consider a career with Novozymes and let’s realize your potential together.

Novozymes is the world leader in biological solutions. Together with customers, partners and the global community, we improve industrial performance while preserving the planet’s resources and helping build better lives. As the world’s largest provider of enzyme and microbial technologies, our bioinnovation enables higher agricultural yields, low-temperature washing, energy-efficient production, renewable fuel and many other benefits that we rely on today and in the future. We call it Rethink Tomorrow. www.novozymes.com

Novozymes is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All employment decisions are based on business needs without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, age, disability or veteran status.

Application deadline: October 30, 2020",3.8,"Novozymes
3.8","Ames, IA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
11,Data Scientist,$91k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"OUR AGENCY

Making a Difference

SWIB is a trusted and skilled global investment organization managing the assets of the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS) and other separately managed funds. With about $129 billion in total assets under management, SWIB has been recognized by the investment industry for its teamwork and innovation that helps make it a premier asset manager. Sophisticated investment management strategies, forward-looking technologies, and strong internal asset management make SWIB a leading investment organization.

For public employees in Wisconsin, SWIB is a unique and valuable partner. Investing for the financial security of more than 635,000 individuals and for the 1,500 Wisconsin employers who contribute on behalf of their employees SWIBs strong management of the WRS has helped fuel one of only a few fully funded public pension funds in the country. SWIBs long-term investment returns meet the challenges of a constantly evolving investment landscape while helping grow and protect the assets of the WRS, the 8th largest public pension fund in the U.S. and 25th largest public or private pension fund in the world.

We are a mission driven organization and the participants we serve are our mission. By bringing a disciplined, prudent and innovative approach to market opportunities, SWIB has been successful in generating respectable returns and maintaining the trust of the beneficiaries and stakeholders of the funds we oversee.

Join HIGHER PERFORMERS

Home to Top Talent

SWIB has long been recognized as an investment leader because of its success in maintaining the WRS and for the highly-qualified staff overseeing the retirement trust funds. SWIBs internal team invests a majority of its assets under management. This means SWIB is committed to investing in professionals that will keep the organization at the forefront of the investment industry. As an innovative organization, SWIB offers professional development opportunities that enable staff to grow and develop. Approximately 61 percent of SWIBs investment professionals are Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) charterholders.

About the Team

Partner with, build, maintain, enhance and manage the data and technology for the Asset and Risk Allocation (ARA) division which is responsible for the overall investment structure of the Core and Variable Trust Funds. ARA recommends and implements the asset allocation for the policy portfolio, recommends and implements the active risk budget, and is responsible for overall risk monitoring and management. The Analytics, Data Science, & Development department primarily partners with the Asset & Risk Allocation team as well as work with other internal divisions. There will be opportunities to apply skills in both technology and finance.

This role offers a unique opportunity to learn and contribute to the technology and the business through technology.

Essential activities:
Creating reporting, decisioning systems or outputs, performing rapid analysis on data issues, and instrumenting the system with data quality rules to proactively catch and prevent issues, creating enriched and enhanced datasets with advanced data manipulation and modeling skills, use of primarily Oracle, SQL Server, Snowflake, Python, delivering risk, return, cost metrics and partner with various internal departments to improve the overall state of technology and operations, architecting, developing, testing, documenting and supporting software and technical solutions for the SWIB ARA team as well as other teams, assess and revisit inventory business logic, calculations and reporting, leveraging SQL, Python and communication skills in various avenues, instrument data quality rules and metrics in the system.

Technical Skills:
Oracle SQL, SQL Server
Snowflake (or some equivalent datastore tool)
Python experience
JIRA and Confluence
Alteryx (or some equivalent ETL tool such as Informatica)
PowerBI (or some equivalent BI tool such as Tableau)
Data Skills:
SQL development
ETL (Extract Transform load) exposure
Python experience
Financial Knowledge recommended but candidates in other industries highly recommended to apply:
Understanding of multi-asset products is desirable
Comprehensions of risk, return and cost metrics in industry is desirable
Exposure to the investment management lifecycle is desirable
The ideal candidate:
5-10 years experience in data analytics, data science, or related fields
Bachelor's degree or advanced degree in finance, quantitative finance, or another related field
Ability to take various questions gathered from the business leveraging existing data as well as improving upon that data to deliver complete, consistent and precise answers
Experience in working with/understanding the various lifecycles of data management, extraction, loading, transformation to its applications in analysis, research and solving problems
Extensive knowledge in composing Oracle SQL, SQL Server queries, data modeling, and having a SQL and analytics background
Experience in identifying use cases for the business, contributing to analysis and understanding of existing data models with iterative recommendations on improvement resulting in some improvement in risk, return or cost for the organization
Extensive knowledge of data extraction, transformation and loading
Experience refactoring SQL queries, use of Python
Experience working with large structured and financial data sets
Ability to follow rigor in creating/updating documentation, maintain process (i.e. JIRA tickets) and following technology and business best practices
Ability to present and communicate well and connect business and technology
Ability to tactically understand results in context (i.e. when does something look wrong), and strategically how to resolve those issues via data quality and rule-based instrumentation
Interest in newer data technologies, Snowflake programming, i.e. Python
Interest or experience in investment management, quantitative finance and technology
Background in Agile methodologies and their applications
SWIB Offers:
Competitive McLagan-base salary
Meaningful performance-based incentive compensation
A comprehensive benefit package
Educational and training opportunities
Tuition reimbursement
Challenging work in a professional environment
The position requires U.S. work authorization and residency in, or willingness to relocate to the Madison, Wisconsin area. SWIB is prepared to offer relocation assistance as needed.",3.0,"State of Wisconsin Investment Board
3.0","Madison, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1951,Government,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
12,Associate Data Scientist,$81k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",4.0,"Cerner
4.0","North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
13,Innovation Applied Data Scientist,$60k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities:

Noblis is positioned to provide subject matter expertise (SME) on emerging threats, data analysis, and algorithm development to decision makers in the CWMD office and DHS components using information obtained from distributed sensor network capabilities, open source reporting, and other sources.

If you are interested in this exciting opportunity to help develop and advance DHS’s new approach to countering WMD, we are actively seeking to identify personnel to join our team of talented professionals who possess the experience, vision, commitment and integrity to successfully support the strategic goals of DHS CWMD by assisting with the fulfillment of the office’ policy and strategy requirements as DHS’s CWMD focal point as an Innovation Applied Scientist for CWMD. Responsibilities include:

Responsibilities:

Develops and incorporates novel algorithms and methods for complex, large-scale data analysis in coordination with operational/analytic end-users within and outside of DHS CWMD.
Provides applied science technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Researches new technical approaches for application across the CWMD mission portfolio.
Client Engagement: · Support and lead evolving business development efforts by applying technical and functional expertise to develop business solutions. · Lead proposal sections for small or limited competition proposals and actively participate in teaming strategy discussions Qualifications:

Qualification:

Has 7-10 years of experience and a (B.A./B.S) or 3-10 years and a (M.A./M.S) in natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, or related fields.
Qualifying experience must be in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Experienced with Providing technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Experience developing, or evaluating the development of, systems, algorithms, and approaches for complex large-scale data analysis across a range of different types of data.
Secret Clearance is required.

Desired:

Preferred Specialized Experience: Considerable professional experience in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, statistics, computer science, modeling and simulation, software engineering, and signal processing.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, computer science, statistical and probabilistic modeling, and advanced analytic software such as Matlab and SAS
Overview:

Noblis and our wholly owned subsidiary, Noblis ESI, are solving difficult problems that help our government and our country. We bring the best of scientific thought, management, and engineering expertise with a reputation for independence and objectivity. We support a wide range of government and industry clients in the areas of national security, intelligence, transportation, healthcare, environmental sustainability, and enterprise engineering. Learn more at Noblis -About Us

Why work at a Noblis company?

Our employees find greater meaning in their work and balance the other things in life that matter to them. Our people are our greatest asset. They are exceptionally skilled, knowledgeable, team-oriented, and mission-driven individuals who want to do work that matters and benefits the public.

Noblis has won numerous workplace awards. Noblis maintains a drug-free workplace and is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",3.9,"Noblis
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
14,MicroStrategy Business Intelligence Analyst,$73k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Modesto, CA, G3 Enterprises has been supplying the wine and spirits industry for over 50 years. As a single source packaging solution, its products and services include labels, stock and custom closures, warehousing, transportation, bottle etching, and mobile bottling.

The Business Intelligence Analyst creates reporting and analytical solutions that enable translating data into knowledge and maintains MicroStrategy infrastructure across G3 organization. Analyzes business intelligence data to inform business decisions. Partners with other areas of the business to model the outcome of implementing potential business strategies.

Essential Functions
• Utilizes data architecture to enable business decisions and recommend technical solutions to management based on scalability and complexity.
• Provides guidance and analytical support to include analysis and research in areas across G3 corporation.
• Satisfies ad-hoc requests for information from G3 teams that aid in uncovering new understandings that drive decisions which move the organization forward.
• Acts as technical expert, addressing infrastructure needs, systems/applications integration, compatibility, and multiple platforms.
• Analyzes data to create and maintain reports, dashboards, visualizations, and other tools (such as cubes and views) in multiple development and production environments.
• Responsible for executing the implementation of the BI strategy related to G3’s SAP ERP and OTM systems.
• Sources data from various systems via Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) and external data sources.
• Designs user driven analytics structure using existing data architecture.
• Influences data warehousing teams to recommend data layer structures and integrate systems.
• Translates business requirements to functional and technical design solutions, specifications, and prototypes.
• Collaborates with development teams to design business intelligence solutions to facilitate data gathering, storage, and retrieval.
• Consults with users or decision makers to identify data sources, required data elements, or data validation standards.
• Develops test plans and facilitates testing prior to promotions.
• Creates and maintains technical documentation
• Performs cross-functional analysis and collaborates with stakeholders across departments. Partners and presents findings to senior leadership.
• Responsible for understanding and complying with applicable quality, environmental and safety regulatory considerations. If accountable for the work of others, responsible for ensuring their understanding and compliance.

Qualifications
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, Data Analytics, Data Science, or Engineering plus 3 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management; OR High School diploma or State-issued equivalency certificate plus 7 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management.
• Ability to build and understand basic SQL queries.

Preferred Qualifications
• Master’s degree in Computer Science, Operations Research, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, or Engineering.
• MicroStrategy Intelligence Server Development experience.
• Experience designing and executing Application objects and Schema objects using MicroStrategy Desktop.
• Experience analysis, design, development, testing, and debugging of complex reports, ETL scripts and dashboards.
• Experience troubleshooting high level issues to identify and resolve problems caused by the database, source data, ETL, or the Business Intelligence software (common examples: nulls in data causing joins to function incorrectly; ETLs running out of sequence; MicroStrategy Objects not set up properly).
• Experience with cloud computing and “big data” processing and analytics.
• Understanding of web servers and applications.
• Knowledge of components of an enterprise systems architecture
• Knowledge of business process re-engineering processes including Lean Six Sigma principles.
• Lean Six Sigma Green or Black Belt Certified.
• Strong understanding of network architecture and application development methodologies
• Experience reading, analyzing, and interpreting common scientific and technical journals and financial reports.
• Knowledge of emerging technologies and development platforms.
• Experience applying machine learning or artificial intelligence to BI applications.
• Possesses a passion for technology and its impact on the enterprise, customers and consumers along with a breadth of experience that can balance business, application and operational requirements.
• Strong understanding of systems and “systems thinking” with the ability to make trade-off decisions to accomplish system-wide goals.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
• Excellent planning and organizational skills.
• Skilled in balancing long-term and short-term goals and perspectives of challenging situations.
• Skilled in applying multiple technical solutions to business problems.
• Remains unbiased toward any specific technology or vendor choice.
• Excellent analytical and technical skills.
• Skilled in navigating complex political situations to ensure successful change management.
• Exceptional interpersonal skills, including teamwork, facilitation and negotiation.
• Demonstrates strong technical thinking and developed high credibility with the technical community. Recognized by the IT community as someone who solves complex technology related business problems.
• Experience with performance tuning of business intelligence applications.
• Strong knowledge of SQL queries including writing, reading, and debugging.
• Experience working with Enterprise Data Warehousing, specifically SAP Data Warehousing (HANA).

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk.

Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

EEO/AA M/F/Vet/Disability",3.9,"G3 Enterprises
3.9","Modesto, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
15,Risk Analytics Manager,-1,"Key Responsibilities

Develop and execute risk management and lead acquisition strategies inside the business rules / decision engine and help quality assure, roll out and monitor.
Validate and test risk management strategies. Evaluate statistical scoring, segmentation, and third-party products for effective risk mitigation solutions.
Work with cross functional teams to develop and execute on strategic initiatives.
Implement initiatives to ensure consistency and compliance with credit policies, and liaise with cross functional business counterparts to develop and implement risk strategies and third party platform integration.
Analyze credit risk and financial data to develop, test, and optimize risk factors related to credit policies.
Leverage analytics skills to perform risk, financial and data analysis including profiling, reconciliation, and quality testing.
Prepare risk reports for senior management that include analytics of risk, performance, emerging trends and opportunities.
Planning, designing and implementing an overall risk management process for the organization

Essential Functions:

Project Management: Oversee project lifecycle of data studies, new technology interrogation, or any other projects related to risk or analytics. Deliver written project plans to set expectations and gain strategic agreement. Interface with systems personnel for timely accurate implementation of underwriting solutions. Gather requirements for new or modified software systems enhancements and/or integration solutions. Conduct and analyze business and information technology processes and prepare essential groundwork. Make recommendations for necessary changes on projects that come from other departments.
Support: At as liaison to general counsel, marketing department, operations department, financial department, financial department, and individuals. Work with portfolio and merchant representatives to execute current and emerging business strategies. Interact internally to determine involvement, data requirements, and analysis. Research and evaluate new technology trends, data providers and analytics opportunities.
Leadership – Mentor junior level analysts of the Risk Management team. Ensure training/delivery of scheduled and ad-hoc data reports/studies and developing new effective methods to communicate significant risk information. Make recommendations for personnel actions and assist in day-to-day operations of group.
Insight – Maintain a thorough understanding of risk, operational, and management concepts to manage major portfolio risk factors. Investigate escalated incidences in reports for further review. Suggest possible risk management solutions, credit policy changes, and action plans. Turn business requirements into functional and technical specs for inclusion in the development process and in business planning. Define and develop business reports that support project assignments.

Skills:

Active Listening - Giving full attention to what other people are saying, taking time to understand the points being made, asking questions as appropriate, and not interrupting at inappropriate times.
Writing - Communicating effectively in writing as appropriate for the needs of the audience.
Speaking - Talking to others to convey information effectively.
Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gather and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions.
Project Management – Coordinates projects; communicates changes in progress; Completes projects on time.
Technical Skills – Pursues training and development opportunities; Shares expertise with others
Analytical – Synthesizes complex or diverse information; collects and researches data.
Critical Thinking - Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Credit Scoring & Modeling - Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies
Reading Comprehension - Understanding written sentences and paragraphs in work related documents.
Social Perceptiveness - Being aware of others' reactions and understanding why they react as they do.
Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies

Attributes:

Oral Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
Oral Comprehension - The ability to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
Written Comprehension - The ability to read and understand information and ideas presented in writing.
Written Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in writing so others will understand.
Speech Clarity - The ability to speak clearly so others can understand you.
Speech Recognition - The ability to identify and understand the speech of another person.

Experience and Education:

Bachelor’s degree in economics, mathematics, statistics or related field
3+ years experience, risk and financial services
2 years’ experience in the risk management field, minimum

Computer Software/Hardware:

Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Access and Crystal Reporting
Outlook Exchange
Underwriting Software, Proficient in SQL, SAS, R or Python

Physical Requirements/Work Environment:

Must be able to stand and sit for long periods of time, talking, hearing constantly.
Occasionally lift up to 10 lbs. on occasion
Must be able to sit in front of computer monitor (s) daily
Sitting and or standing for long periods of time.
Noise level: moderate noise level daily in an office atmosphere.

Skills
Required
Technical knowledge & skills
Critical Thinking
Active Listening
Analytical",-1,"Cane Bay Partners VI, LLP/CBP","Christiansted, VI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
16,Business Data Analyst (Mortgage Operations),$41k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"First Midwest, with assets over $20 billion, is the premier relationship-based banking franchise in the dynamic Chicagoland banking market. As one of the Chicago metropolitan area's largest independent bank holding companies, First Midwest provides the full range of commercial, retail banking, and wealth management services through some 120+ offices located in communities in metropolitan Chicago, Northwest Indiana, Central and Western Illinois, Eastern Iowa, and Southeast Wisconsin.

POSITION SUMMARY:

Working collaboratively with the management team, this position is responsible for creating and managing key periodic reports and ad hoc analyses in support of defined business objectives. This role will also champion the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business.

REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:
Bachelor’s degree preferred in some business discipline
5 years banking or related experience preferred
Advanced analysis and reporting experience required
In-depth knowledge of industry operating rules preferred
Ability to implement new procedures in response to, and in anticipation of, changes in the business environment desired
Possesses and applies comprehensive problem solving abilities for complex issues
High proficiency and analytical skills using Microsoft Office Suite of products required. Access Database and Excel graphing skills a plus.
Experience with financial reports and Falcon risk analytics a plus
Client focus and project management skills are required with an aptitude for creating operational efficiencies and positive client experiences
Demonstrated written and oral communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills
DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work collaboratively with the leadership team on the identification, development and ongoing refinement of periodic reports.
Proactively identify opportunities in support of defined business objectives by developing in-depth analyses.
Support the line of business data collection and distribution needs by working collaboratively with internal and external partners as needed.
Support the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business and maintain analytics related to impacts.
Assists in monthly planning, loss analysis, forecasting and variance reporting.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here and Supplement here.",3.6,"First Midwest Bank
3.6","Gurnee, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
17,Data Science Manager,$96k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytical. Data Driven. Excellent Communicator. Strong Business Partner.

Does this sound like you? If so– look no further! Our Analytics team is looking to expand and complement their team with a new Data Science Manager.

As ourData Science Manager, you are responsible for developing predictive models to assist our Underwriting and Claims teams. You will collaborate closely with internal and external peers, pro-actively collect and address feedback from business units, and create actionable models which enable better business decisions.

At Constellation, we’re doing things differently. Our organization empowers you and believes that together, we can make a difference.

So, join us! We invite you to join a company where you can stretch your abilities and rocket your career to the stars!

You will be responsible for:
Participating in the design and delivery of accurate and robust predictive models
Collaborating with Subject Matter Experts to and design analytic solutions which enable better decision making
Clearly communicating findings, collecting feedback, addressing questions and concerns, with the ability to clearly translate technical concepts to non-technical audience
Managing large, long term project timelines with cross functional dependencies and transparently communicating progress on these timelines, obstacles, and solutions to any gaps
Working with a team of data scientists to build out actionable statistical models (GLMs / ML / AI) within R / Python
Mentoring other data scientists on model development, best practices, technical coding, Analytics Environment
Assisting in expansion and development of analytics department, finding internal and external vendor partners to support long-term business objectives
Determining requirements for Analytics platform. Collaborating with IT to deliver and maintain environment
You will have:
3+ years working with R or Python
3+ years leading analytics projects
Demonstrated strong verbal and written communication skills
Bachelor’s Degree with 7 years’ experience or Masters / PhD with 5 years’ experience",4.5,"Constellation (MN)
4.5","Minneapolis, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,Data Scientist,$93k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"AIS has a workshare opportunity for a Data Scientist (TS/FSPOLY required) on a large, newly awarded contract. In this role you will develop machine learning, data mining, statistical and graph-based algorithms to analyze and make sense of datasets; prototype or consider several algorithms and decide upon final model based on suitable performance metrics.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Produce data visualizations that provide insight into dataset structure and meaning
Work with subject matters experts (SMEs) to identify important information in raw data and
develop scripts that extract this information from a variety of data formats (e.g., SQL tables, structured metadata, network logs)
Incorporate SME input into feature vectors suitable for analytic development and testing
Translate customer qualitative analysis process and goals into quantitative formulations that are coded into software prototypes
Develop and implement statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive,
predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
Develop experiments to collect data or models to simulate data when required data are unavailable
Develop feature vectors for input into machine learning algorithms
Identify the most appropriate algorithm for a given dataset and tune input and model parameters
Evaluate and validate the performance of analytics using standard techniques and metrics (e.g.cross-validation, ROC curves, confusion matrices)
Required Education, Experience and Skills
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline(e.g., statistics, mathematics, operations research, engineering, or computer science).
A Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline can be substituted for three years of experience
Five years of experience analyzing datasets and developing analytics.
Five years of experience programming with data analysis software such as R, Python, SAS, or MATLAB.
An additional two years of experience in software development, cloud development, analyzing datasets or developing descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics can be substituted for a Master's degree.
U.S. Citizenship Required
Must possess a TS/FSPOLY clearance
EOE/AA Disability/Veteran",4.3,"Assured Information Security, Inc. (AIS)
4.3","Fort Meade, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
19,Staff Data Scientist I,$127k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist – Machine Learning & Real-Time Decision Processing (Remote, US)

Valassis is a leader in online advertising technology. We process over 12 trillion calculations daily to analyze and decide on more than 110 billion digital ad requests. As a Data Scientist at Valassis your work is central to keeping us at the forefront of the AdTech industry.

We are seeking data experts who are passionate about using cutting edge technology and data science methods to solve unique and complex problems. The ideal candidate is innately curious about how data can be used to tell a story and inform decisions. You have honed your skills through a combination of education, work experience, and hobbies. You are excited about the complexity and challenges of creating intelligent, high performance systems while working with a highly experienced and driven data science team.

If this describes you, we are interested. You can be an integral part of a cross-disciplinary team working on highly visible projects that improve performance and grow the intelligence in our product suite. Our day to day work is performed in a progressive, high-tech workspace where we focus on a friendly, collaborative and fulfilling environment.

On any given day you’ll be…
Using geo location data to track foot traffic, commercial visitation and next most likely visit to understand consumer physical behavior.
Using online behavior data to determine the primary interest categories of consumers and the web properties they visit.
Implementing a predictive model to determine whether a person is likely to visit a car dealership based on the advertising signals they’ve received.
Monitoring & improving a system that deploys and refits 10’s of thousands of models daily.
Developing algorithms to optimize the setting of every lever in a high throughput real-time decision system.
Analyzing data to better understand how a neighborhood’s consumption of web pages correlates with visits to a local big box store.
Finding the handful of outliers in billions of transactions.
Deriving a set of new features that will help better understand the interplay between geography and audience features to improve model performance.
Building new products with applied AI and bring them to market.
Participating in planning, roadmap, and architecture discussions to help evolve our AI processes to improve revenue-generating products.
Our ideal candidate will likely have…
The professional experience and desire to perform responsibilities similar to those listed above
An advanced degree in a relevant, quantitative field or equivalent experience working with Big Data and Spark in a professional setting
Ability to grow and ultimately mentor team members of varying experience levels and competencies through data science, product and software development life cycles
WHO WE ARE
Valassis is a leading digital marketing intelligence company, providing a best-in-class data management platform and online and offline targeting capabilities that fuel superior display advertising and media offerings. Through proprietary technology and the Valassis Digital Consumer Graph™, we power the lifecycle of marketing campaigns – from planning to activation and measurement. In fact, 19 of 20 leading brands work with Valassis to drive better campaign performance.

WHAT'S IN IT FOR YOU?
Valassis has a generous total rewards benefits package that includes medical, dental and vision coverage, 401k and PTO allowance. A wide variety of additional benefits like life insurance, employee assistance and pet insurance are also available; not to mention smart and friendly coworkers!

Valassis is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Applicants who have disabilities may request that accommodations be made in order to complete the selection process.

EEO is the law. To review your rights under Equal Employment Opportunity please visit: www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf.

#LI-JM1",3.4,"Valassis
3.4","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
20,Business Analytics Manager,-1,"Purpose and Scope

The Business Analytics Manager leads the demand planning process for the commercial team including collecting the volume and pricing data from all key data sources, as well as compiling the business understanding and assumptions that will be included in the forecast for the purpose of forecast for business planning decisions. This role is also responsible for working cross functionally to determine forecast assumptions and inputs with the manufacturing operations planning, accounting, contracts and pricing, sales leadership, market access, and marketing. Those assumptions will be incorporated into the forecast, vetted with the cross functional team, and adjusted as needed to gain agreement for senior leadership. This position is responsible for all local, state & federal government reporting, calculations, and submissions. Compliance to all federal and state pricing regulations is a key element to the position. Strong financial accounting, and analytical skills are required.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

Builds the commercial demand and revenue forecast to TPI commercial
Establishes and maintains forecast models to generate forecast scenarios as needed to support business decisions.
Maintain strict process and decision documentation including pricing committee official reporting and price list tracking
Develops higher order summaries and analysis of data and assumptions to model
Collaborates closely with Finance to link sales performance and market data for use in financial planning and
Manages government pricing calculations to ensure the accuracy of all Medicaid, Medicare & VA FSS quarterly rebate and discount calculations and reporting.
Pricing analysis across multiple customer and contracting segments.
Works closely with contracts and pricing, marketing, and sales teams to determine assumptions and validate business information and decisions
Develops and maintains stringent quality control processes that ensure the accuracy of all reports and analyzes, cross checks, and validates transactional data from multiple databases to ensure accuracy
Assists with special projects as required.
Interacts regularly with Executive Leadership, Sales Leadership, and Analytics leadership to report on commercial performance trends.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

3-5 year of strong accounting, finance, or data analytics
Government reporting and pricing experience preferred
Proficiency with Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe acrobat and other reporting software used in the industry such as Power Query and Tableau.
Excellent organizational, problem-solving, and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with imperfect data and manage ambiguity to bring clarity to business decisions.
Advanced financial, analytical, strategy, and business planning skills with proficiency in analytics methodologies.
Ability to work independently on data analyses and combine multiple data sources across multiple views to uncover trends.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization to communicate results of the data analyses and trends.
Ability to communicate effectively and maintain effective working relationships across multiple departments.
Self-starter with the ability to build new department capability and team over time.

Education & Experience

Bachelor's Degree
MBA or similar advanced degree preferred.
Strong accounting, finance, or data analytics with 3 years of experience.
Must be proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe Acrobat and other reporting tools and software used within the industry

Working Conditions

Office environment; requiring sitting and standing
Travel as required

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",-1,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
21,Research Scientist,$38k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business: Boys Town National Research Hospital

Boys Town National Research Hospital (BTNRH) is seeking Junior, Mid, or Senior career level Research Scientists in the Center for Childhood Deafness, Language & Learning (CCDLL). The Center for Childhood Deafness, Language, and Learning is directed by Karla McGregor, Ph.D.

Scientists at Boys Town National Research Hospital are full-time researchers with no teaching or administrative responsibilities and reasonable service commitments.

Our vision is to grow the CCDLL into a program with tightly integrated research and clinical arms that work synergistically on issues of language learning and development. Work that fits this focus could involve examination of differences between learners with varying diagnoses; determination of the influences of intervention as well as family, academic, and social environments on language outcomes; identification of developmental processes that support language learning during infancy, childhood, adolescence, and young adulthood; and investigation of brain plasticity and neurologic pathways that support language learning and development. We are assembling a faculty that can offer a unique perspective on such issues, one that is informed by a commitment to understanding and ameliorating the effects of childhood disabilities on language learning and development.
All scientists will have access to new, state-of-the art laboratory facilities, generous start-up funds, and extensive supports for grant management, IT, participant recruitment, and clinical measurement.
Senior scientists aim for 50% salary support on external grants. Via participation in the Center for Perception and Communication in Children (CPCC) funded by a Centers of Biomedical Research Excellence (COBRE) grant, junior scientists are provided with extensive mentoring and three years of full support to enable them to reach this goal.
Via participation in the Center for Perception and Communication in Children (CPCC) funded by a Centers of Biomedical Research Excellence (COBRE) grant, junior scientists are provided with extensive mentoring and three years of full support to enable them to reach this goal.

Scientists at Boys Town National Research Hospital have the advantage of working alongside an outstanding, internationally recognized group of colleagues. In addition to clinicians and scientists in the CCDLL, collaborations are possible with faculty in the Centers for Human Neurosciences, Neurobehavioral Research, Sensory Neuroscience Research, Audiological and Vestibular Services, and Hearing Research. Our intellectual community also includes colleagues at the University of Nebraska-Omaha, the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, the University of Nebraska Medical Center, Creighton University and the Creighton University School of Medicine. Our participation in the Great Plains IDeA-Clinical & Translational Research Center provides training opportunities, partnerships, and resources for scientists who wish to translate science into better health outcomes.

Required Qualifications : A successful candidate will have a Ph.D. as well as post-doctoral studies or faculty-level experience in Speech-Language Pathology, Cognitive Science, Developmental or Experimental Psychology or a related field, and a record that demonstrates a highly productive and excellent research program. Expertise in phonological development or disorders, neurodevelopmental disorders, or the interface between language development and emotional/behavioral health is of particular interest, but not required.

About Boys Town : Boys Town has been changing the way America cares for children and families since 1917. Our employees have helped us grow from a small boardinghouse in downtown Omaha, Nebraska into one of the largest national child and family care organizations in the country. With the addition of Boys Town National Research Hospital in 1977, our services branched out into the health care and research fields, offering even more career opportunities to those looking to make a real difference.

Our employees are our #1 supporters when it comes to achieving Boys Town's mission, which is why we are proud of their commitment to making the world a better place for children, families, patients, and communities. Unique perks to Boys Town employees and their families include free visits to Boys Town physicians and free prescriptions under the Boys Town Medical Plan, tuition assistance, parenting resources from our experts and professional development opportunities within the organization, just to name a few. Working at Boys Town is more than just a job, it is a way of life.

Date Posted : September 23, 2020

Boys Town National Research Hospital is a tobacco free campus. This advertisement describes the general nature of work to be performed and does not include an exhaustive list of all duties, skills, or abilities required. Boys Town is an equal employment opportunity employer and participates in the E-Verify program. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status. To request a disability-related accommodation in the application process, contact us at 1-877-639-6003.",2.9,"Boys Town National Research Hospital
2.9","Omaha, NE",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
22,FCC Data Scientist,$73k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary: The FCC Analytics group is responsible for the development and management of the BSA/AML, Fraud and Quality Control analytics functions. The group tunes the financial crimes models dedicated to the detection of suspicious activity and fraudulent transactions as well as those designed to risk rate customers and screen against OFAC designated lists. Additionally, the group manages application related implementations, maintenance and enhancements and the development of reporting and visual analytics used for investigations, KPI tracking, quarterly reporting and annual risk assessments.

The primary purpose of this position is to assist with the management of the Fraud and BSA/AML models related to transaction monitoring, customer risk rating, OFAC fuzzy logic filtering, and transactional fraud mitigation strategies. The individual that fulfills this position must understand the general dynamics of model risk management as set forth by OCC guidelines. Furthermore, the candidate must also have experience with SQL, quantitative stat based analytics (such as standard deviation, percentile distributions, k-means, clustering, etc.), model forecasting and reporting analytics (including visual and flowchart modeling) amongst other skill sets around management of information systems. Requires basic commercial awareness.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: While other duties and special projects may be assigned, the primary duties and responsibilities include the following:
Conduct assessments of models and provide reports detailing the current state of data feeds, rule output at current settings, and alert outputs at alternative settings.
Utilize Oracle SQL to the extent of simulating model output.
Identify potential logic deficiencies in model outputs through cross validation of external analyses
Assist with the identification, evaluation, and development of controls to mitigate FCC risk and operational impacts.
Research, develop, prototype and test new models and their related inputs.
Assist with annual FCC model tuning and optimization efforts in line with regulatory expectations to meet false-positive and detection rate criteria; performs quantitative analysis on the alert output of each tuning cycle (able to prepare reports detailing forecast results).
Perform model management reviews for the ongoing assessment of model suitability against emerging risk.
Assist with data integrity and validation testing on FCC projects including software implementations, operational enhancements related to efficiency gains, and other special projects as needed including the coordination of software updates in collaboration with the Bank's IT Department and or Project Management Office.
Support manager with resolving of open issues and/or defects involving applications used by the FCC Department including the identification of issues, tracking, escalation, testing, and resolution.
Maintain business definitions in the form of a data dictionary for all department managed models.
Prepare reports in a manner that is clear and comprehensible to FCC supervisors/managers, internal auditors and regulatory examiners.
Communicate production issues with key stakeholders such as business lines, FCC management team, and the IT Department.
Create documentation and provide technical training to business users as needed (this includes training post model tuning deployments and on new enhancements).
If necessary, effectively communicate with the business lines in order to obtain the necessary information and documentation to complete model improvements.
Handle a large workload with the ability to complete the tasks correctly and efficiently within the designated timeframes exercising discretion in setting priorities.
Communicate effectively to different audiences, including both business and technical parties.
Possess a general understanding of banking with respect to BSA/AML and Fraud risks.
Perform any other assignments as directed by manager.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems or related field.
At least 3 years working with data modeling, software implementation, enhanced reporting analytics or related experience preferably with a financial institution.
Advanced experience with data mining/analytical tools such as R and Python
Strong knowledge of Structured Query Language (SQL), Oracle programming language, data mining techniques, and Business Intelligence Tools
Strong database skills, including working with advanced data sets, pivot tables, advanced database and statistical functions and methods
Experience visualizing data using tools such as Tableau
Experience with developing and implementing Fraud and BSA/AML risk strategies in decision engines, detection tools and onboarding platforms.",3.0,"BankUnited
3.0","Miami Lakes, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
23,Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist,$99k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Acuity is seeking a Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist to use statistical knowledge and research skills to solve business problems. The Research Statistician will develop, implement, and interpret statistical models with a strong emphasis on data mining and statistical/predictive modeling. Provides work direction.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Identifies and acquires additional data sources, both internal and external, that can be used to enhance analyses.
Lead the development of analytical models to drive superior business outcomes.
Develop in-depth understanding of drivers for optimization by utilizing statistics and data mining techniques.
Using latest PC tools, develop, enhance and monitor reports and models for other business areas.
Evaluate and use Data Mining Tools.
Support, train, encourage, consult other areas in the company and provide actionable information to management.
Continually monitor database information and future needs.
Explore and acquire data from outside sources.
Use database tools to support other departments
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EDUCATION:
Masters/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Operations Research or Computer Science
EXPERIENCE:
5 years P&C insurance, modelling and project leader experience. Programming skills including SAS and R.
OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong interpersonal, quantitative, problem-solving, computer and conceptual skills.
Aptitude in predictive modeling, multivariate analysis, statistical modeling, data mining techniques and mathematical statistics.
Ability to apply strong programming and data management skills.
Knowledge of and experience with at least one major computer programming language or advanced syntax in a major statistical package.
This job is classified as exempt.",4.9,"Acuity Insurance
4.9","Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
24,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Hi - we’re Topaz Labs. We create AI-powered software that solves photographers’ biggest problems like one-click noise reduction, super-simple masking, and pixel-perfect image upscaling. Tens of thousands of paid customers use our technology every day, ranging from amateur photographers to major Hollywood movie studios. Our AI image enhancement technology has been recognized in Fast Company, The Verge, Engadget, Ars Technica, and more.

We’re looking for a mid to senior-level Deep Learning Researcher to help us accelerate our technology development. Although your scope will later expand, you’ll start with owning R&D for one of our primary products Sharpen AI:
Develop and integrate better deep-learning models in three areas: shake reduction, focus correction, and general sharpening
Lead development on supplemental AI features like auto-masking or model selection
Explore new model research and development for sharpening images
We’re looking for a pretty specific person for this role - someone with a high work ethic, intellectual humility, and a shipping mentality. We’re a small company with a high-visibility and high-performance culture, so you will work with a high degree of impact and autonomy. This is an ideal role for an excellent ML researcher whose primary motivation is to see their work in the hands of thousands of real users.
Technical requirements
Prior key contributor to significant deep learning projects for image manipulation or enhancement
Significant prior experience with CNNs and other common computer vision network architectures
2 years of intensive hands-on experience with TensorFlow or other ML frameworks
Good understanding of common image processing algorithms
Proficient in C/C++, OpenCV.
Well-read on major recent research papers in deep learning for image or video enhancement
PhD preferred, but may consider MS or BS in Computer Science / Engineering
Our technology advantage has already driven 10% month-over-month active user growth for our company. This is a great opportunity for the perfect person to accelerate our technology and growth even further. Your compensation will be tied directly to the performance of the company. We’re also proud to offer 100% covered platinum-level medical/dental/vision for employees, 15 days annual PTO plus holidays, and 401k matching.",3.9,"Topaz Labs
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
25,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science",$83k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
26,"Scientist, Assay Development",-1,"POSITION SUMMARY:
This position is responsible for developing, coordinating, and providing assay support for preclinical, clinical candidates and other CMO projects coordinated by Process Development and Manufacturing. This position will also be responsible for developing and evaluating technology to characterize vaccine products (example: recombinant protein, virus or bacterial vaccines). This position also involves and coordinates the assay qualification, validation and tech transfer activities.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Responsible for developing physicochemical methodologies and analytical techniques including chromatography (HPLC - size exclusion, ion exchange), light scattering, solubility and viscosity measurements, spectroscopy (CD, fluorescence, UV/VIS, and FTIR), for quantifying purity/quality of proteins, peptides, VLPs, viral vectors.
Responsible for performing Peptide micro-array, ELISA, SDS-PAGE, Western blotting, qPCR, and RT-PCR and other gene/protein expression assays.
Responsible for developing or optimizing viral titer assays, TCID50, plaque, and focus assays for viral vectors.
Lead development of assays for physical and functional characteristics of recombinant protein, bacterial or viral vaccine formulations to support various phases of clinical manufacturing projects.
Coordinates and lead the development of release and potency assays for various vaccine platforms as needed.
Coordinate various projects and provide assay or analytical support for Process Development and Manufacturing.
Coordinates assay transfer activities as appropriate for internal or external projects.
Coordinate assay activities among Assay Development, Quality Control and Process Development groups for driving work to meet project deliverables as well as for cross-functional improvements.
Experienced in the principles of good record keeping for all the assay development processes.
Demonstrated ability to assemble data generated into technical reports, summaries, and/or graphic presentations.
Write, review, and edit SOPs.
Performs other duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS:
PhD degree in Molecular Biology, Biochemistry, Biophysics or Pharmaceutical Chemistry discipline with a 3+ years in Assay/Analytical Development, Protein Characterization, Formulation development in vaccines in an industrial setting.
Hands-on and in-depth understanding of different recombinant protein physical and biochemical characterization and stabilization techniques.
Experience in technology transfer, assay qualification and assay validation
Experience in the design and screening various formulations for protein and virus to assess stability. Investigates, develops, optimizes, and implements new analytical assays.
Evidence of experience with cGMP, ICH testing guidelines and regulatory requirements for filing and registration of vaccine and/or biologics.
Evidence of effective communication, both verbally and written.
Demonstrate highly organized, analytical, accurate, and detail oriented capabilities.
Evidence of ability to prioritize assignments; time management and multitasking in a dynamic environment.
IDT offers a competitive compensation package to include major medical/dental/vision, group life insurance, STD/LTD plans, 401k plan with company match, and paid vacation, sick and holidays.
IDT Biologika Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer:
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status andwill not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",3.6,"IDT Biologika
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Unknown,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
27,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$45k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for turning data into knowledge, enabling business decisions.

Specific Duties Include:
Partnering with the user community to create new business intelligence, reporting and data analysis solutions.
Maintaining existing software systems related to business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Identify improvements to existing business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Capture, develop, and document data definitions, business rules, and data quality requirements.
Build and maintain ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) and integration processes.
Validate data delivered to user community.
Ensure compliance with Protolabs data and software policies and procedures.
Monitor software systems to ensure reliability and accuracy of information loaded into the databases.
Maintain all documentation related to database objects, source systems, and operations.
Conduct complex, important work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgment.
Minimum Qualifications:
6+ years of experience working in software engineering
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server
Experience with Domo
Experience with PowerBI
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Service (SSRS)
Ability to work on multiple project concurrently
Ability to manage time effectively
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work effectively in a fast paced, collaborative environment
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous leadership experience preferred
Knowledge of document databases including Raven
Previous experience with Microsoft Dynamics AX
Previous experience with Salesforce
Software development in a continuous integration and continuous deployment environment
Proto Labs maintains ITAR-compliant operations in all of our United States based facilities. Due to ITAR regulations, this role is only open to U.S. Citizens, lawful permanent residents (green card holders) or foreign nationals granted refugee or asylee status. Individuals with temporary visas (e.g. E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, TN or OPT) are not eligible for hire in this role.

Proto Labs, Inc. is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer",3.8,"Protolabs
3.8","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
28,Data Scientist Risk Analyst,$50k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Oasis Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to support the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) in Washington, DC.
The successful candidate shall provide support in data analytics, Python, data visualization, dashboards and use of data analytic tools. Activities which the contractor may be tasked to perform include gathering requirements from stakeholders, conducting financial data analysis and risk analysis in a Big Data environment, and creating interactive dashboard reports and documentations.

LOCATION: Washington, DC

JOB STATUS: Full-Time

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Certifications, Experience, Skills)

SECURITY CLEARANCE: Ability to pass a Special Agreement Check (SAC) and a National Agency Check and Inquires (NACI) Background Investigation

EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree

CERTIFICATIONS AND TOOLS: Certifications in Data Analytics program languages such as Python and R preferred but not required. Experience with Global Risk product a plus, but not required.

EXPERIENCE LEVEL: A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in the data analysis field and a minimum of 5 years of industrial analytics experience using Python (recent use during the past 3 years) as well as extensive experience with SQL.
Specific experience with financial or market risk analysis is a Must.

DESCRIPTION: Functionally, the candidate will be responsible for:

Work closely with the customer to gather and document project requirements.
Perform data manipulation and advanced data analysis including financial modeling, data mining, and Machine Learning techniques.
Perform risk analysis which may include a broad range of financial risk measures, (such as Value at Risk (VaR): computation and evaluation, VaR tracking (VaR evolution over time), Incremental (and marginal) VaR calculation for individual asset classes /positions, conditional VaR, stress testing).
Test each project thoroughly before presenting it to the task order project manager for quality control. Document test results as part of the project closeout documentation.
Create documentation as required under the PMLC and the Configuration Change Board (CCB) in order to move projects to the production environment.
Coordinate with internal and external organizations providing data to understand and resolve improper data formatting and other integration issues.
Participate in facilitated meetings between stakeholders at CFTC which may include regular status meetings, user acceptance testing meetings and ad hoc development discussions.
Data analysis tasks may be varied. They will include complex data requests that require data mining, extraction, and query optimization services from Divisions throughout the CFTC.
Assist business users, economists, statisticians, and others, as required, to support effective use of analytic techniques and CFTC-approved tools to meet the customers various analytic needs.

Who We Are

Oasis Systems is a premier provider of customer-driven, cost-effective and quality Engineering Services; Enterprise Systems and Applications; Human Factors Engineering; Information Technology and Cyber Security; Professional Services; and Specialized Engineering Solutions to the Department of Defense, FAA, NRC and other federal agencies.

We strive to be an exciting and welcoming company that attracts, develops, motivates and retains the most talented, skilled and dedicated people in the industry; where they are encouraged to achieve personal excellence, purpose, and their full potential and career aspirations; while supporting mission-critical national security technologies and programs.

Oasis Systems is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of any legally protected characteristic including, but not limited to, race, color, religion, national origin, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, ancestry, age, medical condition, military veteran status or on the basis of physical handicap which, with reasonable accommodation, render the application to satisfactorily perform the job available.",3.8,"Oasis Systems LLC
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
29,Data Scientist - DAB,$83k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Real World Evidence

Real World Evidence - Increase the use of real-world data across the Takeda value chain to accelerate our clinical trials and demonstrate patient outcomes.

We believe patients should receive the best support, anywhere, anytime, as they need it. We will do this by providing digital solutions that put patients at the heart of their care by integrating and personalizing the support they receive.

We will explore partnering externally and internally to provide fit-for-purpose solutions that help patients and care teams from diagnosis through treatment and beyond. We will leverage the power of data and technology to gain insights into diseases, treatments or lifestyle to improve the quality of care and make it as unique to each patient as possible.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Independently perform complex analysis using modern Data Science techniques against structured or unstructured data and report results back to generate insights to Takeda.
Apply machine learning, deep learning and other advanced techniques while performing Data Analysis engagements. This is against structured and un-structured data sets, at small and large scale.
Provide mentorship to other Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Data Specialists across R&D and Vaccine at Takeda as we elevate our data IQ across the organization. This will include coordination of Internal and External collaborations.
Deliver critical analysis against Takeda’s toughest data problems to give us critical insight to the organization’s largest questions.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Perform machine learning, deep learning and other advanced data techniques at a level of quality that can be defended by peers at a PHD level across the organizations.
Introduce novel and state-of-the-art computational techniques to other teams and scientists to improve capabilities for data analysis with the purpose of deriving high accuracy insight from available datasets more efficiently.
Understanding and usage of different Supervised and Unsupervised learning techniques, their biases, how and when to apply them and which methods are the best for a particular analysis.
Ability to wrangle raw data sets into a format that can have advanced methods applied against the resulting data.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology and data problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other technical organizations throughout the company

CORE ELEMENTS RELATED TO THIS ROLE

Provide leadership and expertise to best construct data and execute analysis for feature detection, retrospective and predictive modelling, within a complex R&D and Vaccines environment.
Understanding of Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Re-enforcement learning and other techniques to be able to use and teach these methods inside the organization.
Ability to stay up to speed on modern data techniques, understand how to apply them and constantly demonstrated how and where to apply these new methods.
Ability to produce analysis for and defend results to PhD and executive level audience across the organizations
Design, Execute, QC and Deliver Data Science Analysis independently and effectively across the organization

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Master’s Degree or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science or equivalent
3+ years’ experience or a PhD and relevant project / coursework
Expertise with the Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies
Experience with Spark
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables
Experience with two of the following languages: Python, R, Java or Scala
Experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, MX Net
Working knowledge of SQL and NoSQL datastores
Experience in a scientific environment

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
30,ANC-Environmental Engineer-Scientist (ML),$84k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Shannon & Wilson’s Anchorage office provides clients with environmental and geotechnical engineering services. Anchorage’s field support personnel include environmental and geotechnical engineers, EITS, environmental scientists and geologists. Our projects take us to some of the most beautiful and rugged locations in Alaska. We offer varying exciting work assignments and a friendly work atmosphere. It’s one of the reasons most of our staff are long-term employees. With so many ways to build work relationships and give back to our community, staff in our Anchorage office enjoy a group summer BBQ, annual ski trip, Bike to Work celebrations, and attending career fairs. Anchorage is surrounded by exciting outdoor opportunities including camping, hiking, biking, fishing, skiing, golfing, scenic drives, glaciers, national parks and wildlife viewing. Also offering, a vibrant arts community, surrounded by many restaurants and shops, Anchorage is a gem.

Responsibilities:
Comprehensive environmental consulting and/or engineering that includes planning, data assessment, reporting, overseeing field personnel, travel and field work, and/or sample collection.
Perform Phase I, II, & III Environmental Site Assessments.
Define scopes of service and prepare budgets and proposals.
Review, evaluate, and interpret environmental data and prepare summary reports.
Interact and communicate with clients, vendors, and staff at all levels in a professional manner.
Support business development and marketing activities, including preparation of cost proposals and presentations to existing and prospective clients.
Follow Shannon & Wilson’s Quality Assurance policy.
Follow and promote Shannon & Wilson’s Health & Safety and Loss Prevention policies and procedures.
Perform other duties as assigned by your supervisor.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Geology, Hydrology, Civil, Chemical or Environmental Engineering, Chemistry, Biology, or other Natural Science; Master's Degree preferred.
7 to 14 years of experience
40-hour HAZWOPER training
Knowledge of Alaska environmental regulations.
Knowledge of RCRA, CERCLA, OSHA and other federal regulations.
Experience sampling soil, groundwater, and other media at contaminated sites.
Experience in hazardous waste and hazardous materials management.
Experience with environmental remediation technologies.
Experience on federal projects (HTRW, TERC, AFCEE, etc.).
Travel and year-round field work, with working hours more than 40 per week and weekends as needed.
Excellent writing, organizational, and communication skills required to effectively interact with clients and staff at all levels.
Must be personable, flexible, and professional.
Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision.
Must be willing and able to travel and support the needs of other Shannon & Wilson offices.
Must have and maintain a valid driver license and insurable driving record.
Basic computer skills: MS Word, MS Excel required.
This position requires critical thinking and analysis; frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending, and lifting and carrying 30+ pounds; working in all weather conditions; field visits per project needs; ability to travel (drive or fly) to other Shannon & Wilson offices and drive to and from job sites locally and out of state.
Other desirable skills and training based on previous experience:
Advanced computer skills: Access, ArcGIS, AutoCAD.
Experience with statistical analyses.
Experience with fate and transport modeling.
Experience with planning, logistics, and field work in remote locations.
Experience preparing SPCC Plans and SWPPPs.
Meet the requirements of an Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation Qualified Environmental Professional, as defined by 18 Alaska Administrative Code 75.333
Level Placement

Typically, depending on an applicant’s education, experience, other qualifications they possess, if they are a fit for the company and local office culture, and the current business needs, a Mid-Level Environmental Geologist/Engineer/Scientist typically would be placed at a Shannon & Wilson Senior Professional I, II, or III level.

Shannon & Wilson is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://www.paycomonline.net/v4/ats/web.php/jobs/ViewJobDetails?job=38323&clientkey=B3846FCE14DB1D56C33509DCE4268F1C
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Shannon & Wilson, Inc.
4.0","Anchorage, AK",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1954,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
31,Integrative Data Scientist - Bioinformatics,$93k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovative-driven company that will inspire you and support your career development? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as Integrative Data Scientist at our Cambridge office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by a wavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world. Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission in Cell Therapies.

You will have the opportunity to apply your knowledge and partner with industry-leading professionals in oncology, drug discovery, translational research, quantitative systems pharmacology, engineering, analytical and process development as you engage in cutting-edge therapeutic programs. The successful candidate will have extensive experience working with high-dimensional datasets using best practices in statistical data analyses to provide scientific insights and inform translational strategies.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The Cell Therapy Pharmaceutical Sciences team is pursuing several programs in human clinical studies, in addition to management of Takeda’s commercial cell therapy assets. This position’s primary role is to provide hands-on support, computational leadership and statistical guidance in bringing these therapies to patients, with a focus on nonclinical and clinical data integration, visualization, and analyses. In this role you will contribute to Takeda’s Cell Therapy platform strategies, working cross-functionally with discovery and development, translational sciences, pharmacology, data sciences, and in silico modeling teams.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Integrate and interpret high-dimensional data from a variety of high-throughput platforms and multidimensional data sources (internal or public) to derive insights and data-driven program strategies
Evaluate novel algorithms and approaches for data analysis, visualization and exploration in collaboration with academic partners and/or external associates
Work cross-functionally among R&D teams, workstreams, and programs to provide statistical support and expertise across the Cell Therapy portfolio.
Perform exploratory data analyses, static and dynamic data visualizations to communicate quantitative results enabling data-driven program decisions.
Provide bioinformatic and/or computational biology support to characterize disease mechanisms, mechanism of action for therapeutic interventions, and identify clinical biomarkers.
Actively communicate with nonclinical leads, scientists, analytical, and clinical teams to inform data analyses, data engineering, and machine learning that drives drug discovery and development.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, AND SKILLS:

PhD – or MS with 2+ years of work experience, or BS with 5+ years of relevant experience – in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field and/or experience in systems biology
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Knowledge of high-level computing languages: R, C/C++, Java, Python, Perl, and willingness to learn other(s)
Strong knowledge in statistical software and language (e.g., R, SAS, MATLAB)
Familiar with distributed computing, database (e.g., SQL), and Amazon Web Services. Database programming or dashboard experience is a plus.
Demonstrate experience and willingness to utilize state-of-the-art bioinformatic tools for genome-scale or big data derived from Next Generation Sequencing including: DNA, RNA, Epigenetics, and Single Cell sequencing platforms and assays.
Proficient in applying concepts in descriptive and multivariate statistics; Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning knowledge and application is a plus. Evaluation of (non)clinical datasets in cell therapies preferred.
Experience in data integration, algorithm development, programming, and evaluation of analytical tools
Self-motivation and excellent time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication, organizational skills, and be a strong team player.
Ability to drive initiatives, and excel in a matrix environment

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
32,Data Scientist - Two Sigma Insurance Quantified,$131k-$217k (Glassdoor Est.),"Two Sigma is a different kind of investment manager. Since 2001, we have used data science and technology to derive insights that forecast the future and discover value in markets worldwide. Our team of scientists, technologists and academics looks beyond traditional finance to understand the bigger picture and develop creative solutions to some of the world’s most challenging economic problems. Our work spans across markets and industries, from insurance and securities to private investments and new ventures.

Two Sigma IQ works closely with its industry partners to deliver products and solutions, which lead to enhanced automation and data-driven decision making. Comprised of a diversified and growing team of highly skilled data scientists, engineers, and business professionals, Two Sigma IQ possesses the agility and innovation of a dynamic startup with the resources and long-term view of Two Sigma. Learn more about TSIQ at https://twosigmaiq.com/

You will take on the following responsibilities:
Work with large, possibly unstructured datasets;
Perform exploratory data analysis and develop predictive models using large data sets
Carry out independent investigations/research studies and produce reports and visualizations to communicate your results;
Generate statistical models for a variety of phenomena;
Interact with industry professionals to understand their business and propose technical/statistical approaches;
Write libraries and research tools, developing and maintaining a research infrastructure to accelerate future results.

You should possess the following qualifications:
A strong academic record with at least one degree in a technical discipline.
Solid knowledge of Computer Science and Statistics.
Experience with data analysis tools (R, numpy/pandas/scikit-learn) and SQL.
Advanced programming skills in Python
Experience producing research reports and predictive models.
Good communication skills, both written and verbal.
Interest in working in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.

You will enjoy the following benefits:
Core Benefits: Fully paid medical and dental insurance premiums for employees and dependents, competitive 401k match, employer-paid life & disability insurance
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.4,"Two Sigma
4.4","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
33,Data Scientist,-1,"This is an excellent role for a Data Scientist who is looking to make a real difference in patients lives. The role will work with other Data Scientists and Analysts to create predictive and regression models. We strongly prefer someone who is compfortable explaining what the data sets and models to upper management and making recommendations.

The client is a large healthcare company based in Tennessee, however, this role can work remotely from anywhere in the United States. Work hours are negotiable.

Projected starting compensation to be around $115,000-130,000 annually.",3.4,"Vaco
3.4","Nashville, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
34,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst,$50k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blending customer advisory, customer support, and customer experience, Carousel’s supercharged Customer Success Obsessed mission goes beyond any one IT function. Rather, it’s a mindset, a mantra, and a company-wide drive to bring extreme technology value to Carousel customers—so they can bring value to theirs.
With deep expertise across a vast portfolio of technologies, including security, unified communications and collaboration, data center, networking, managed services, and cloud solutions, Carousel can design, implement, and support solutions tailored to meet the unique needs of each customer. By offering professional and managed services with flexible deployments in the cloud, Carousel ensures customers achieve agility and use technologies in the way most effective for their business.
A legion of 1,300, the Carousel team has been committed to the art of customer success for its more than 6,000 highly satisfied customers since 1992. The company has been recognized by multiple publications and industry consortiums as a top technology integrator and managed services and cloud solution provider—including the Inc. 500/5000, Healthcare Informatics 100, and CRN MSP Elite 150. Headquartered in Exeter, RI, the company has offices across the United States and internationally—with three Network Operations Centers. To learn more, visit CarouselIndustries.com.

Position Summary:
The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for leveraging large quantities data to assist executives, business partners, and operations teams to make data-driven decisions. This position will focus largely on sales operations data defining data relationships (inclusive of off-system spreadsheets), data mining and data modeling which will be the basis for actionable intelligence dashboards and reports. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will utilize their experience to explore data, applying statistical techniques, and designing sales dashboards and reports that provide value to the company and its operational leaders. This role will collaborate with all Business Systems Teams and business subject matter experts to deploy a robust reporting universe that is streamlined and transparent. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will report to the Vice President of Business Intelligence and join a highly agile cross-functional team that leads some of the most critical projects for the Business Intelligence department and Carousel Industries as an organization.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Commitment to the Sales Organization to develop and deliver analytical reports that support and enable actionable intelligence to achieve strategic and operational goals.
Provide descriptive data analysis, and creative problem-solving using SQL programming language
Lead projects regarding data exploration, relationship management and data-driven story telling
Ability to create practical, actionable plans that are coherent and understood by stakeholders
Partner with Business Systems teams, business leaders, and functional groups to provide actionable intelligence regarding operational effectiveness and revenue growth
Gather, manipulate, and explore large datasets to test hypotheses and extract useful insights
Create and manage reporting, data narratives, and analytics deliverables for the CI Governance board and committee
Build innovative data models, reports and dashboards
Troubleshoot data conflicts and inconsistencies through data mining and collaboration with the business teams
Evaluate and develop data monitoring reports to provide further insight into process and change management
Develop roadmaps with proposed solutions from an end-to-end perspective
Partner with clients to promote evidence-based decision-making and devise action plans that influence behavior changes
Investigate and create trend analysis models to promote operational effectiveness

Qualifications:
B.S. in a quantitative field required.
Prior experience and expertise with Salesforce strongly desired.
Experience in financial and/or sales driven data modeling is a plus.
Experience with Microsoft Power BI and SNOWFLAKE cloud data warehouse preferred.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Demonstrated advanced analytical, troubleshooting, and problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail and ability to deliver and support a quality service experience.
Demonstrated experience with industry report writers such as Einstein Analytics, Business Objects, Power BI, SSRS, Tableau or other BI reporting solutions.
Prior experience with CRM, ITSM and ERP reporting preferred.
Experience with writing/updating (SQL) queries.
Strong problem-solving skills.Superior verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to organize and prioritize concurrent projects.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively.
Create, maintain, and optimize reports, including SQL statements, views, functions, and stored procedures.
Effectively gather requirements and design new reports, troubleshoot, research, and correction of reports and database objects requiring review.
Accurately estimate effort for requested custom reports.",3.2,"Carousel Industries
3.2","Exeter, RI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
35,iFit Content Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1979, ICON Health & Fitness is the world’s largest fitness manufacturer. We are known for our best-in-class consumer fitness brands (NordicTrack, ProForm, FreeMotion, Weslo, Weider, and iFit) that are distributed through hundreds of the world’s best retailers.

We create the tools, technology, and equipment to help everyone from elite athletes focused on their next big day, to beginners getting ready for day one, to move more, move better and move forward.

At Icon Health and Fitness, we are proud to offer competitive compensation as well as the following benefits:
Paid Training
Competitive compensation package with growth based on performance
Full benefits package (Medical, Dental, Vision and Life insurance)
401(k) with company match
Paid time off
Discounts on Icon products
Discounts at local retail stores
The chance to test the fitness products we create in our state-of-the-art gym on location
Onsite massage therapist
Working in beautiful Cache Valley, Utah, with access to an exceptional outdoor lifestyle, a university campus nearby
Happy work-life balance
Collaborative work space and environment
A free beverage center and snack bar to keep you hydrated and fueled throughout the day
SUMMARY

Icon Health & Fitness is seeking a gifted individual who will serve as a trusted business advisor for a rapidly growing global fitness brand called iFit. This person’s focus will be to support decision-making by completing a variety of strategic and tactical data tasks and initiatives.

iFit produces world-class fitness content in video format, which is made available via streaming on high-end workout equipment with built-in tablets. The content is accessed on a subscription basis. Your purpose will be to support the production and development of this content by working with the Director of Content, SVP of Marketing, President of iFit, iFit Studio film producers, and other analysts at the company to provide insight into what content is being accessed, what subscribers want most, and what is contributing to business growth, user engagement, and subscriber retention.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Data gathering: get the data you need, on your own, whenever it is needed
Data mining: finding the “gems” of the data which may be overlooked in high-level reports
Data explaining: explain what you find out--potentially complex issues--in layman’s terms
What you’ll actually be doing:
Developing and maintaining business intelligence infrastructure and analytical framework for iFit
Work with backend database developers to develop new data sources which will provide insight to the business
Integrating primary and secondary data sources into an enterprise data warehouse
Acquiring data from sources to interpret and analyze results
Use statistical techniques to understand and interpret trends
Implement data analyses to optimize operational efficiency
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing data sources
Correcting data issues at the source if they are discovered
Locating and defining new process improvement opportunities
Maintain data integrity across multiple data sources
Manage recurring or automated reporting using BI tools
Complete analyses projects or inquiries on short time frames
Fulfill ad-hoc requests for data to stakeholders across the company
Being proactive about delving into data, with a goal to gain new insights into customer behavior, preferences, wants, dislikes, etc
Be willing to learn new skills to enhance the value of your analyst role
Using all means at your disposal to complete analysis projects
Sitting down with iFit stakeholders regularly to relay insights they need to have
If there is new data we need, you will be working with iFit software developers to find ways to collect what we need in new ways
Writing SQL day-in, day-out to get the data you need
Building automated reports using BI software (Tableau)
Providing ad-hoc data to requestors across the company
Identifying and resolving data issues as they are discovered
Other duties may be assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ideal Candidates will have:
Three to five years demonstrated experience with statistical analysis software/languages (SAS, R, Python)
Three to five years demonstrated experience in deep dive analytics with
The fitness industry, or
Analytical experience crafting strategies for new content with well known streaming companies (Netflix, Hulu, D+, Prime, etc.).
Required skills for this position:
Exposure to RDBMS (MS SQL Server, Amazon Redshift, Oracle, or others)
Proficiency in any SQL development software (SSMS, DBeaver, DBVisualizer, etc)
Working knowledge of SQL (3+ years)--SQL test to be administered
Intermediate to Advanced expertise in MS Excel or Google Sheets
Experience in BI tools (Power BI, Qlik, Tableau, MicroStrategy, Domo, etc)
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Master’s Degree in statistical discipline preferred.
Must have a B.A. or B.S. in related field or equivalent experience.
REASONING ABILITY

Must have great people skills. Able to handle stressful situations. Must have a positive attitude.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

As needed for position. May require a valid driver’s license.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Typical office environment

DISCLAIMER

Your employment at ICON is ""at will"". You and the company each have the right to terminate the employment relationship at any time for any cause or for no cause at all. Nothing but an express written contract signed by you and a Vice President of this Company can modify this ""employment at will"" arrangement.

""We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, ancestry, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.""",3.8,"Icon Health and Fitness
3.8","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
36,NLP and Machine Learning Research Scientist,$94k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu Research USA is actively seeking talents with a Machine Learning background to join our vibrant research team in our Silicon Valley office. Our research team has broad research interests among many different areas, such as natural language processing, speech synthesis and recognition, and computer vision. The candidate will have the opportunity to work with top researchers on various exciting research projects. The ideal candidate should have solid machine learning related knowledge and experience to work together with the teammates on the research, implementation, experimentation, and the analysis of algorithms. As a research scientist at Baidu, you will benefit greatly by working in our creative environment.

Requirements:
PhD degree in computer science, statistics, machine learning, or a related field.
At least 2 years of relevant industry or research experience.
Good knowledge of common machine learning models.
Expertise in one or more of natural language processing, computer vision, speech synthesis or recognition, optimization, generative models.
Strong publication record in top conferences or journals, e.g., ACL, EMNLP, NAACL NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR and so on.
Good presentation and communication skills.
A solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design.
Expert knowledge developing and debugging in python, C/C++ or CUDA is a plus.
Key Responsibilities:
Conduct scientific research to design, implement and evaluate novel machine learning algorithms
Collaborate with other researchers in developing machine learning algorithms
Prepare presentation and technical paper drafts to demonstrate research findings and experimental results.
Participate in software prototyping and experimental evaluation.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
37,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Language: English

Location: Memphis, TN

Travel: <10>

Buckman is a privately held, global specialty chemical company with headquarters in Memphis, TN, USA, committed to safeguarding the environment, maintaining safety in the workplace, and promoting sustainable development. Buckman delivers exceptional service and innovative solutions to our customers globally in the pulp and paper, leather, and water treatment sectors to help boost productivity, reduce risk, improve product quality, and provide a measurable return on investment. Buckman is in the middle of a digital transformation of its businesses and focused on building the capabilities and tools in support of this.

Position Summary
Buckman is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to lead the development of a Data Science program at our Memphis facility. You will work closely with Buckman stakeholders to derive deep industry knowledge across paper, water, leather, and performance chemical industries. You will help develop a data strategy for the company including collection of the right data, creation of the data science project portfolio, partnering with external providers, and augmenting capabilities with additional internal hires. A large part of the job is communicating and developing relationship with key stakeholders and subject matter experts to tee up proofs of concept projects to demonstrate how data science can be used to solve old problems in unique and novel ways. You will not have a large internal team to rely on, at least initially, so individual expertise, breadth of data science knowledge, and ability to partner with external companies will be essential for success. In addition to the pure data science problems, you will be working closely with a multi-disciplinary team consisting of sensor scientists, software engineers, network engineers, mechanical/electrical engineers, and chemical engineers in the development, and deployment of IoT solutions. If you like working for an entrepreneurial company with a Sustainability mission and digital ambitions at the core of its strategy, Buckman is the place for you.

Competencies Needed for Success
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
5+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and visualization
Expertise in one or more programming languages R, Python, MATLAB, JMP, Minitab, Java, C++, Scala
Key libraries such as Sklearn, XgBoost, GLMNet, Dplyr, ggplot, Rshiny
Experience and knowledge of data mining algorithms including supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques areas such as Gradient Boosting, Decision Trees, Multivariate Regressions, Logistic regressions, Neural Network, Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Naive Bayes, Time Series, Optimization
Microsoft IoT/data science toolkit: Azure Machine Learning, Datalake, Datalake analytics, Workbench, IoT Hub, Stream Analytics, CosmosDB, Time Series Insights, PowerBI
Data querying languages (e.g. SQL, Hadoop/Hive) and Preferred Qualifications
A demonstrated record of success with a verifiable portfolio of problems tackled
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s or PhD degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
Experience in the specialty chemicals sector or similar industry
Background in engineering, especially Chemical Engineering
Experience starting up a data science program
Experience working with global stakeholders
Experience working in a start-up environment, preferably in an IoT company
Knowledge in quantitative modeling tools and statistical analysis",3.6,"Buckman
3.6","Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1945,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
38,Software Engineer - Data Visualization,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels who are experienced with data visualization, interactive data-driven visualizations, and user interface design. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for the design and development of data visualization software, techniques, and algorithms.
The candidate should have experience creating and building custom, re-usable data visualizations based on statistical and mathematical modeling and data analysis to be used to solve a variety of problems related to data reporting. Seeking engineers with the ability to overcome information overload, are familiar with accessibility compliance, information design, and human factors and usability design.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop, and deploy analytic software solutions
Self-motivated with a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Designing, developing, and deploying data visualizations, interactive dashboards, and user interface solutions
Applying knowledge of technical computing platforms, tools, and techniques to analyze information and data requirements obtained from data scientists, analysts, and other business stakeholders
Planning and proposing solutions for the optimization of data integration strategies, intuitive designs, and enterprise interactive dashboards
Formulating simulation models of operational problems and proposed solutions related to integrating and analyzing using dynamic data visualizations that incorporate intuitive interfaces, infographics, interactive drill-downs, movements
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams on the use of data visualizations developed
Collecting feedback to make continuous improvements to new and existing data visualizations
Contributing to guidelines and design conventions and standards for modeling and data visualizations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design, development, and deployment of software systems
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Front-end application frameworks such as Vue, React, Angular
HTML/CSS frameworks such as Bootstrap, Zurb, Material
Experience developing client-side applications using JavaScript
JavaScript libraries such as Bootstrap, jQuery, Leaflet, D3.js
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Comfortable meeting with customers and peers to explore change requests, bugs and new ideas
Customer technical support experience
Documentation experience, to include up-front design documentation


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
39,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Senior Data Analyst*
ABOUT US*
For more than 20 years, WINFertility has been managing family-building benefits that are delivered with care and support by the highest quality providers. WIN is the largest, most experienced fertility benefit management company in the country. It offers inclusive family-building solutions to employers, health plans and individual patients. From integrated fertility management, including medical treatment, pharmacy and reproductive genetics, to surrogacy and adoption, WIN’s mission is to help build families by providing access to the best network doctors, technology and emotional support at the lowest cost.

WIN’s managed fertility programs include an integrated medical and pharmaceutical model that is unique to the industry. Its dedicated nurse care managers, all with experience in reproductive endocrinology clinics, guide employees through every step of their fertility journey, and are available 24/7.
POSITION SUMMARY*
This analytical position will develop data solutions to assist in the advancement of initiatives needed to support our business growth and operations across key customer segments. It includes the creation of analytical solutions used to manage operational programs and mentoring other data analytics resources on how to best provide value to the organization. The position will require building dashboards and visualizations through BI software to support business analytics and reporting.

The position will also serve as a proactive change agent within the business by understanding the long-term functions of the Data and Analytics Team and developing systems, databases, and other critical analytic tools needed to support the growing and complex nature of customer relationships.

The position is responsible for working closely with various internal teams to understand, define, and produce program related reports and analysis. Responsibilities include interpreting data, creating ad hoc reports, modifying and updating standard reports when applicable, perform statistical analysis, analyze data to forecast trends and conduct predictability outcomes. They will also participate in operations meetings, strategy sessions, and business reviews. He/she must possess knowledge and experience necessary to offer recommendations and propose solutions for complex business problems and/or systems enhancements.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES*
Responsible for creating business value for company by understanding data environment, designing data strategies, performing extract, transform, and load activities, and operationalizing models. Work closely with the team members and business partners to interpret the data and develop implement solutions that create visibility for internal management and operations across all customer programs. This position will require collaboration across the business to develop and implement data-driven solutions.
Support the development of customer-level metrics needed to manage operations with Clients. Manage the compilation, analysis, and reporting of data to forecast trends, apply various analytical techniques to support operational efficiency and productivity.
5+ years RDBMS experience (MySQL, PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, etc.); must have the ability to write complex, optimized queries across large volumes of data
5+ years of experience analyzing and manipulating data from a variety of production systems and data platforms required
Experience in query tuning and database engine optimization
Knowledge of ETL and data warehouse concepts and processes
Demonstrated ability to identify data quality issues and recommend the best course of action to address them
Experience translating data extractions and analyses into formats and outputs that other departments and clients can understand
Experience in Data Visualization tools like (e.g. Tableau, Business Objects, Cognos, Power BI, etc…) or other related tools
Problem solver with high attention to detail and superior organization and documentation skills
Design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and requests utilizing Business Objects, and other data visualization tools.
Document and understand project requirements, reporting data mapping and data warehouse repositories for assigned programs.
Complete full documentation of reports developed utilizing Business Requirement Documents
Receive and respond to data requests to ensure projects in queue are accurately prioritized, designed, estimated and delivered to all shareholders
Ensure reports are scheduled, audited and delivered according to agreed upon expectations and established Service Level Agreements (SLAs).
Develop and execute acceptance test plans (UAT) to ensure data warehouse structures, universes, and associated data accurately meet business requirements.
Other responsibilities and projects, as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Minimum Requirements*
5+ years of healthcare data management experience or 2+ years of advanced healthcare analytics experience
Critical Skills*
3+ years' experience in analytics or data related fields.
Strong knowledge of SQL and statistical packages (SAS, SPSS, STATA etc.).
Ability to design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and delivered according to client expectations and established SLAs.
Knowledge of healthcare industry with the ability to review all program data, perform analysis, notice trends, research and suggest solutions.
Significant data mining, analysis, and reporting experience, and demonstrated experience with IT and/or operations project management.
Experience in predictive modeling and machine learning.
Ability to lead and conduct customer meetings and understand business needs.
Advanced Microsoft Office experience (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, MS Project), Visio, SharePoint, and Business Objects.
Additional Knowledge & Skills*
Healthcare reporting experience, highly desired
Excellent written and verbal communication, and presentation skills
Exercise excellent judgment within defined standards and guidelines to manage conflict resolution and/or ambiguous situations
Experience developing partnerships with the technical, business, teams, and Clients utilizing strong communication and team building skills
Track record of strategic thinking and independent problem solving
Attention to detail and a high level of understanding of how to produce accurate and meaningful metrics to deliver high quality, actionable, efficient, and interactive reporting and insights to drive business and financial KPIs.
EDUCATION*
BA or BS degree or equivalent experience required.
WIN BENEFITS AND PERKS*
WIN *offers our employees competitive and comprehensive benefits to include but not limited to:
Paid vacation, sick and holiday time
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life Insurance (company paid and supplemental)
Disability Insurance
Health Savings Account (HSA) with a per month company contribution
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Transit Account
401k plus company match
Pet Insurance
WIN Perks and Plum Benefits*
Employee Assistance Program
Free access to Fitness Center at our main office location
Free indoor parking at our main office location
Transit Account
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL and Statistical Packages: 3 years (Required)
Design, create and implement Reports: 3 years (Required)
Healthcare Data Management: 5 years (Required)
Advanced Healthcare Analytics: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Greenwich, CT (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"WINFertility
3.3","Greenwich, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
40,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,$49k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

+ Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
41,Senior Data Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Analyst*
Responsibilities will focus on providing detailed financial and operational reporting as well as enhancing, creating and analysis of key performance indications via push reporting form a data warehouse.

DUTIES
Maintain the data warehouse, the data warehouse infrastructure, ETL pipelines from enterprise systems to the data warehouse, and the integrity of the data therein.
Hands-on experience working with MS SQL Server (MySQL, Hive and SSIS are a plus)
Building SQL reports and dashboards that interpret data to expose patterns and trends.
Automating the collection of data from available sources while identifying new opportunities for automation.
Assist in developing and tracking relevant business metrics that help drive business success, as well as the periodic communications of those metrics to key stakeholders.
Help with in-depth periodic analysis of business metrics and variance analysis.
Ensure all data warehouse reporting reconciles to existing management systems.
Aid in the preparation and development of detailed budgets and forecasts, including P&L, cash flow, and balance sheet projections on a monthly, quarterly and annual basis.
Complete ad hoc analysis as needed.
Provide input to the management team as needed.
QUALIFICATIONS
Degree in accounting, finance or quantitative discipline preferred.
Minimum of 3 years’ experience in FP&A, Business Analytics or Corporate Strategy
STARTING SALARY RANGE: $75,000

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Analytics, Strategy or FP&A: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.hmespecialists.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"HME SPECIALISTS, LLC
3.2","Albuquerque, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
42,Senior Data Analytics/Scientist,$73k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Senior Data Analytics/Scientist to support the Chief Human Capital Office (CHCO) for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

Primary Responsibilities

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insights and trends in human capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance HCA across the IC. Centralize IC CHCO data collection and synthesis, including survey data, enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data-driven problem-solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operation questions; and incorporate insights and findings into a range of products.

Create detailed write-ups of processes used, logic applied, and methodologies used for creation, validation, analysis, and visualizations. Write- ups shall occur initially, within a week of when process is created, and updated in writing when changes occur.

Adapt freeware solutions such as R, and modular solutions for maximum flexibility. Provide an advanced capability for data analysis of human capital information from disparate data types, promoting visualization and storytelling to discover insights that help guide business decisions. Be forward leaning, exploring HCA solutions that benefit IC elements individually and collectively. Let the data tell the story including what is inconsistent or contradictory, and automate data cleansing as much as possible. Integrate data solutions and collection with IC Information Technology Enterprise to enhance connectivity with IC Elements.

Identify and customize, if necessary, Commercial Off The Shelf (COTS) Information Technology (IT) tools for administration and data collection, or to leverage, support, and integrate the process with tools built for the IC and/or its component elements. Any tools developed shall be web-based and web-enabled, designed to maximize feedback effectiveness while protecting employee assessment information, and include both structured interview and web-based tools for gathering feedback.

Assist in the development and maintenance of financial procedural guidance, templates and data formats, for identifying IC-wide workforce numbers, to include government, military, and contractor support. Review, assess data, identify data deficiencies and recommend solutions for remediation. Support quantitative and analytic efforts for workforce planning, development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to the Congressional Budget Justification Book (CBJB) planning displays, and analytic support for budget management and planning. Assist with ad hoc data requests from Congress, IC elements or as required by IC CHCO.

Coordinate and facilitate community of practice and working group meetings, to include meeting logistics, agenda development and presenter coordination, day-of execution and facilitation, documentation and distribution of meeting minutes and presentations. Present or coordinate presentations on relevant topics as directed by IC CHCO.

Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.

Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).

Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.

Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative- tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.

Preferred Experience:

C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.

Demonstrated expertise in supporting quantitative and analytical efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.

Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.

Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.

Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on-line and automated survey instruments.

Years of Experience: 7 years of relevant experience in a related field (computer science, mathematics, statistics, etc.).

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance/ SCI Eligibility with a CI Polygraph. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc.
4.5","Bethesda, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
43,Nurse Scientist,$24-$39 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Baptist Health South Florida is once again one of the 2020 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For! This is the 20th time Baptist Health has been recognized on the list. We have also been recognized for being among the best healthcare providers in the nation by U.S. News & World Reports in its 2020-2021 Best Hospitals and have been honored as one of PEOPLE's 2020 50 Companies that Care by PEOPLE magazine and Great Place to Work.

Baptist Health South Florida is the region's largest not-for-profit healthcare organization with more than 23,000 employees working across 11 hospital campuses and more than 100 outpatient facilities throughout Miami-Dade, Monroe, Broward, and Palm Beach counties. In 2016 we welcomed the newest weapon in the fight against cancer, the world-class Miami Cancer Institute and proton therapy center.

Everything we do at Baptist Health, we do to the best of our ability. That includes supporting our team with extensive training programs, millions of dollars in tuition assistance, comprehensive benefits and more. Working within our award-winning culture means getting the respect and support you need to do your best work ever. Find out why this is the best place to be your best!

Description:

The Nurse Scientist is a doctorally prepared nurse that directs the development and coordination of the clinical research program at assigned entity. The Nurse Scientist enhances translation of evidence to practice for quality patient care and contributes to the professional development of staff. This individual provides guidance for the development of nursing and inter-professional research studies. This individual will be accountable for overseeing execution of research deliverables and will lead the research team to achieve research goals and objectives.
Qualifications:

Licenses & Certifications: CITI, FL Registered Nurse

Additional Qualifications: Master’s degree in Nursing – MSN, required. Willing to enter into an accredited Nursing PhD program within 2 years of hire, PhD preferred. Minimum of three years experience in academic or clinical research. Strong, broad clinical background. Effective relationship management skills and ability to build successful collaborations across programs and multidisciplinary teams. Strong communication skills (including scientific and technical) - verbal, written and presentation, Strong knowledge of research regulations and Institutional Review Boards, Proficient in computer programs (Microsoft Office, statistical packages, qualitative data management). Excellent analytical skills. Must be extremely flexible with ability to multitask effectively. Must be willing/able to travel domestically and internationally. Minimum Required Experience: 3 years

Join our Talent Community and stay up-to-date on our career opportunities. We’ll send you alerts of new jobs matching your interests as well as exciting news and events happening at Baptist Health South Florida.

EOE",3.9,"Baptist Health South Florida
3.9","Miami, FL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1960,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
44,Data Science Intern,-1,"The Opportunity


We are seeking a talented Data Science Intern to assist with strategic projects as related to data science, reporting, and other related data initiatives. The Data Science Intern will closely partner with business and operation teams. The Data Science Internship will be a part of our Summer 2021 program that will run mid-May through early August.

What You Can Look Forward to
Collaborate with operation and business units.
Follow industry standards and advances on data driven technologies and tools.
Create enterprise level end-to-end data flow diagrams and logical data models.
Develop ML code using Python and learn data visualization using Tableau.
Actively supports our CO-OP culture and embraces our core values of Work as Partners, Communicate Openly and Honestly, Demonstrate Excellence and Champion Change in all interactions.
What You’ll Need to Succeed
12 completed semester hours at college or university or related experience. Computer Science degree preferred.
3.0 Cumulative GPA.
Previous internship and/or work experience preferred.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Excellent communication skills and ability to translate the complex to simple and easier terms for business leaders and users of data.
Must be detail focused.
Python knowledge is a plus.
Why Join CO-OP?


CO-OP is committed to fostering a workplace where every employee feels valued, respected, and connected. We are dedicated to understanding, attracting and engaging a diverse workforce where every employee can live up to their value; ensuring that our employee base reflects the consumers we serve. The result of this effort is an inclusive environment where diverse talent thrives. You will be part of an organization that focuses on a strong culture and embodies the credit union movement philosophy of People Helping People. CO-OP’s commitment to reflecting our own core values and purpose extends beyond how we serve our clients and the products that we deliver.

With more than 35 years of industry leadership, CO-OP Financial Services is the largest, most comprehensive credit union service organization in the nation. CO-OP serves as THE credit union technology engine, bringing payments solutions, engagement services and strategic counsel to help credit unions optimize member experiences to consistently provide seamless, personalized multi-channel offerings, while delivering secure, sophisticated fraud mitigation service.

CO-OP serves more than 3,000 client credit unions, with 60 million debit and credit cardholders, nearly 30,000 surcharge-free ATMs and more than 5,600 shared branches nationwide. Our vast technological ecosystem facilitates more than 6.5 billion transactions every year and equips credit unions of all sizes to deepen member engagement and prosper in the fast-paced world of fintech.

The Perks
Fun, challenging and, collaborative work environment with passionate colleagues that care deeply about the intersection of technology and human-centered financial services.
Paid internship.
The opportunity to join a nationwide, fast-growing organization.
Gain real world experience working on projects alongside full-time employees as well as other interns.
Learn about the financial technology industry and how your work will impact credit union members across the country.
Connect with other interns through learning opportunities and other fun events.
Explore your interests and potential career path with job shadow options.",3.1,"CO-OP Financial Services
3.1","Alpharetta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
45,Mid-Level Data Scientist,-1,Job Description BTS is seeking a Mid Level Data Scientist to support NORTHCOM J2 in Colorado Springs CO Conducts data analytics data engineering data mining exploratory analysis predictive analysis and statistical analysis and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical written visual and verbal narrative products enabling more informed analytic decisions Proactively retrieves information from various sources analyzes it for better understanding about the data set and builds AI tools that automate certain processes Duties typically include creating various ML based tools or processes such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems Performs statistical analysis applies data mining techniques and builds high quality prediction systems Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications including Microsoft Office Power BI and Tableau; major data science languages such as R and Python; managing and merging of disparate data sources preferably through R Python or SQL; statistical analysis; and data mining algorithms Should have prior experience with large data Multi INT analytics ML and automated predictive analytics Requisite Skill Requirements Bachelor degree with 4 6 years of relevant subject matter experience or specialized training & 4 8 years subject matter experience or equivalent intelligenceacademic experience Senior level contractor personnel work independently with moderate Government oversight provide comprehensive and completed products that may require multiple Senior Intelligence AnalystOfficer SIASIO minor revisions andor editing and develop and manage plan of actions and milestones Additional duties as directed Demonstrates comprehensive mission knowledge and skills that affirms completion of all developmental training and experiences for the labor categoryDemonstrates ability to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete indirect highly complex seemingly unrelated and or technically advanced Demonstrates ability to structure analysis based on trends in reporting and a range of analytic perspectives from other analysts organizations and intelligence disciplinesDemonstrates ability to work independently with minimal oversight and directionDemonstrates ability to collaborate and work with other IC members on information sharing driving collection and addressing analytic disputes and conflict resolutionDemonstrates ability to develop concise insightful and comprehensive products for defense intelligenceDemonstrates ability to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems Provides guidance in selecting designing and applying analytic methodologies Uses argument evaluation and validated analytic methodologies to challenge differing perspectivesDesired Experience At least 8 years of experience conducting analysis relevant to the specific labor category with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 yearsDesired Education Bachelors degree in an area related to the labor category from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the US Department of EducationCompany Overview BTS Software Solutions is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business who are community focused innovators who transform ideas into technology to serve people We recognize that innovation is only valuable when applied towards a needed solution Technology has no value without the hard work to turn ideas into reality Our roots are in helping save Soldiers lives through technology We bring that ethos to serving our community We create solutions that touch peoples lives products to communicate to connect companies with customers to stay informed to save lives and to enhance lives We have a small company persona with a large company ethos and capabilities; we create elegant solutions for complex problems that will enrich peoples lives We offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry Competitive health benefits package PTO 401K matching and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks BTS Software Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer EOE All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age race creed color religion sex national origin ancestry disability status veteran status sexual orientation gender identity or expression genetic information marital status citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal state or local law,4.9,"BTS Software Solutions
4.9",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
46,Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Canal Insurance

Canal Insurance Company specializes in insurance for commercial trucking and specialty transportation operations. Canal was founded in 1939 and is located in Greenville, South Carolina. At Canal, we recognize that our success would not be possible without the hard work and dedication of our employees. We know that happiness and productivity go hand in hand, and to that end, we consciously cultivate a culture that enables us to recruit and retain the very best talent in the business.

BI Analyst

***Must be willing to relocate***

Job Summary: The BI Analyst role is responsible for the continuous delivery of analytic solutions and data quality. Working cross-functionally, the BI Analyst will democratize data, support BI quality efforts, and maintain frontend BI solutions systems in a data warehouse environment.

Major Accountabilities:
Work independently with users to define BI concepts, information needs and defining functional requirements, specifications and recommendations related BI solutions.
Lead BI request triage process, maintain Features in Azure DevOps, and organize iteration planning sessions.
Monitor and administer automated ETL jobs to verify execution; Build reports to audit, monitor& validate BI jobs.
Decipher existing reports and database processes to assist users and data stewards in understanding BI solutions.
Support quality assurance testing throughout the agile development cycle.
Interacts with internal team members to assure that the requirements are clearly communicated and documented.
Assist with the review, consolidation and reduction of data discrepancies.
Design, build, enhance, and maintain BI solutions, including dashboards, scorecards, and reports, using IBM Cognos Analytics and other Microsoft BI products.
Migrate and refactor legacy reporting to current BI environment.
Train users in the operations and scheduling of reports.
Perform other duties as assigned by management.
Qualifications:

Education/Training Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent work experience required.

Experience/Specialized Skills: Minimum of three years’ experience in Business Intelligence and reporting field required. High-level proficiency required in analyzing user requirements, and building front-end BI applications according to specifications. Strong organizational skills required. High-level proficiency in working with semantic layers, star schemas and dimensional data modeling. High-level proficiency required in master data management, data profiling, automated testing, process automation, and data quality subjects. Intermediate to high-proficiency level proficiency required in T-SQL for SQL Server (2016, 2017), Reporting Services (SSRS), SQL Server Analysis Services (SSAS), Microsoft Excel. Intermediate to high-proficiency desired in IBM Cognos Analytics (V11), Report Studio, Framework Manager, Cognos architecture and development best practices.

Special Considerations:

Physical Requirements: Constant use of vision, hearing, and communication (oral and written). Frequent standing, walking, handling, reaching, grasping, and periods of prolonged concentration. Frequent bending, kneeling and lifting (up to 50 lbs.) Frequent use of computer and office equipment.

Travel/Hours of Service: Occasional travel may be required. Periodic work outside of standard business hours or on weekends may be required.",3.8,"Canal Insurance
3.8","Greenville, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1939,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
47,Senior Data Scientist,$89k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Data Scientist independently develops statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing and underwriting of risk. He/she is responsible for the formulation of statistical models and direct application of models to address insurance business issues. You will start your Senior Data Scientist role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Produces complex predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk and profitability.
Develops studies that evaluate new business models for customer retention and growth initiatives as well as estimate the lifetime value of customer segments.
Identifies drivers of insurance costs, understanding the economics of customers’ behavior and estimating the expected losses for segments of risks using advanced statistical and analytical techniques on large data sets.
Develop or participate in the development of the overall analytical framework to support the company’s strategy for growth
Communicates analysis, strategy and recommendations to diverse audiences, including technical and non-technical.
Collaborates with upper management to assess the potential effects of proposed solutions and incorporates these considerations into recommendations.
Manages projects of high complexity.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
Advanced skills and training in predictive modeling, data mining and other quantitative and research analytics (Non-Linear Regression Analysis, Multivariate Analysis, Bayesian Methods, Generalized Linear Models, Decision Trees, Non Parametric estimations, etc.).
Ability to apply various predictive modeling techniques to develop solutions to various real-world problems.
Hands-on experience developing and delivering structured, methodology projects.
Exceptional programming ability in SAS, SQL, R or other programming languages.
Excellent written and oral communication and presentation skills.
In-depth understanding of database principles and experience working with large databases.
Ability to influence and guide across departmental boundaries.
Qualifications and Education
3 or more years of experience developing and implementing multivariate predictive models using GLM and other statistical methods. PhD in economics, statistics, or related field required.
Or in the alternative, a Master’s degree in Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field (foreign educational equivalent accepted) and five (5) years of experience as indicated above.
High level of organizational and project management experience handling multiple projects simultaneously
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
48,Data Scientist,$80k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
49,"Senior Data Analyst, Project Controls",$66k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under the direction of the Senior Manager of Project Controls, the Senior Data Analyst will develop reporting, analyze, evaluate and forecast project controls data. The analyst will also collaborate across San Manuel Band of Mission Indians (SMBMI) & San Manuel Casino (SMC) business operations to gather requirements for report development and/or in depth analysis. Will share activities with project controls team and grow the Project Controls department analytics/BI and process initiatives. The Senior Data Analyst will be required to use independent judgment, provide report and recommendations to Project Controls leadership team.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

1. Responsible for project financial planning and forecasting, report development and automation with visualizations software.

2. Develop automated reporting and adhoc reporting for Project Controls team and leadership as needed (SAS Enterprise Guide).

3. Meets with Project Controls team as necessary to provide information and address departmental issues, such as system interruptions or critical data integrity issues.

4. Define and gather information from Financial system of record as needed to enhance the Project Controls Data Structures.

5. Perform duties such as: validating, financial capital planning, cash flow analytics, break even analysis, creating KPIs, and tracking methodologies.

6. Provide guidance and lead information gathering sessions with Project Managers in adherence to approved project controls policy and procedures.

7. Work closely with Project Managers, Procurement Managers, Financial Analysts, Legal, Finance/Accounting, and Data Services to ensure timely approvals.

8. Perform other duties as assigned to support the efficient operation of the department.

Education/Experience/Qualifications
Bachelors degree in finance, accounting, auditing, or related field required.
Minimum of five (5) years of analytical experience is required.
Demonstrated experience working with relational databases and enterprise reporting tools required.
Experience with software programs Tableau and Lawson is preferred.
Equivalent combination of education and progressive, relevant and direct experience may be considered in lieu of minimum educational/experience requirements indicated above.
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, and Access is required.
Employee must have experience demonstrating the utmost discretion and confidentiality.
Certificates/Licenses/Registrations
At the discretion of the San Manuel Tribal Gaming Commission you may be required to obtain and maintain a gaming license.
A qualified candidate/employee must have a valid drivers license with an acceptable driving record as determined by the companys insurance carrier.
San Manuel Band of Mission Indians and San Manuel Casino will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990

As one of the largest private employers in the Inland Empire, San Manuel deeply cares about the future, growth and well-being of its employees. Join our team today!",3.3,"San Manuel Band of Mission Indians
3.3","Highland, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
50,"Advertising Data Analyst, Business Intelligence",$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Curious about what it's like to work at the world's number 1 discovery platform as a Data Analyst? We're glad you asked!

What is the key purpose of an Advertising Data Analyst, Business Intelligence?

As an Advertising Data Analyst on our Business Intelligence Team in our New York Office, you will work closely with our Media Sales and Account Management teams to create data driven solutions, extract and visualize actionable insights from large volumes of data and analyze our clients' performance to ensure they are hitting/exceeding their KPIs. You're a strong communicator, who thrives in a fast-paced environment and can expertly manage multiple projects at a time.

What skills and qualifications do I need?

For this role, it is essential that you have:
4+ years of experience as a Data Analyst / BI position in a data-rich environment
Deep knowledge and proven work experience in the adtech, advertising, or media space
Experience working with SQL (plus the aptitude and willingness to master it), & BI tools (Qlik Sense, Tableau, Looker, etc.)
BA/BS or higher. Major in industrial engineering, finance, statistics, quantitative economics or another degree emphasizing data analysis preferred
Coding/Scripting experience (Python \ R) – a plus
Exceptional ability to understand data and to transform it into insights
What will I be doing on a day to day basis?

As a fast-moving technology company, no 2 days will ever be the same at Taboola. As an Advertising Data Analyst, you will:
Analyze business data and generate actionable recommendations (discover root causes for performance and data anomalies, cost-benefit analysis, impact analysis, etc)
Devise new approaches of data analytics while dealing with issues never dealt with before
Own and manage multiple data initiatives and projects on an on-going and an ad-hoc basis
Develop and automate reports, iteratively build and prototype dashboards to provide insights at scale, solving for business priorities
Collaborate with cross-functional stakeholders to formulate and complete full cycle analysis that includes data gathering, analysis, ongoing scaled deliverables and presentations
Deliver effective presentations of findings and recommendations to multiple levels of stakeholders, creating visual displays of quantitative information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases
Why Tabooola?
If you ask our employees what they love about Taboola they will tell you that here they are able to discover their best professional self, explore where they can grow to, and learn from and together with smart and talented people
We work with some of the biggest names in the business. Our clients include Business Insider, Bloomberg, NBC, and Wells Fargo, just to name a few
Taboola NYC offers generous health, medical and dental coverage, 401k matching, a fully-stocked kitchen, and various gym partnerships
Sounds good, how do I apply?

It's easy, submit your CV by clicking the ""Apply"" button below.

Taboola is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity in all forms. We are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees and believe such an environment is critical for success. Employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.

#LI-EL1",3.6,"Taboola
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
51,Senior Data Engineer Delivery,$76k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

/

Collaborates within the business and operations units of the Corporation to design, develop, test, deliver and maintain data engineering solutions that support the Corporation's business. Engage in the entire database development process, from inception through delivery. Participate in the design and implementation of database development standards and procedures. Mentor and guide fellow data engineers.

/

/
Open to remote work location within Fulton Bank's 5 state footprint of PA, NJ, MD, DE, VA*
/

Responsibilities:

/
/
Design, develop, test and implement database solutions related to optimal data pipeline architecture and infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL, SSIS, Oracle and Big Data technologies, in accordance with established standards. Develop and implement controls to ensure data integrity and regulatory compliance. Participate in peer reviews of solution designs and related code. Package and support deployment of releases. Work with business requestors, BAs and Business Relationship Manager to refine the business requirements and ensure that sufficient detail is provided to guide design, development and testing.
/
Drive innovation within the group in areas including development efficiencies, database component development and integration, database management and administration, and leading edge industry concepts and developments. Contribute to and implement standards and changes to database administration and development processes. Contribute to the development and implementation of key performance indicators and service level agreements that serve to maximize our value to the business.
/
Responsible for maintaining the integrity and performance of company databases and guarantee that data is stored securely and optimally. Monitor the production schedule and provide support to remediate job failures. Leverage technology to automate routine processes. Monitor key performance indicators and recovery time objectives to meet service level agreements and maximize value to the business. Provide production support to business users. Monitor and tune databases for which we are responsible and direct the work of vendors where they are responsible for the Database Administrator function. Support enterprise wide compliance with enterprise standards, processes and policies.
/

Qualifications:

/
Education:
/
/
Bachelor Degree or the equivalent experience. Specialty: Computer Science, Computer Information Science. (Required)
/
/
Experience:
/
/
5 or more years Database Administrator, Database developer, Data Engineer. (Required)
/

PI124519108",3.1,"Fulton Bank
3.1","East Petersburg, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
52,Scientist,-1,"Responsibilities of the Scientist:

Will work with mouse models and perform molecular biology techniques.
Directs and implements sub-projects within overall project.
Manages team of junior technicians to achieve project goals.
Plans, schedules, and coordinates detailed phases of projects.
Collects, analyzes, and interprets data.
Identifies and resolves technological and methodical problems, troubleshooting when necessary.
Performs experiments to further project goals.
Summarizes data, presenting data weekly at lab meeting.

Requirements of the Scientist:

PhD in Biology, Molecular Biology, or related area.
Must have experience with immunology and mouse models.
Superior ability to make independent judgments of experimental priorities.",4.8,"Commonwealth Sciences
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
53,Business Analytics Consultant (Bilingual: English & Spanish),$47k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"This role will work closely with the General Manager of the Andean and Southern Cone region and report to the Director of Latin America Commercial Operations.

Responsibilities

Essential Duties and Job Functions:

Gathers and analyzes internal and external information on sales trends, patient reach, market share, competitor data and pricing for all relevant therapeutic areas. Makes business recommendations based on these analyses.
Conducts market assessments, research and surveys to prepare sales forecasts.
Manages business analytics process for the L9 (Andean and Southern Cone) region. Prepares regular sales reports, dashboards, and scorecards.
Sales force effectiveness reporting and analytics
Keeps ups with new analytics capabilities and sources of information. Recommends and implements improvements to reporting tools, models, and systems; identifies and manages external data sources and vendors.
Prepares business cases and presentations for senior management.
Manages projects locally and as a part of the global team to implement best practices adopted in other parts of the company or used by the industry.
Qualifications

Knowledge, Experience and Skills:

Demonstrates strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Must be able to think critically and be comfortable making assumptions when data or information is incomplete or conflicting.
Excellent project management skills, highly focused on implementation and achievement of tangible results.
Able to make high-impact presentations in small and large settings and deliver clear proposals to senior management.
Knowledge of data visualization tools and databases
Be curious and eager to learn proactively about various therapeutic areas, epidemiology, and stay up to date on country’s economic and healthcare trends.
Strong team player with experience working in international settings. Demonstrates cultural agility and adaptability in a changing environment.
Creative and open-minded individual who fosters an environment in which sharing of ideas is encouraged.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a business, finance, economics or related field.
Familiarity with the Latin America region, specifically Andean and Southern Cone.
Experience in a pharmaceutical environment preferred.
Fluency in Spanish and English language proficiency is required.

To qualify, applicants must be legally authorized to work in the United States, and should not require, now or in the future, sponsorship for employment visa status.

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Miami, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
54,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$68k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
55,Data Analyst - Online Education,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"THIS IS NOT A REMOTE POSITION


THIS POSITION WILL BE BASED OUT OF THE

TUCSON CORPORATE OFFICE

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Utilize advanced statistical abilities and tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that could be valuable for diagnostic and predictive efforts.
Prepare reports and visualizations that effectively communicate trends, patterns, and predictions.
Assist with preparing, collecting, and analyzing quantitative (surveys, etc.) and qualitative (focus groups, etc.) data from students, faculty and staff.
Partner with stakeholders to gain a thorough understanding of needs.
Mine data from primary and secondary sources and reorganizes into a format that can be easily read by human or machine.
Work closely with IT in establishing data systems protocols for data needs.
Coach team members on how to use tools to their greatest benefit.
The list of essential functions is not exhaustive and may be supplemented.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s Degree or higher, preferably in a computational field such as computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering.
Three (3) years of experience working with large data sets or relational databases.
Three (3) years of experience with forecasting, trend analysis, and predictive modeling.
Demonstrated experience using SQL, Excel, R or Python, and visualization platforms such as Tableau or Power BI.
Experience working in higher education preferred.
Take initiative and ownership of projects.
Problem solving and analytical skills.
Business acumen.
Time management skills and able to prioritize and deliver projects and deliverables on time.
Comfortable working in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment.
Collaborative and team focused.",4.6,"Pima Medical Institute
4.6","Tucson, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1972,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
56,Senior Scientific Data Analyst (CDC COVID-19 Response Support),$67k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is hiring Senior Scientific Data Analysts to provide support to the Epidemiology Task Force: Ongoing COVID-19 Response Support. Due to the recent events caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the CDC Epidemiology Task Force is responsible for identifying and tracking COVID-19 cases, spread and containment. The COVID-19 Epidemiology Task Force Response is critical to accomplishing the CDC’s mission and goals during the COVID-19 pandemic. This position will give support across several teams within the task force.

A scientific data analyst has the necessary education and work experiences to effectively provide data analysis, data management, and data visualization support to the task force. These roles are supporting enhanced COVID-19 surveillance efforts and epidemiological studies. Successful candidates will be at an intermediate to advanced coding level in SAS or R (both is preferred).

RESPONSIBILITIES (vary with years of relevant experience and education):

Monitor data submissions from research study partners
Provide data cleaning and management support for research studies and surveillance platforms
Ensure the security and confidentiality of analytical data files and provide data file documentation describing the scientific data source.
Manage epidemiological and laboratory data by using SAS or equivalent statistical package (e.g. R)
Familiarity with data management software packages (e.g. R, REDCap, Microsoft Access, Excel, EpiInfo, STATA, etc.)
Conduct analyses including frequencies, longitudinal data analysis, and univariate and multivariate modeling techniques (linear regression, logistic regression, generalized linear models, and survival analysis)
Perform data quality assurance activities, including identifying and resolving any inconsistencies in data flow, data outside legitimate ranges, and illogical data responses
Manage data stored in a variety of file formats such as SAS datasets, Microsoft Access, Microsoft Excel, SQL, and ASCII files
Manipulate and transform data that are stored in a variety of file formats
Explore the use of data visualization platforms (e.g. R, Power BI, mapping software) to quickly summarize study findings
Support data visualization activities (both for hypothesis generation and to share data with the response) in order to develop communication materials such as data sets, slide sets and summary reports
Work on ongoing basis to improve and automate code
Conducts weekly data cleaning and generate weekly error reports
Database management and upkeep as well as complete ad hoc data requests
Determine sampling methodologies to implement if case counts exceed certain thresholds, characterize surveillance back-fill to help with real-time interpretation of data
Compile individual-level data submitted from multiple external partners in diverse data formats and merge with laboratory testing results from CDC or contract laboratories
Track completeness and quality of data over time
Prepare summary tables and descriptive analyses of results on a regular basis
Create and modify SAS (or other) programs used for data management and create documentation for programs describing their functions and associated processes and output
Support the design, development, and implementation of surveillance tools to collect epidemiologic data
Communicate analytic results to internal CDC staff and external partners in a clear, concise and timely manner
Assist researchers in developing analytical programs in SAS or R and assist researchers in determining the appropriate statistical techniques to apply to their analyses

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Skills and Experience

Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years relevant experience; or Masters degree and 2+ years (preferably a M.S. in statistics or mathematics,, or MPH with a concentration in Epidemiology or Biostatistics)
Capable of high level programming in SAS and/or R for data analysis, data visualizations, and data management

Desired Skills and Experience:

Recent CDC experience
Experience on an outbreak response in any capacity

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
57,Data Scientist,$81k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

About US

At Vyaire, we help the world breathe easier. As a global leader in respiratory care, we know what we do enables, improves and extends lives. We are a young company with a long history of revolutionary products. We devise extraordinary solutions that allow patients to lead ordinary lives. We believe the best way to create value for our customers, is to become invaluable. We know a dynamic culture with diversity of thought makes this possible. Our colleagues are people who specialize in exceeding expectations, building lasting relationships and making it a priority to listen. We are dedicated to anticipating what’s next and get it done. We thrive on contributing and making a difference.

To learn more, visit our website: www.vyaire.com

Watch our video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZDrQoMbMRrI&feature=youtu.be

About this role

Vyaire teams are dedicated to connecting clinicians and patients with the highest quality respiratory healthcare solutions in the market. At Vyaire, you will find a company that puts the customer at the center of all we do. Our culture is one that rewards performance and each interaction we have with a customer furthers our mission to be the global leader in respiratory care.

We have an exciting opportunity for a Biostatistician with demonstrated expertise in clinical study design and analysis, who specializes in statistical methodologies used to support analytical and clinical validation of medical technology. Working in collaboration with scientists and physicians, you will provide advanced statistical and analytical expertise to Vyaire. You will use your knowledge of clinical study design and biostatistics to provides technical leadership, knowledge, experience and expertise by planning, conducting and supervising clinical development and evidence management projects. You will contribute to the clinical development strategy and ensure statistical integrity, optimal study designs and data and evidence needs are reflected and fulfilled within that strategy. To achieve Vyaire’s objectives, you provide out-of-the-box thinking to develop innovative clinical study designs, quantitative decision making and the incorporation of evidence from disparate sources of big data.

Critical deliverables include the design and formulation of statistical methodologies and input that ensure quality and consistency of key data deliverables across studies. You will analyze data and prepare and review study protocols, statistical analysis plans, interim study reports, manuscripts, abstracts and other technical documents and procedures pertaining to statistical methods.

Essential Functions:
Be an integral member of product development team responsible for supporting claims development, and data management in clinical studies.
Possess data management expertise and advanced knowledge in biostatistical concepts and practical application of such concepts to the assessment of medical device technology.
Serve as a subject matter expert in biostatistics, epidemiology, data mining, data analytics, and data management.
Provide study design and biostatistical guidance to Offering Management, Marketing and Development teams.
Provide functional excellence in the areas of statistics, data analysis and data processing for the department.
Apply extensive fundamental and specialized knowledge to the development of clinical protocols for device validation, respond to FDA questions, implementing new approaches to automated data processing for clinical trials.
Propose new ideas and recommend implementation plans leading to enhanced efficiencies and faster review and analysis of data.
Provide statistical input and advice to clinical teams for the design of studies and sample size/power estimations, including the design, writing and review of study protocols, development of statistical analysis plans and development of analyses requiring advanced statistical methodologies.
Design and lead the preparation of statistical components of protocols which meet project objectives, health authority guidelines, and clinical trial methodology standards.
Lead the analysis, evaluation and planning for methods of approach, and organizes means to achieve the solution to highly complex problems.
Interpret and evaluate statistical data and results of the most complex investigations and develop appropriate recommendations.
Lead the development of reports, charts, graphs, and other documents which support claims recommendations.
Lead building the data and evidence for Vyaire offerings.
Support develop the standards for clinical conduct, data collection, management and/or reporting.
Provide clear and regular technical and administrative input to professional, technical and administrative personnel assigned to a project.
Recognize and address issues which may impact the statistical integrity of the evidence development program or recognition of datasets for which different statistical tools may add value.
Qualifications:
PhD or MS degree with 5+ years of experience in a Healthcare medical device or Life sciences pharmaceutical regulated process mature environment
Experience with clinical decision support systems and/or software as a medical device is critical.
Demonstrated experience of applying statistical methods in biomedical research, pharmaceutical, medical device or CRO experience is required.
Good knowledge of ICH GCP guidelines, FDA regulations and demonstrated experience with pharma and/or medical device clinical trials and FDA/NDA submissions is required.
Experience with study design methodology such as adaptive design or pragmatic clinical trials, state-of-the-art modeling approaches, incorporation of real word evidence or experience analyzing big data.
Ability to understand scientific questions and formulate statistical and data-analytic methods to provide solutions to novel problems.
Sound knowledge of statistical methodologies such as analysis of variance, regression, experimental designs, contingency tables.
Expertise with SAS and R.
Ability to work independently and in project teams.
Excellent communication skills (written and spoken).
Atlanta, GA, Dallas, TX, Irvine, CA, Mettawa, IL, New York City, NY, Orlando, FLFull time",3.1,"Vyaire Medical
3.1","Irvine, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
58,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
59,SAP Maintenance Master Data Engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Job Title: SAP Maintenance Master Data Technician

Seeking a skilled technical resource with 5 years experience in the maintenance reliability or design fields. The ideal candidate will have experience in:
Hands on equipment maintenance and management
Management of timelines and work outline
Able to read schematics and technical drawings
Working Knowledge of MircoSoft® suite
Working in a team environment, multiple customers
Consideration given to those with robotics and automation experience
Job Duties:
Perform asset walk down for equipment
Creation of Functional Locations in SAP up to 6th level (this will be trained)
Critical Assessment of equipment
Creation of Maintenance task list based on OEM recommendations
Creation of Maintenance Actives
Maintenance Planning & Scheduling
Creation of Bill of materials
Successful candidate will possess and demonstrate these attributes:
Dedication to collaborative work environment and committed to team success.2. Works for win-win scenarios, whenever possible
Internally motivated, goal driven, biased toward action
History of success and overcoming adversity
Experienced with multilayered matrix organizations
Have a Technology Degree or Military Equivalent
Communicates in timely, honest, candid, direct, and concise manager in all environments
Willing to work out of Anderson, Indiana location",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Anderson, IN",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
60,Data Scientist - Risk,$77k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist (Risk)

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our technology and data driven approach to providing working capital, along with our accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ is searching for a Data Scientist (Risk) to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for building data driven tools to automate and scale risk decisions decision points include, fraud detection, commercial credit analysis, and invoice payment behavior. The ideal candidate is an experienced researcher and data wrangler who enjoys applying complex theories to solve real world business problems. The Data Scientist will need to collaborate effectively with both technical (engineers, data experts) and non-technical (business users) colleagues to bring the data to life.

Responsibilities of Data Scientist (Risk)
We have 20+ years of real-world commercial data weve observed businesses and their interactions with other businesses across market cycles, industries, and catastrophic events. Build risk tools that optimize for velocity and scale.
Build risk tools that optimize science & art you will work with risk experts who have been in the trenches (and learned from losses). Augment human decisions with machine.
Lay the foundation for scale. A data science framework for optimal data acquisition, model training and deployment. Dont take short-cuts. Bring quantitative and statistical rigor to your body of work.
Lead by example. You are joining a data team at ground-level. Building and inserting a data team, into a 20+ year old company (organism) will be hard, but rewarding.
Qualifications for Risk Data Scientist
Curiosity, Grit, and Humility
5+ years of experience of hands-on data science role
Previous experience of building commercial finance risk tools should be beneficial, but not required
Bachelor or Masters degree in Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or another quantitative field
A toolkit of modern data science techniques
Experience with any data science tools/packages: Python, R, SAS, XGBoost, TensorFlow, NLTK
Experience with any big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with any reporting tools: Tableau Server, Power BI, SSRS, Excel
Experience with any AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Aurora, S3
Experience with any Stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work:

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

Physical Demands:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and stoop, kneel, crouch.

Travel:

There will be minimal travel required for this position.

LSQ is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived, race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, any other non-merit based factor or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Our leadership team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. If youd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please click here http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm",4.5,"LSQ
4.5","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
61,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$56k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",4.0,"PNNL
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
62,Data Scientist,$78k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Klaviyo is growing fast and we have openings for all skill levels across data science. Listen to our data science team podcast at https://medium.com/klaviyo-data-science and learn more about our technical culture at https://klaviyo.tech

Our data science team takes ideas from inception to new machine learning-powered features that ship to our hundreds of thousands of users. You'll be central to creating features that help our customers learn and grow from their data. For this role, we're looking for people who are strong at math, modeling, experimental design and putting themselves in the shoes of customers. We look for people who are interested in all aspects of what it takes to go from idea to generally available feature, even though your strengths and experience may fall primarily in one area.

The ideal candidate has a background in data science, statistics and machine learning and has done work ranging from exploratory analysis to training and deploying models. We use a wide variety of data mining and machine learning algorithms. The right candidate will have both a solid fundamental understanding and deep practical experience with at least a few modeling and machine learning techniques.

You should have experience building models that are used by people to make better decisions. We're focused on shipping early and often. We prefer iterative solutions that are incrementally better to the perfect solution.

How you will make a difference:
Analyze large data sets (we're collecting billions of individual actions every month).
Build models and ship products that enable businesses to grow faster and communicate with their customers.
Democratize and open up that technology to everyone.
Match the right assumptions and models to the right problem.
Measure and know what impact your models had on the decisions people made -- e.g. did they outperform the previous best model or a human decision maker?
Who you are:
Possess a strong fundamental understanding and deep experience with at least some machine learning algorithms (e.g. regressions, decision trees, k-means clustering, neural networks).
Understand Bayesian modeling techniques.
Are capable of analyzing data and making rigorous statements about what can or cannot be concluded.
Have experience designing and implementing model performance/validation assessments.
Have a background in statistics and understand different distributions and the conditions under which they're valid.
Know how code and have used data science tools and packages.
Have demonstrated a measurable impact based on the models you've created. It's not always easy getting a model correct and we love talking about places we got stuck and working as a team to think through ideas that could unblock us.
Have a desire to ship features powered by data science (in other words, you're excited by both upfront research and actually getting models into production at cloud scale).
Bachelor's or advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, computer science or other relevant quantitative discipline, or equivalent industry experience.
Get to know Klaviyo
Klaviyo is the world's leading owned marketing platform known for accelerating revenue for online businesses using the channels they own like email, web, and mobile. Enabling companies to leverage these owned marketing channels, Klaviyo makes it easy to store, access, analyze and use transactional and behavioral data to power highly-targeted customer and prospect communications. And unlike other marketing platforms, Klaviyo doesn't force companies to compromise between advanced functionality or ease of use - so companies of all sizes are able to maximize their sales quickly. That's why over 50,000 innovative companies like Unilever, Custom Ink and Eventbrite sell more with Klaviyo.",4.8,"Klaviyo
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,"Research Scientist, Immuno-Oncology (PhD Required)",-1,"Position Summary: *
The research scientist will be involved in conducting immune-oncology research programs directed at identifying new therapeutic targets and development drug development programs in cancer around these targets. The candidate will write scientific publications, grant and patent applications. The responsibilities of this position include developing and executing cell-based assays, _in vitro,_ _ex vivo_ and _in vivo_ to characterize biological mechanisms of action of novel immunotherapeutic product candidates for the treatment of cancer. The candidate will be aligned with four fundamental pillars of BTI's entrepreneurial corporate culture: 1) Be bold and decisive, 2) Never give up, 3) Be solution-oriented, and 4) Do the impossible.
Responsibilities: *
· _Experimental Design: _ Generate and test novel experimental hypotheses to advance discovery-based R&D at BTI. Propose controlled designs capable of robustly testing respective hypotheses to draw conclusions relevant to drug development research.

· _Data analysis: _ Utilize established and novel methods to analyze data. Data types will include but are not limited to flow cytometry results, high-throughput sequencing, protein biochemistry assays, and histopathology.

· _Data communication and reporting: _ Provide detailed reports of experimental results. Generate figures, presentations and publications to communicate results with scientific community, investors, and collaborators. Support the development of peer reviewed scientific publications, patents and grants relevant to ongoing research.

· _Laboratory Procedures_: Perform various standard experimental assays including quantitative real-time PCR, Western blot, flow cytometry, and ELISA. Work in sterile conditions to conduct cell culture experiments and maintain the growth of cell lines. Express and purify recombinant protein. Collect and analyze generated data.

· _Personnel Training_: Training of BTI personnel on laboratory upkeep, experimental assays and research projects. Guide the personnel resourcing of projects and tasks.

· _Animal Procedures_: Conduct various IACUC approved laboratory animal procedures and techniques for BTI’s projects including but not limited to basic rodent handling, oral gavage, intraperitoneal injection, blood collection, and euthanasia. Interact with animal facility personnel to maintain organization and compliance of animal facilities. Will design new animal studies for projects related to therapeutic efficacy or mechanisms of action of new drugs for autoimmune diseases.

· _Teamwork_: Work independently and collaboratively in a matrixed environment. Be able to successfully work with other BTI team members in experiments.

· _Regulatory Compliance_: Support regulatory compliance efforts as instructed by the senior leadership in accordance with IACUC, IBC, and IRB protocols. Implement, organize and maintain regulatory compliance records.

· _Record keeping_: Keep detailed records of all activities, record these activities in ASANA, Google Drive, laboratory notebook, the BTI’s Colony Management System (CMS), and Labkey. Provide weekly updates of the BTI research progress to the Scientific Director, and BTI team. Maintains confidentiality of all data, information and knowledge.

· Maintain the confidentiality of all company deliberations and plans.

· Any new responsibilities or changes in the reporting structure as directed by the executive leadership.

· Act in accordance with Company’s policies.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $48,814.00 - $91,451.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.biotherapeuticsinc.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"BioTherapeutics, Inc.","Blacksburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
64,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
65,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Atlanta

WHY YOU'LL LOVE SALESLOFT:

Put Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

These are the values that define who we are, that have empowered our staggering growth, and could be instrumental to your career development

Headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia, with offices in San Francisco, New York, London, Indianapolis, and Guadalajara, SalesLoft is growing rapidly and is looking for future Lofters to join our team. As a testament to our Organizational Health, SalesLoft has been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Startup Employers in 2020, twice by Deloitte as a 'Fastest-Growing Technology Company in North America,' featured by The New York Times as a start-up on a path to a $1B valuation, and has been recognized as a '#1 Best Place to Work in Atlanta' three separate years. SalesLoft is ranked #1 in the emerging category of Sales Engagement software and is on a mission to equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience.

We're redefining an age old industry! This is challenging work – but our team of brilliant creatives makes the journey thrilling. We're fast-paced, innovative, and collaborative. We pursue excellence in everything and have a lot of fun along the way. Come join us!

THE OPPORTUNITY:

Although we're proud of our history, we're just as excited about the future. We want to create a world-class culture and company that attracts, develops, engages and retains elite talent.

At SalesLoft, our data scientists are pivotal to our company's success. You will be a key member of our fast-growing and high-performing data science team and will conduct innovative machine learning research and build product feature prototypes that will deliver value to our customers.

On a day-to-day basis, you will be responsible for solving business problems using our in-house data and your technical prowess. Specifically, you will:
Apply advanced statistical techniques and concepts to analyze data from the company databases and other unstructured data sources to build innovative product features, marketing content, and internal services.
Invest in the sales engagement domain; collaborate with product, engineering, sales, customer success, and other teams to understand business and customer needs, and translate them to tangible data science problems.
Own and manage complex projects and communicate effectively with stakeholders.
Contribute to the rapid growth of the research organization, being flexible in data engineering, algorithmist, and analyst responsibilities as they arise.
In addition to working with amazing colleagues who exemplify our 'team over self' core value, you will also have the opportunity to leverage your mathematical skills and technical expertise to transform the sales engagement space. You will have an opportunity to make a difference.

WHAT WE'RE LOOKING FOR:

We are seeking a hungry and passionate person who will be instrumental in growing the data science organization at the most successful early stage SaaS company in Atlanta. We are looking for someone who enjoys, and is unafraid of, getting their hands dirty with unstructured, unlabeled data and can think out of the box to solve business problems.

If you're looking for an opportunity to learn more, do more, and become more than previously possible… If you're passionate about innovation, growth and serving customers and thrive in a fast-paced, developmental environment, then becoming a Data Scientist at SalesLoft is the career path for you

THE TEAM:

Our SalesLoft's Data Science team is comprised of seasoned and up-and-coming data scientists, machine learning engineers and a product manager who are all aligned on one vision and mission:
Vision: Every seller is loved by the buyers they serve (#saleslove)
Mission: Equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience
The Data Science team consists of results-oriented technology professionals who are hungry, humble and smart. They are passionate about making SalesLoft the leader in AI technologies in the sales engagement space and believe in leveraging data science and machine learning to guide and help our users. They are also the epitome of our core values - Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

THE SKILL SET:
2+ years experience as a data scientist or machine learning engineer
Proficient in a variety of ML techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and has a fundamental understanding of their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience with deploying data science products in production or collaborating with engineers to deploy in production
Prior experience of working with unlabeled and unstructured data. Experience with NLP and/or predictive forecasting preferred
Excellent verbal and communication skills and visualization abilities to communicate with stakeholders
Strong knowledge/experience with a variety of analysis tools, including Python, R, and SQL. Experience with Spark or Dask preferred.
WITHIN ONE MONTH, YOU'LL:
Attend SalesLoft's New Hire Orientation, where you will learn our SalesLoft story and understand what makes our ""Lofters"" unique
Begin 1:1's with your manager, understand your 30-60-90 plan, meet & shadow current members of the SalesLoft team, and delve into your territory
Set your OKRs (Objectives and Key Results) with your manager and develop an action plan to achieve them
Meet key partners in Product, Engineering, Customer Success etc.
Understand our various data sources and get your hands dirty with them
Explore our technical stack and infrastructure and get comfortable with them
WITHIN THREE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Create a shadowing plan and begin executing it to understand the SalesLoft platform.
Apply various machine learning and data science techniques to solve sales business problems.
Create custom ETL capabilities to support your research efforts.
Lead and deliver your first research project.
Communicate research results to product and engineering leadership in verbal, visual, and written mediums.
WITHIN SIX MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Significantly contribute to team planning and estimation.
Continue to focus on your OKRs.
Create prototypes using product knowledge, customer insights and technical expertise.
Implement and compare models to improve key metrics.
Advise product leadership on data science data capture and collection requirements.
Collaborate with our machine learning engineers and software engineers to put your models in front of our customers.
WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Mentor other team members and assist them to tackle new problems.
Be a key advisor on team direction and SalesLoft's long-term data science strategy.
Collaborate with subject matter experts to develop success criteria to deliver new products, features and models.
Push the state of the art and apply the latest advances in deep learning and mathematical modeling to improve buyer and seller experiences.
IS THIS ROLE NOT AN EXACT FIT? Keep an eye on our Careers Page for other positions!

WHY SHOULD YOU WORK AT SALESLOFT:
You will become part of an amazing culture with a supportive CEO and smart teammates who actually care
You will work with an amazing team you can learn from and teach.
You will experience joining a high-growth/high-traction organization.
You will hear ""Yes, let's do that!"" and then have the opportunity to successfully execute on your ideas
We have a vibrant, open office that utilizes modern technology.
You will grow more here than you would anywhere else, that is a promise.
SalesLoft is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"SalesLoft
4.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
66,Sr. Data Scientist,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Medifast is seeking a full-time Senior Data Scientist to join our team.
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for anticipating future business needs, solving real-time business questions, and identifying new applications for complex analysis.
The candidate focus will be using Machine Learning for the following use cases at Medifast:
Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, Natural Language Processing, AB Testing, and Customer Segmentation (Unsupervised Learning).

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to generate new features to feed into our data core. Key Models include: Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, and Customer Segmentation
Use storytelling to bring out the insights derived from machine learning and statistical modeling making the complex easy to follow and digestible
Perform automated market analyses to dynamically react to changing market conditions
Discover new predictive insights in our datasets and design measures that compute new predictive models while using data visualization methodology
Assist the Insights Center Manager in using Data Science to enhance the Insights Roadmap and assist in the selection of Data Science products to help enable and maintain the Data Science stack
Create measures that monitor inputs and performance on a real-time basis to inform the insights council when unexpected changes arise.
Be active in communications with business users and data management resources to collaborate through a project lifecycle as data changes occur
Aid and train end super users to effectively use the Data Science platform
Coordinate with offshore technical resources

PHD degree or equivalent preferred in Applied Statistics, Mathematics or a related data field
5-8 years related experience
Executing solutions to business problems using advanced statistics, testing methods, data analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, optimization, and machine learning techniques;
Design and run end-to-end experiments with statistical rigor for test and learn, apply appropriate sampling methods and probabilistic simulations to hypothesis testing and parameter estimation including bootstrapping
Perform data exploration and visualization (using Tableau and other visualization tools), apply machine learning and statistical inference to seed hypotheses, identify opportunities, define metrics, provide interpretability to multi-dimensional scoring, regressor and classifier models, and decision tree learning, using novel methods;
Employ statistical programming through, Python, R, Dataiku, and toolkits (Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, PySpark, Jupyter Notebook and kernel, Macro) across disparate environments including Linux/Unix command line and shell scripting, virtual and clouds
Execute and automate data preprocessing via relational systems (AWS, Redshift, SQL Server, MySQL, Postgre, and, Oracle), and parallel computing for big data, using analytics engine and cluster computing frameworks: Apache Spark and Hadoop MapReduce, Apache Tez, and Yarn.
#LI-JP1",3.0,"Medifast, Inc.
3.0","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Company - Public,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
67,Senior Data Scientist,$72k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
68,Celluar High-throughput Screening Scientist,-1,"Job Description: *
· Routine handling and preparation of cell cultures in preparation for automated high throughput screening operations

· Preparation of reagents related to the high throughput screening setup and takedown

· Interact closely with automation specialists to initiate and complete screening runs

· Analyzing QC/QA data with the ability to recognize and adjust conditions quickly as needed
Qualifications: *
· BS in Biology or a related field with 1-3 years of experience or MS with 0-1 years of experience in cell culture and automated cell-based assays.

· Should be highly detail-oriented and flexible, with proficiency in general computer skills, as well as a high accountability and ownership for projects.

· Must be self-motivating, have excellent interpersonal and communication skills, be able to multi-task, be highly organized, have the ability to work in a multifunctional team setting, and adhere to specific timelines and deadlines.

· Ability and desire to master new skills, methods and technologies in a technology-enabled environment are very important.

· Ability to work well with all team members, have a positive customer service focus, and be reliable is essential for the position. 09212020

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Spectrix Analytical Services, LLC
4.0","Princeton, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Contract,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
69,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$46k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for turning data into knowledge, enabling business decisions.

Specific Duties Include:
Partnering with the user community to create new business intelligence, reporting and data analysis solutions.
Maintaining existing software systems related to business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Identify improvements to existing business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Capture, develop, and document data definitions, business rules, and data quality requirements.
Build and maintain ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) and integration processes.
Validate data delivered to user community.
Ensure compliance with Protolabs data and software policies and procedures.
Monitor software systems to ensure reliability and accuracy of information loaded into the databases.
Maintain all documentation related to database objects, source systems, and operations.
Conduct complex, important work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgment.
Minimum Qualifications:
6+ years of experience working in software engineering
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server
Experience with Domo
Experience with PowerBI
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Service (SSRS)
Ability to work on multiple project concurrently
Ability to manage time effectively
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work effectively in a fast paced, collaborative environment
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous leadership experience preferred
Knowledge of document databases including Raven
Previous experience with Microsoft Dynamics AX
Previous experience with Salesforce
Software development in a continuous integration and continuous deployment environment
Proto Labs maintains ITAR-compliant operations in all of our United States based facilities. Due to ITAR regulations, this role is only open to U.S. Citizens, lawful permanent residents (green card holders) or foreign nationals granted refugee or asylee status. Individuals with temporary visas (e.g. E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, TN or OPT) are not eligible for hire in this role.

Proto Labs, Inc. is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer",2.1,"Rapid Manufacturing
2.1","Nashua, NH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
70,Data Analyst,$50k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

This Data Analyst will be part of Rational's Technology & Data Practice and supporting one of our large biotech projects. This individual will provide strategic and tactical consultation, leadership in delivering solutions, and oversight of processes and systems.  The position requires solid technical foundation, domain knowledge, as well as strong verbal and written communication skills with a proven ability to clearly communicate technical information to a non-technical audience.

This is a full time position within Rational's Technology Practice. This position is not available for Visa sponsorship or C2C work.

What you will do:
Serve as the Business Analyst subject matter expert supporting, but not limited to Commercial portfolio
Network with a new and evolving IT environment, business team, and vendors to foster strong relationships and build partnerships
Understand strategy and how it translates to executable programs, projects, and efforts that align with strategic goals while taking the environmental constraints and opportunities into account
Collaborate with cross-functional professionals to deliver high-quality and innovative solutions that meet the business needs and create new opportunities
Provide analytic support of various levels of complexity including large, multi-year, cross-functional efforts with internal and external influencing factors
Negotiate conflicts and complex issues to an expeditious and satisfactory resolution
What you will bring:
3+ years of exposure to the orchestrating technology solutions for technical and/or Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical organizations
3+ years of experience in the Business Analysis or equivalent role with solution delivery and process improvement supporting cross-functional implementation of IT solutions in the Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical industry
3+ years of experience in organization financials, financial reporting
Familiarity with applications used in the business area such as Salesforce and Veeva
Working experience in SQL Server and Snowflake (preferred, but not required)
Proven knowledge of IT solutions and application management through various product cycles and evolving work environments
Demonstrated technical understanding of application architecture to include application servers, web servers, configuration files, relational databases, and reporting applications
Ability to proactively plan, organize, deliver with limited oversight, prioritize, and quickly adapt to changing situations
Excellent communication skills, including the ability to interface and influence internal and external partners at multiple organization levels
Strong interpersonal and negotiation skills, with a high degree of self-motivation and ability to work independently
Proficient in essential tools such as Power BI, Smartsheets, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.
Who you are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Collaborative to the Core. Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment, as a leader and member.
Well-rounded Professional. You have amazing communication and organizational skills along with high EQ.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
71,Data Scientist II,$74k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blucora has a bold aspiration: we are committed to giving all people the tools needed to lead healthy financial lives - tools often reserved for the wealthy.

We now turn to the next leg, developing the technological tools that make our vision of financial health for all a reality. Atypical for the financial services industry, we take a contemporary approach to strategy and product development that is founded in user insights, rapid testing and a singular focus on driving end-user value.

Since charting new territory on a daily basis is part of everyone's job at Blucora, we've attracted team members who thrive on the challenge, encourage each other, and are passionately committed to the goal. If you agree that problem- solving is a team sport, and feel energized by a good debate, deep dive research, or a fun night out with colleagues, we might be the right firm for you!
Position Summary

The Data Scientist II is responsible for providing data, analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning capabilities to inform key business initiatives. This role will deliver models to optimize marketing spend, create personalized engagement, and drive customer retention across both our tax preparation and wealth management businesses.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

The major responsibilities of the position are listed below. To perform the job successfully, the individual must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The major responsibilities of the position are listed below. To perform the job successfully, the individual must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Deliver statistical models to drive organizational insights and actions.
Partner closely with the business including the Marketing and Product teams to understand and optimize the customer journey.
Perform end to end statistical modeling with a high level of accuracy.
Assembling and cleaning of data for modeling purposes.
Write and interpret complex SQL queries.
Model selection, build, and testing.
Engage with the broader Data Science organization to support, refine, and test large scale data science projects.
Ability to deploy visualization techniques to deliver insights to end-user.
Summarize and report key analytical findings and recommendations in both oral and written forms to various technical and non-technical teams.
Other job duties as defined.
Education & Experience
Bachelor or Master’s degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g. statistics, physics, engineering).
Minimum of 3 years of hands-on experience in the analysis and modeling of large complex datasets.
Fluency in SQL and experience with Big Data.
Expertise in a programming language (Python, R, SQL) for statistical analysis.
Expertise with statistical modeling techniques such as regression, classification, hypothesis testing, and unsupervised learning.
Hands-on experience with optimization, data mining, or machine learning.
Strong Excel and data visualization skills.
The ability not just to retrieve and present data, but to draw conclusions and make recommendations.
Experience working for a technology or internet company.
Comprehensive Benefits



We offer a competitive salary, outstanding benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, life insurance, paid vacation and sick days, paid holidays, tuition reimbursement, and 401(k) with company match. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, or disability.

#Blucora

At Blucora, we believe our work benefits from the diverse perspectives of our employees. As such, Blucora welcomes and celebrates diversity and inclusion and is committed to equal opportunity employment. At Blucora, you can expect a supportive, open and inclusive atmosphere and a team that values your contributions.

Blucora, Inc. and its subsidiaries, Avantax Wealth Management, HK Financial Services, and TaxAct are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, physical and mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and any other status protected under federal or state law. Blucora, considers information gathered in the hiring process, including information on this application, confidential, and only shares it on a need-to know basis or as required by law. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, you may contact us at HR@Blucora.com or by calling 972-870-6000 to speak with a member of the HR Talent Acquisition team.",3.3,"Blucora
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
72,Clinical Research Molecular Scientist,-1,"ABSS Solutions, Inc. (ASI), is seeking a full-time Clinical Research Molecular Scientist to join our team in providing Medical Research support at Wright Patterson AFB. ASI administers a comprehensive research and development contract providing an array of research projects for customers across the DoD space. Our research teams work with educational institutions and other third party organizations to maximize readiness, and resilience for the men and women of our armed forces..

Summary:

Collaborates with enterprise-wide Principle Investigators, in order to develop research protocols that includes human subject research and associated IRB regulatory compliance approvals for the various pilot evaluations to also include animal subjects/ IACUC approvals.

Job Roles and Responsibilities:

Be experienced and qualified to do research testing in the field of Molecular Laboratory Science to include but not limited to nucleic acid extraction and quantification, electrophoresis, PCR, , Microarray, and Sequencing. Familiarity with various Sequencing techniques to include Pyro- Sequencing, Sanger Sequencing and Next Generation Sequencing (NGS). Experience with multiple library preparation techniques for transcriptome, exome and whole genome NGS.
Develop methods related to their particular field of expertise to support research protocols approved by regulatory oversight committees. Methods must be developed to meet researchers need and be in compliance with Good Laboratory Practice Guidelines. Be able to develop test methods and implement testing independently.
Perform manual and automated testing on multiple body fluids from human research subjects and various species of animal subjects as described in approved research protocols.
Perform all required setup and quality control and quality assurance processes required for equipment used in analyzing specimens for research purposes. Meet all accreditation requirements for Good Laboratory Practices in using manual and automated testing equipment.
Analyze the results of tests and experiments to ensure conformity to specifications, using special mechanical and electrical devices.
Review results of tests and quality control materials to ensure that testing processes were in control and all data produced is accurate and precise.
Analyze and record test data to issue reports that use charts, graphs and narratives.
Enter data into various computer systems to meet research protocol requirements. Follow established procedures in validating and verifying data entered in to computer systems.
Use standard laboratory techniques and follow operating instructions in preparing materials for test procedures (i.e., standards, calibrators, solutions, and reagents). Use standard laboratory procedures to prepare specimens for molecular, chemical or toxicological analysis.
Process and ship all samples according to regulations and protocol requirements.
Document all correspondence and communication pertinent to the research.
Assist in the preparation and analysis of laboratory experiments, as requested.
Maintain and update files of all applicable regulatory documentation for IACUC or IRB (including protocols, approvals, amendments, modifications, etc.) as well as any communications with the sponsor or any other Federal or regulatory office (including prior approvals, change in scope, etc.).
Manage study documentation to include accurate and timely filing.
Adheres to Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA), Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA), International Air Transport Association (IATA), Good Laboratory Practices (GLP) and infection control procedures.
Assist in writing method validations, operating procedures, presentations, and publications using provided methodologies and formats.
Collect and process specimens from research subjects for testing purposes. All specimens must be collected, processed and handled as described in approved research protocols.
Assists the PI to refine the specific laboratory requirements to meet the aims, research questions, hypotheses, and/or objectives of the studies.
Conducts laboratory procedures and testing in accordance with the approved protocol. Performs appropriate study specific procedures as outlined in the protocol. Orders study materials,
equipment, and/or supplies as specified in the research protocol and in accordance with Clinical Research Division (CRD) policies.
Maintains all protocol binder to include all approved protocols and amendments and all data obtained from laboratory procedures.
Abstracts required research data elements from paper or electronic systems or other existing documents, clinical computer databases such as the AHLTA, CHCS or JPTA, and/or other electronic diagnostic reports in accordance with the research protocol and enter these data into spreadsheets, databases, and/or statistic software as required.
Delivers and receives specimens to internal laboratory and/or ship specimens to a referral laboratory as specified by the protocol.
Works with the statistician to clean and prepare data sets for analyses.
Collects, sorts, files, and maintains all paper and electronic documents related to the protocol.
Evaluates proposed amendments of the study to identify any changes in laboratory testing requirements as approved by the IRB, Institutional IACUC.
Maintains complete and accurate drug and equipment accountability at all times for the study.
Identifies delays and other shortcomings in meeting objective and develops a contingency plan as required.
Assists the PIs to write the final report and submit it to the IRB, IACUC, and study sponsor.
Manages all aspects of laboratory experiments while in constant communication with the PIs and CRD leadership.
Actively seeks to learn new laboratory techniques to support new protocol requirements. Manages all laboratory testing requirements to support translational and clinical research projects in concert with the PI.
Arranges learning schedules for Graduate Medical Education (GME) personnel working in the clinical and translational research programs.

Minimum Qualification and Experience:

Master’s Degree in Molecular Biology or science-related degree with 2+ years’ experience or minimum of Bachelor’s Degree in Molecular Biology with 5 years of recent experience in a molecular biology laboratory.
Shall have at least 5 years of experience in advanced Molecular Laboratory procedures and experience research laboratory procedures including but not limited to research specimens from various species, experience using basic and advance laboratory instrumentation, using various testing techniques to determine biological activity, metabolic changes, or biology products, experience in the collection and processing of various biological samples for frozen long term storage and the procedures to recover samples from long term storage for analysis.
Experience or knowledge in performing translational biomedical research, and working in a laboratory performing various techniques to include but not limited to: flow Cytometry, research involving the use of specimens, PCR/rtPCR testing, expertise in the use and enzyme immunoassay testing assays, use of laboratory equipment including imaging systems, chemistry equipment (i.e., HPLC, GS-MS, etc.), hematology and clinical chemistry analyzers, coagulation testing, experience in cell culture techniques, and extensive experience in collecting processing and archiving specimens for use in translational biomedical research.
Must have and maintain a current Basic Life Support (BLS) certification.",2.5,"1st American Systems and Services
2.5","Dayton, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
73,"Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing",-1,"Job Purpose*
Canventa has a new role for a Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing to provide scientific expertise for the development of multiple product lines for iPSC and iPSC derived differentiated cell types at Canventa Life Sciences. This role guides development strategies for diverse product portfolios and advances Canventa’s long-term success in current and emerging markets through product and technological innovation. This scientist drives collaborations both internally and externally to facilitate development of cutting edge products and scalable manufacturing processes.

Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for providing advanced scientific expertise for multiple product lines with particular emphasis on iPSCs, iPSC-derived cell types, organoids, and other culture-derived cell products.
Responsible for submitting new product proposals, setting performance criteria, experimental design, project planning, product optimization, and product launch .
Resolve complex scientific and technical investigations for cross-team and cross-functional operational activities.
Execute on department and corporate goals, projects and/or initiatives with the required stakeholders and subject matter experts. Contributes to the 5 - 10 year strategic plan.
Working closely with the Strategic Marketing and Marketing teams, participate in all aspects of the product lifecycle management and identify future trends to meet customer needs.
Evaluate new technologies, literature and patents independently, generate intellectual property, and respond to patent office actions with the Business Development Team; draft patent applications.
Identify and execute multiple product and process improvement projects including cost reduction and risk mitigation initiatives; responsible for initiating cost reduction projects.
Manage the assigned project research budget and report on monthly status updates.
Generate, review and approve technical documentation and provide pre- and post-product launch support.
Proactively research and analyze competitor activities, threats, and trends, and recommend new product development ideas to counter potential competitor threats.
Serve as a scientific ambassador of the company: i) deliver superior quality presentations to internal and external audiences; ii) promote the Canventa brand and mission; iii) facilitate and strengthen successful relationships with external experts at all levels.
Adhere to the Quality Management System (QMS) initiatives and requirements.
Proactively report and present on the product lifecycle activities to senior leaders across the company. Responsible for Executive reporting on corporate initiatives as needed.
Lead, manage, coach and mentor a cross-functional team to meet the deliverables and increase team productivity.
Qualifications
PhD with 4-8 years of relevant experience in iPSC generation, maintenance, differentiation and cell characterization.
Experience in creating master cell banks and cryopreservation is an asset.
Additional expertise in primary cell/ organoid/ organ tissue culture is an asset.
Additional experience in high-throughput screening, drug screening, disease modeling, or experience with bioreactor cultures is an asset.
Accomplished independent researcher with product, methodology, and/or technology development experience.
Proven record of complex experimental design and execution, including expertise in applying appropriate statistical analyses in complex data sets.
Broad technical expertise and knowledge of diverse laboratory techniques. Proven experience training staff on laboratory techniques and protocols.
Expert presenter with the ability to deliver technical summaries of data with critical thinking skills to provide in-depth analytical explanations and interpretations.
Managed successful collaborations with key opinion leaders.
Demonstrated expertise drafting business plans, patent applications, and related articles in the field of expertise.
Excellent communication skills (verbal, written and presentation) both in one-on-one and in group settings.
Personal Attributes
Ability to question and not always be satisfied with the status quo.
Willingness to learn and assume new responsibilities.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Self-motivated and independent work ethic.
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a fast paced environment.
Strives in a growing and changing environment.
Team orientated – ‘one-team’ behavior with demonstrated team leadership capabilities is a must.
Canventa Life Sciences is a company focused on the collection and processing of donated blood and bone marrow specimens into samples that are immediately used by researchers worldwide, increasing access to biologically relevant samples and accelerating the pace of research.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
All office and lab staff have access to plastic barriers, gloves, eye protection, masks, hand sanitizers, soap & water, and lab coats.

Experience:
Staff Training: 1 year (Preferred)
Cryopreservation: 1 year (Preferred)
laboratory: 4 years (Required)
Presentation Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Cell culture: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.Canventa.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/canventa/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Canventa Life Sciences,"Emeryville, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Unknown,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
74,"Scientist, Clinical Research",$69k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Those who join Emergent BioSolutions feel a sense of ownership about their future. You will excel in an environment characterized by respect, innovation and growth opportunities. Here, you will join passionate professionals who advance their scientific, technical and professional skills to develop products designed-to protect life.
Job Summary
The Senior Scientist, Clinical Research is responsible for
i) providing scientific expertise and clinical strategy to assigned clinical development programs to other Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management) or to internal company departments (eg, pre-clinical, bioanalytical, medical writing, regulatory affairs);
ii) authoring relevant clinical trial documents; and
iii) playing a key role in the clinical development of the assigned product and the associated regulatory submission process. Additionally, the Senior Scientist provides leadership by acting as a mentor to clinical research scientists and/or colleagues in Clinical Research department.
This position is located in Gaithersburg, MD.

Essential Functions
Leads clinical research studies from trial design to final study report for assigned projects.
Develops, prioritizes and meets measurable short- and long-term objectives for assigned clinical studies.
Provides guidance to relevant Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management) involved in design and conduct of clinical studies.
Authors/reviews clinical trial protocols, investigator’s brochure, clinical study reports, clinical sections of regulatory submission documents including IND and BLA/NDS, developmental safety update reports, clinical overviews/summaries, clinical assessments.
Appropriately designs studies to meet desired clinical endpoints and with appropriate methods and measurements.
Reviews and applies current company SOPs. Revises relevant SOPs, when required.
Tracks progress of assigned clinical development programs and addresses problems as necessary
Collaborates with other internal departments including Pre-clinical, Bioanalytical, Medical Writing, Regulatory Affairs, Pharmacovigilance and corporate project management groups to ensure common goals are met.
Provides leadership/mentorship to clinical research scientists or to colleagues in other Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management).
Presents internally for clinical trial/program training; externally (when required) to investigators/clinical trial site personnel (eg, site initiation visit, investigator meeting), data safety monitoring boards (DSMBs), at regulatory agency meetings, conferences and/or advisory boards.
Attends and contributes at regulatory meetings with FDA, Health Canada, EMA.
Manages relationships with clinical consultants and/or relevant clinical research organization (CRO) personnel.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature of work performed by those in this job. It is not an exhaustive list of all duties, and other duties may be assigned.

Education, Experience & Skills
EDUCATION:
Qualified candidates will have one of the following:
An advanced degree in Life Sciences or Medicine (PhD, PharmD or MD preferred) with at least 4 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions;
A Master’s degree in Life Sciences with at least 5 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions;
A Bachelor’s degree in Life Sciences with at least 6 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions.
EXPERIENCE:
Must have knowledge and understanding of Health Canada, FDA and ICH regulatory requirements and procedures applicable to Clinical Research and Product Development.
At least 4 years of experience in the pharmaceutical industry with direct experience in designing and managing clinical studies.
Previous experience working in a matrix environment is highly desirable. Experience in clinical operations, biostatistics or data management is an asset.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:
Ability to drive efforts, overcome obstacles and achieves results within budget and timeline specifications.
Experience in presentations in public or regulatory settings. Excellent organizational, analytical, leadership, problem solving and interaction skills.
Ability to work in a highly diverse and fast paced, team environment.
Excellent written/verbal communication and interpersonal skills, as well as excellent computer skills required.
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Successful Completion of a Criminal Record Check.

PHYSICAL/MENTAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT CHARACTERISTICS
There are physical/mental demands and work environment characteristics that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of the job.
This information is available upon request from the candidate.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform all essential functions.
Emergent BioSolutions is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, disability, Protected Veteran status, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
Information submitted will be used by Emergent BioSolutions for activities related to your prospective employment. Emergent BioSolutions respects your privacy and any use of the information submitted will be subject to the terms of our Privacy Policy .
Emergent BioSolutions does not accept non-solicited resumes or candidate submittals from search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list. Unsolicited resumes or candidate information submitted to Emergent BioSolutions by search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list shall become the property of Emergent BioSolutions and if the candidate is subsequently hired by Emergent BioSolutions, Emergent BioSolutions shall not owe any fee to the submitting agency.",3.3,"Emergent Biosolutions
3.3","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
75,Data Scientist,$70k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Position at Homes.com

Homes.com is looking for a Data Scientist in Norfolk, VA to join our team of IT professionals. You'll be working with our Business Intelligence Team to support and grow our premier real estate portal. You'll participate in technical research, developing models, data analysis, machine learning and be expected to bring your own ideas to the table to help keep us innovating.

Responsibilities:
Forecast site traffic for use in inventory calculations
Analyze and report on trends such as home valuations
Develop suggestion models
Help develop image classification models
Requirements:
BS or MS in computer science, data science, mathematics or other related field
2+ Years working as a Data Scientist
1+ Years Experience working with Time Series modeling
Experience working with Jupyter Notebooks
Experience working in R and Python
Experience providing Statistical Analysis
Nice to Haves:
Experience working in a cloud environment
Experience working with a relational database

About Homes.com

Homes.com offers today's demanding home buyers, renters and those somewhere in between a simply smarter home search. With features like Homes.com Match, HomeShare and Snap & Search, homeshoppers now have a more personalized way to search for their next home. Since its launch over 25 years ago, Homes.com offers real estate professionals brand and property advertising, search engine marketing and instant response lead generation to help them succeed online. For more information, visit Homes.com.

About DE

Dominion Enterprises (DE) is a leading digital marketing and software services company offering client solutions across multiple business verticals. Our customers rely on our B2B cloud SaaS solutions to establish their online and mobile brands, generate leads, and manage customer relationships through our Homes.com, Dominion Dealer Solutions, Dominion Business Solutions / DX1, Travel Media and Franchise and Business Opportunity divisions. Our B2C web and mobile applications include Homes.com, HotelCoupons.com, FranchiseOpportunities.com, FranchiseGator.com, Franchise.com, and BusinessBroker.net.
About 2,000 employees reside and work in our Norfolk, VA home office and in offices across the U.S. Our employees will tell you about our collaborative, innovative, team-oriented work environment, excellent career enrichment opportunities, community service opportunities, competitive earnings, and a comprehensive benefits package that includes a generous 401(k). DE is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workforce. DE is a drug-testing employer.",4.3,"Homes.com
4.3","Norfolk, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
76,"Data Scientist, Medical Diagnostics",-1,"_*The Company*_
The world is facing a medical crisis, bacteria are increasingly evolving resistance to even our strongest antibiotics. The problem is already very real and immediate; for example, bloodstream infection leading to sepsis is now responsible for more than half of all deaths in hospitals and is the most expensive condition treated in hospitals. Sepsis mortality rate increases >6% every hour without effective antibiotic treatment. Yet, despite the life and death urgency, and healthcare cost impacts, current methodologies require 3 days to determine the correct antibiotic.

Specific Diagnostics has developed a breakthrough solution to rapidly determine the effective antibiotic treatment for bloodstream and other acute infections. Used for bloodstream infection Specific’s solution provides results 2 days sooner than existing methods, saving patients suffering from drug-resistant infection.

We have been funded by nearly $30 M in non-dilutive government sponsored research support and recently $17.5 M in venture capital. This is an opportunity to join us at an inflection point in our commercial growth as we bring our first key product to market and with recognition from major customers fueling an expansion of our staff.
_The Job*_
_*_*This is the job for you if want to be where your ideas to be central to a world-changing and lifesaving product. Data science and analytics are at the core of our company we are seeking an exceptional talent to join our team. You will be a key contributor and critical to the success of the company. The main analysis tasks you are expected to contribute to are:
Analytical methods and statistical analysis for processing high-volume, temporal high-dimensional data streams generated in real-time from our proprietary sensor technology.
The development of data-driven visualization tools for the explorative analysis of high-dimensional data.
The application and development of suitable pre-processing, feature-selection and dimensional reduction techniques to detect, measure and account for data artifacts.
The development and validation of applications for a medical instrument built under the guidance of a senior manager experienced in the application development discipline (so you’ll be learning the valuable skill of integrating your work into applications for medical diagnostic devices).
Algorithm development for decisions and measurements from multi-dimensional data streams.
This is not the job for a numbers only person. We want someone with a passion for and experience in the sciences that will lead you to look deeply into the sources of the data along with the scientists so that the data analysis is influenced by the science of our diagnostic technology and the science is influenced by the analysis.
_You_*
You have a proven track record of successfully developing, validating and deploying data analysis and analytical methods to solve challenging real-world applications. You are deeply familiar with a broad range of analytical models and are at the pulse of developments in the field. Ideally you have proven expertise in the analysis of spatio-temporal data. You have a strong domain knowledge in the field of statistical analysis and signal processing. You should have a track record of success in your education and projects and have these characteristics and skills:
MS degree in computer sciences, biomedical engineering, or related field and at least 5 years of interesting relevant experience.
Expert in R and proficient with C++ and Python.
Expertise in analytical methods and statistical analysis.
Proficiency in SQL as well as NoSQL database technologies a plus.
Full fluency (verbal and written) of the English language is a must.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
relavent: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Specific Diagnostics
2.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
77,Business Intelligence & Analytics Manager,$66k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Intelligence & Analytics Manager
Charlotte, NC

InVue is a global company headquartered in Charlotte, NC which provides retailers, brands, and businesses with innovative sales enablement, software, and security solutions to increase their profits. Our products balance the need for an interactive customer experience with security and design requirements at retail. Our commitment to creative design and superior quality has earned the trust of the world’s top retailers and consumer technology brands.

The BI & Analytics Manager is charged with enhancing complex data models into simple and insightful visuals. You will work with Sales, Supply Chain, and other areas of the business to build data driven models to help make the InVue sales and supply chain teams more successful through implementing and optimizing processes such as sales reporting, incentives, lead management, forecasting, sales account strategy, and supply chain performance measurements and improvements. Having ability to understand, create and clarify KPI’s into actionable insights to improve business will allow you to contribute to our overall company success.

Responsibilities (not limited to):

Sales Management Programs
Manage Power BI dashboards, KPI’s, and scorecards for Sales Business Reviews with Sales Directors and Business Development Managers
Assist in building the structure and rhythm for maintaining account plans driven through our CRM and Opportunity Systems
Analysis of sales pricing approval systems and tiers
Provide support on communication and alignment between Sales & Product teams leading goal setting and management reporting
Supply Chain Programs
Build and manage Power BI dashboards and KPI’s to give insight as to delighting the customer
Warehouse analytics to enhance efficiencies and support growth
Working with Operations to establish and maintain a robust S&OP process
Help define reporting formats, ensure compliance, cadence, provide analysis and make recommendations
Other Duties
Monitor existing KPI metrics, developing new metrics, identity correlations and root causes
Performing regular system audits to ensure complete and accurate reporting of data metrics
Develop programs, methodologies, and reports for analyzing and presenting data for internal and external audiences
Invent new ways to define and measure program effectiveness and organizational productivity
Develop ETL procedures from multiple data sources as needed to meet business requirements
Qualifications:
5-10 years of commercial experience in Sales Operations and Sales Management, preferably working with high-growth sales organizations
Highly experienced in creating Power BI applications with a variety of data sources
Advanced skills in Excel and SQL a must
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Finance, Computer Science, or related field
Ability to decipher complex financial and sales data and translate into actionable, easy to understand information for the internal and external audiences
Experience working in a technology company; electronic components, manufacturing is a plus
Excellent analytical, critical thinking, and problem-solving skills
Ability to communicate technical information to non-technical business executives
Able to manage multiple projects and be self-motivated
Able to work in a fast paced, ever-changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication capabilities
Team player; can be nimble and manage multiple priorities in an entrepreneurial environment.
Able to travel globally, estimation <15>
About InVue:

InVue (www.invue.com) creates technology solutions for retailers, commercial businesses, and brands that improve customer profitability, efficiency, and security. Today, InVue partners with top retailers and brands like Samsung, Apple, Target, Microsoft, Lenovo, and Google around the world. InVue has been recognized as one of the fastest growing privately held companies in the U.S. by Inc. Magazine five of its eleven years in business.",4.1,"Invue
4.1","Charlotte, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Security Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
78,Data Analyst II,$53k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who is Cenlar?

You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst II.

Job Summary:

Responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies. Identifies and compiles data sets using a variety of tools (e.g. SQL, Access) to help predict, improve, and measure the success of key business to business outcomes. Responsible for documenting data requirements, data collection/processing/cleaning, and exploratory data analysis; which may include utilizing statistical models/algorithms and data visualization techniques. Incumbents in this role may often be referred to as Data Scientists.

Responsibilities:
Day-to-day actions are focused on administering defined procedures, analysis and report preparation.
Commands knowledge of data elements across the enterprise and industry – definitions, lineage and usage
Executes creation of tabular operational reports and aggregation reports with medium to high complexity.
Commands intermediate to expert level t-SQL coding proficiency
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Responsible for documenting metadata, data lineage, data definitions and business glossary entries.
Handles basic data transformation tasks such as date and decimal formatting, rounding of numeric values, and conversion of numeric values to percentages.
Has intermediate to expert level SSIS ETL build proficiency
Works with Data stewards to enforce adherence to standards for enhancements and new repositories.
Handles more complicated report requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing (e.g. Fibonacci or similar) and trend analysis.
Can deduce portfolio or market trends from reports or chart analysis.
Understands business logic for aggregation and analysis services.
Can perform data transformation and can produce dimensional reports
Can perform basic data profiling activities, understands cardinality
Helps to define guidelines for data management, governance and reporting
May direct day-to-day work of employees, but will not typically have formal management role.
Individual at this level is expected to use some independence of thought but to refer more complex problems to supervisors or other experts.
Individual would be expected to contribute to work flow or process change and redesign and to form a strong basic understanding of the specific product or process.
Qualifications:
Typically exhibits strong executional capabilities and is beginning to take on more responsibility.
Primary focus is on execution within defined parameters, with some expansion based on developing capabilities and or experiences. In partnership with more experienced staff.
Minimum of 5 years of experience.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, finance, mathematics, statistics (or similar) or equivalent work experience
Total Rewards:

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online.",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Ewing, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
79,Senior Scientist - Learning Technology,-1,"Title: Senior Scientist *(Learning Technology)
Purpose: *
The role of the Senior Scientist is to lead the planning, execution, and evaluation of applied research and development projects in support of defense, other government, or industry clients. Research topics will include the design and development of next-generation learning and development technologies, human performance assessment, and other related topics. The Senior Scientist will develop mission and business-relevant prototypes and practices, co-author papers and research proposals, execute research studies, and present findings. The Senior Scientist will also support management in business development efforts by managing an active portfolio of new and existing clients.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
· Serves as Principal Investigator and/or project manager on Federal and DoD research and development contracts related to learning, training, and educational technology and performance support technologies

· Leads and mentors multidisciplinary teams of learning science professionals

· Secures funding through proposal writing and other business development opportunities

· Manages relationships with government and industry clients, stakeholders, and end users

· Ensures project tasking is executed in an efficient way consistent with company and industry standards and scientific understanding
Qualifications: *
• U.S. Citizen

• Ph.D. in a field related to learning sciences, technology design, instructional design, applied psychology, human factors, or other relevant area of study _and_ 10+ years of related post-graduate work experience

• Subject matter expertise in technology-based training, human performance assessment, game-based training, simulation, immersive reality (e.g., AR, VR, MR), adaptive training, mobile learning or instructional design

• Experience performing on government research and development contracts and interacting with military and other government customers

• Experience leading experimental research projects

• Experience leading field data collection efforts

• Strong written and oral communication skills

• Familiarity with Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, SPSS
Work Environment: *
The majority (75%) of this position is situated in a typical office environment and includes the use of a computer (6-8 hours per day), telephone, and web-based video communications. The remaining 25% of time may include activities at customer sites such as military installations and other commercial industrial or office settings. Working in any field environment you may be exposed to the elements (hot or cold temperatures, sun, wind, snow, rain, etc.). Military installations may require work in wilderness settings and handling or being near live ammunition and weapons. Activities required will include traveling (flying or driving) for long periods, may require walking or standing for long durations (6-8 hours), crouching, kneeling, and carrying equipment. You may be required to wear additional safety equipment including but not limited to a helmet, eye and ear protection, safety vest, and steel-toed boots.
Travel: *
The Senior Scientist will be expected to travel up to 25% of working hours per month for the following purposes:

• Business development opportunities

• Conference presentations and attendance

• Team and organizational meetings (if remote)
Security Clearance: *
All employees must have or be capable of acquiring a Secret DoD security clearance. Guidelines indicating those items that may prevent you from obtaining a security clearance can be found here: http://www.fas.org/sgp/isoo/guidelines.html.
Background Check and Drug Testing: *
Our clients may require background checks and drug testing.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Company's website:
www.quantumimprovements.net
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/quantumimprovements
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Quantum Improvements Consulting
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
80,Cloud Data Engineer/Architect at ConsumerMedical,-1,"Cloud Data Engineer/Architect

ConsumerMedical

Norwell, MA or Bloomington, MN

COMPANY PROFILE

ConsumerMedical (www.consumermedical.com) is a leading healthcare decision support and clinical concierge company serving over 4 million individuals through some of the nation's largest employers, health plans and private exchanges. As a Medical Ally, ConsumerMedical (CM) guides participants throughout their healthcare journey with compassionate, high-touch support and deep clinical expertise.

ConsumerMedical offers a fully integrated suite of solutions including Medical Decision Support, Expert Medical Opinions, Claims Advocacy and more, helping individuals and families navigate the healthcare system while reducing unnecessary elective surgeries and driving patients to the highest quality providers. The result is better care for patients, more empowered healthcare decisions for employees and their families, and a better bottom line for business. The company is headquartered outside Boston in Norwell, MA.

We offer an opportunity to contribute immediately, have a voice that’s recognized, and make decisions that have impact while building a career with a fast-growing organization. ConsumerMedical offers a healthy work-life balance and is an inclusive employer seeking to foster a diverse and collaborative culture. We are currently seeking a full time Cloud Data Engineer/Architect to join our growing team.

GENERAL SUMMARY

Our data analytics/engineering teams are looking for a Cloud Data Engineer/Architect who wants to bring our platform(s) to the next level, expanding into new market opportunities. In undertaking this challenge, you will be working with data scientists, software engineers, and data providers to lead/maintain data models and transformations of that data. In this role, you will lead and be responsible for creating and maintaining end to end data pipelines for healthcare application(s) developed and managed in Azure Cloud Services. The pipelines include big data primarily from commercial healthcare claims, provider data, CMS and other proprietary quality and clinical data sources. All data and pipelines are used for machine learning and artificial intelligence to advance to and enhance applications which help ConsumerMedical maintain its leadership position in the 5 drivers of quality. This is a key role to a team who are at the forefront of the latest technologies and immersed in development on cloud services with new and emerging healthcare data sources.

Our team of industry experts work in a fast-paced, rapid-learning environment in software development, working with massive data sets, and healthcare data analytics. In our environment, everyone is encouraged to make a difference without experiencing the fixed ways of doing business in larger, bureaucratic organizations.

Cloud Data Engineer/Architect Job Responsibilities:

Data engineering leadership and architecture responsible to collect, aggregate, store, and reconcile data to Azure in support of healthcare business decisions.
Design and build data pipelines, data streams, and data services on Azure which drive data driven, qualitative, quality insights and application enhancement / search results.
Build / architect processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
Architect / deliver modern data solutions leveraging components like Azure functions, Azure Data Factory, Data Flows, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL, Azure Data Bricks, Streaming Analytics and related
Enable data pipelines between structured and unstructured data sources and company’s Enterprise Data Warehouse on Azure through a continuous process of data scrapping, structure transformation cleansing and formatting in SQL / Python
Working with Data Scientists, Engineering and Physicians to build an enhanced data ecosystem and build new integrated solutions to provide a holistic set of industry-leading data and analytic capabilities including Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and real-time insights
Support business users on functional and data requirements to enhance data models and pipelines
Technologies include:
SQL
Python
JavaScript
Elasticsearch, Kibana, Logstash
Azure Data Technologies, specifically Databricks, Data Factory, Blob storage
Snowflake Data Warehouse
Prepare, clean, aggregate and interpret big data (billions+ rows) in support of advanced analytic projects across the organization
Ideal candidate will have a knack for big picture/critical thinking, as well as enjoy being very hands-on in a fast paced, innovative environment.

Cloud Data Engineer/Architect Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Data Science, or related field
3+ years of experience architecting and building Azure Big Data architecture, Enterprise Analytics Solutions, and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience with Design and Architecture of Azure big data frameworks/tools: Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Bricks, Azure ML, SQL Data Warehouse, HDInsight
Strong background in Big Data and Cloud technologies:
Preferred: Azure (Azure Functions, Azure SQL Database, Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Blob), Snowflake Data Warehouse);
Similar: Hadoop, PySpark, Hive, Big Query, AWS (EC2, RDS, CloudFormation, S3), Google Cloud Platform.
Strong background in distributed data processing and software engineering, can build high-quality, scalable data products.
Deep technical knowledge of data architectures, databases, data modeling and data infrastructure in the cloud (i.e.- Azure, AWS, Google Cloud)
Experience designing and developing data cleansing routines utilizing typical data quality functions involving standardization, transformation, rationalization, linking and matching
Deep hands-on experience with SQL including ability to write, analyze, and debug SQL and Python
Highly skilled in areas of structured data (e.g. join types, inner, outer), understanding of when tables should/shouldn’t have duplicates (many to many; 1 to many joins)
Experience with Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Computer Vision and/or Conversational/NLP applications
Ideal candidate has healthcare, pharmaceutical or biomedical data experience with a focus on improved patient care, quality of care, patient engagement, provider experience, and system efficiency
Experience with code deployment in Azure Databricks environment preferred.
Knowledge of data, master data and metadata related standards, processes and technology
Strong hands on experience with data core modernization and data ingestion
Preferred experience with Snowflake Data Warehouse systems
Experience in designing and implementing scalable, distributed systems leveraging cloud computing technologies like Microsoft Azure, AWS EC2, and AWS Elastic Map
Familiarity with DevOps tools like Azure DevOps, Jenkins, Maven etc.
Experience working with Azure data integration techniques & self-service data preparation.
Assist business users on functional and data requirements to enhance data models and pipelines

Please submit resume and cover letter for consideration.

Disclaimers:

Applicants, as well as position incumbents, who become disabled as defined under the Americans with Disabilities Act must be able to perform the essential job functions (as listed) either unaided or with the assistance of a reasonable accommodation to be determined by management on a case by case basis.

ConsumerMedical is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity. Applicants for employment and employees are reviewed on their individual qualifications for a position. Under no circumstances will ConsumerMedical discriminate against qualified persons on the basis of race, color, religious creed, retaliation, national origin, ancestry, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity/expression, disability, mental illness, genetics, choice of health insurance, marital status, age, veteran status, or any other basis prohibited under applicable law.",3.7,"Insight Performance
3.7","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
81,Senior Product Data Analyst,$49k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"About us:

Kiva (kiva.org) is an international nonprofit with a mission to expand financial access to help underserved communities thrive. We run a global marketplace platform to crowdfund microloans for financially excluded entrepreneurs, farmers and students around the world. Our organization combines the culture and technological passion of an internet start-up with the compassion and empathy of a non-profit to create impact and opportunity at global scale. Since 2005, we have raised more than $1.4 billion in loan capital for 3.6 million borrowers in 95 countries. Our lenders fund over $13 million in loans every month. With offices in San Francisco, Portland, New York, Nairobi, and Bangkok, Kiva's team includes 100+ employees and 400+ volunteers worldwide. Our team is growing as we pursue exciting new opportunities to create a financially inclusive world.

Role overview:

As a Senior Product Data Analyst at Kiva, you'll be responsible for leading analytics initiatives that affect lenders, borrowers and Kiva staff around the world. We are seeking someone who is passionate about the Kiva mission and has a track record of developing actionable product insights, driving data self-service, and providing analytics thought leadership. This role will be responsible for delivering customer-focused data insights that inform the product roadmap and broader Kiva strategy, delivering ongoing trend analysis into drivers of Kiva's key product metrics, and leading Kiva's analytics roadmap.

At this time, we can only consider applicants with authorization to work in the United States on a permanent, full-time basis; unfortunately we cannot provide visa sponsorship.

Key responsibilities include:
Be a senior voice in the organization, discovering customer-focused data insights that inform and lead the direction of Kiva's product
Conduct exploratory analysis to understand the drivers of Kiva's current product performance and to identify new opportunities for product features and experiments (e.g., customer segmentation, pathing analysis)
Design and measure the impact of product experiments, synthesize learnings, and inform and update Kiva's strategic hypotheses
Perform ongoing trend analysis to inform day-to-day decisions by defining metrics, building critical company dashboards, and sharing out ad hoc analysis
Disseminate learnings across the business, to product managers, engineers, marketers, and up through senior and executive leadership
Contribute, alongside data science, to the development of our shared data layer
Provide leadership on a range of analytics work occurring across the company, including mentoring data users in support of self-service
Preferred qualifications:
5+ years experience in data analytics, business analytics, data science, economics, statistics or related field
Consistent record of conducting proactive data analysis, distilling actionable takeaways, making recommendations, and helping the business act on those recommendations
Experience designing and evaluating statistical tests, including multivariate tests with non-binary outcome variables
Well-versed in SQL and facile with Python, R or other statistical packages
Strong presentation and communication skills, with experience working with cross-functional stakeholders and executives
Comfortable extensively using BI tools (e.g., Looker, Tableau)
Experience mentoring others strongly preferred
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and drive change.
Passionate about Kiva and its long term potential.
What we offer:
An opportunity to improve real lives, solve hard problems, and change the world
Friendly, supportive, and adventurous environment with a team of engaged colleagues
A comprehensive, industry-leading benefits package
Opportunities to connect with and learn from colleagues and partners around the world
A diverse and inclusive workplace where we learn from each other is an integral part of Kiva's culture. We actively welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. We are an equal opportunity employer and a great place to work. Join us and help us achieve our mission!

We will only accept applications directly from candidates. Kiva will not be responsible for any recruiting agency fees, absent a formal agreement.

#LI-CY1",4.2,"Kiva.org
4.2","Portland, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Nonprofit Organization,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
82,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
83,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,$109k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
84,Senior Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Benson Hill empowers innovators to develop more healthy, tasty and sustainable food by unlocking the natural genetic diversity of plants. Benson Hill's CropOS platform combines machine learning and big data with breeding techniques and plant biology to drastically accelerate and simplify the product development process. This platform allows for cost-effective and more efficient ways for companies to analyze and make improvements in plant genetics. Benson Hill brings a unique and holistic approach to our product and platform development, as we span a broader workflow involving trait and seed development, genome editing, and breeding all the way to creating better ingredients and varieties that tap a strong consumer demand for more flavorful and nutritious fruits and vegetables. More information can be found online at www.bensonhill.com. Follow us on Twitter at @BensonHillInc.

Our Purpose and Core Values

Our Core Values are a set of common principles we share that are fundamental to our company's identity.
Be Bold! We redefine boundaries by providing new solutions to difficult problems. Together we are driven to transform the future and will not allow the fear of failure to prevent us from innovating. We voice our opinions, embrace change, and challenge each other to think creatively.
Be Inspired! We redefine boundaries by providing new solutions to difficult problems. Together we are driven to transform the future and will not allow the fear of failure to prevent us from innovating. We voice our opinions, embrace change, and challenge each other to think creatively.
Be Real! We understand who we are, what we want to achieve, and what it takes to get there. We hold each other accountable through timely, candid, and well-intentioned feedback. Together we engage in honest communication and healthy debate that leads to success through true alignment.
Department Overview

The Data Science & Platform Engineering Department leads the development of Benson Hill's crop design platform, CropOS which combines machine learning and big data with genome editing and plant biology to accelerate and simplify the product development process. The team partners with the Research & Development teams on the development of a portfolio of offerings (commercial, product, or platform related) that meet the needs of Benson Hill's business units.

Position Summary

We are actively seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our rapidly growing Research and Development Department. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing models enabling field experimental design and optimization of product performance across testing environments. This person will work closely with Benson Hill data engineers, scientists and project leaders to maximize the impact of Benson Hill's product development programs.

You Will:

(Essential Duties and Responsibilities)
Develop and refine data analysis, storage, and modeling systems.
Conduct independent analyses of performance, and use advanced approaches to identify predictive models in a geospatial framework.
Participate in the design of hypothesis-driven experiments and analyses.
Perform spatial and statistical analysis on experimental outputs and interpret results
Communicate results in written and visual formats to scientists and program leaders.
Identify opportunities for model enhancements and opportunities for new models to create value in the product discovery and testing pipeline.
You Have:

Education
PhD preferred (minimum BS plus 4 years' experience), in applied mathematics, physics, engineering, statistics, ecology, or closely related field with formal training in statistics and experimental design, with demonstrable track record of peer-reviewed publications.
Experience
Demonstrated enthusiasm for data-driven discovery.
Experience with geospatial analyses, modeling, and interactive system development.
Highly developed ability to identify and evaluate predictive models and their utility.
Experience with machine learning and statistical concepts, packages and libraries.
Background and experience analyzing data with Python, R, or Julia.
Expert with at least one scripting language, Python or R preferred.
Ability to work in collaborative team, and the ability to respond positively to critiques of work.
Excellent communication skills, both electronic and in-person.
A track record of producing deliverables and meeting tight release deadlines.
Ability to work autonomously, identify key tasks, and find solutions to challenges.
Experience organizing and planning complex projects
Strong record of personal development and learning new technologies.
Software/Skillset
Strong understanding of scientific concepts, approaches, application, and interpretation.
Demonstrated experience with common machine learning approaches, statistics, geospatial and command line (e.g. R) applications.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in associated area, with proven publication and communication track record.
Familiarity with crop science and agronomic applications and modeling a plus.
Background and experience using AWS or experience with other cloud architectures
Other
Attention to detail
Strong Customer Focus
Collaborative
Ability to focus and work independently with little direction
We have a Total Rewards Package at Benson Hill that consists of more than just your paycheck. Total Rewards at Benson Hill covers Pay (salary and bonus), Health (employer benefit contributions) and Wealth (investments). Some of the perks include:
A Collaborative Environment
A flexible PTO program with a focus on work/life balance
Competitive medical benefits and retirement savings plan
FREE Dental and Vision Coverage
Education reimbursement
PAID parental leave
And more.",3.0,"Benson Hill
3.0","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
85,Quantitative Specialist/Senior Quantitative Analyst,$90k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Financial
Monitoring Group (FMG) within the Supervision, Regulation and Credit (SRC)
department seeks a motivated senior quantitative analyst/quantitative
specialist to support the monitoring of retail credit risk for the nation’s
largest banks. FMG produces quarterly risk reports and identifies
emerging trends in retail lending using supervisory data. More recently, FMG
has developed new monthly analytics and reporting to track the impact of the
current pandemic on retail credit. The group also provides analytical and
examination support to Federal Reserve System committees in activities related
to retail credit risk, including the annual Comprehensive Capital Analysis and
Review (CCAR) assessment and other System work.

The successful candidate will have an interest in analyzing data trends in
banking and economic activity, as well as telling the story behind the data in
written or presentation format. In addition to strong communication
skills, the candidate should have the ability to work both collaboratively and
independently. Strong time management and project management skills are
desired. This role provides an opportunity to interact with various System
groups, including the Large Institution Supervision Coordinating Committee
(LISCC) and Large and Foreign Banking Organizations (LFBO) management groups.
The ability to manipulate and perform analysis of large datasets is required,
preferably using SAS or SQL. Experience with a data visualization
tool, such as Tableau, is a plus.

This position requires access to confidential supervisory information and/or
FOMC information, which is limited to “Protected Individuals” as defined in the
U.S. federal immigration law. Protected Individuals include, but are not
limited to, U.S. citizens, U.S. nationals, and U.S. permanent residents who
either are not yet eligible to apply for naturalization or who have applied for
naturalization within the requisite timeframe. Candidates who are permanent
residents must sign a declaration of intent to become a U.S. citizen when
eligible to do so and pursue a path to citizenship. Candidates who are not U.S.
citizens or U.S. permanent residents may be eligible for the information access
required for this position if they sign a declaration of intent to become
a permanent resident and a U.S. citizen and meet other eligibility
requirements. In addition, all candidates must undergo an applicable background
check and comply with all applicable information handling rules.

To
be considered for the position, please submit a resume and cover letter.

About
the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia:

The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia is one of the 12 regional Reserve Banks that,
together with the Board of Governors in Washington, D.C., make up the Federal
Reserve System. It helps formulate and implement monetary policy,
supervises banks and bank and savings and loan holding companies, and provides
financial services to depository institutions and the federal
government. The Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia serves eastern and
central Pennsylvania, southern New Jersey, and Delaware.

Background
investigations including drug testing are required for all new hires as a
condition of employment, after the job offer is made. Employment may not begin until the Bank
accepts the results of the background investigation.

To
see the full job description, click the link:

https://www.philadelphiafed.org/-/media/7db2d139fc344d92adbcb55302b39bc3.ashx

To
Apply:

Go
to https://www.philadelphiafed.org/careers/job-openings.cfm
and find the ""Quantitative Specialist/Senior Quantitative Analyst""
position.
We offer a great benefits package that features:
Medical (4 options),
Prescription, Dental (3 options), and Vision Insurance
401k/Thrift Plan with
generous employer match
Employer-funded Pension
Plan
Paid Vacation/Sick Time
& Holidays
Monthly Commuter
Allowance
Flexible Spending
Accounts and Healthcare Spending Accounts
Flexible Work Schedule
available in most departments
Tuition Reimbursement
Parental Leave
Onsite 24/7 Fitness
Center including training classes, Peloton bikes and locker room / shower
facilities
Onsite Cafeteria and
Coffee Shop
Additional convenience benefits,
discounts and more…
The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia believes that diversity and inclusion among our
employees is essential to our success as an organization, and we want to
recruit, develop and retain the most accomplished people from a diverse
candidate pool. To support a workplace culture of belonging, we offer seven
employee resource groups (ERGs) and a 100 percent rating on the Human Rights
Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equality Index. The Federal Reserve Bank of
Philadelphia is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia
3.6","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1914,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
86,Senior Analytics Manager,$96k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"The analytic team Magnify is looking for a Manager who will help to organize and develop analysis to support client deliverables, identify opportunities to support client objectives, and responsible for team oversight and coordination to meet and exceed client expectations.

· Work collaboratively with team members to develop project specifications and timelines (30%)

· Meet with analytic, business and technical teams to resolve open issues (20%)

· Management and execution of multiple analytics projects (15%)

· Communicate regularly with both team members and clients (15%)

· Assist with post-project analysis and documentation (15%)

· Additional duties as needed (5%)

· Highly proficient utilizing SQL and SAS to manipulate, arrange, query and present data

· Experience with complex problem solving – data manipulation, data quality, data modeling, statistical analysis and/or reporting

· Excellent interpersonal skills with people at all management and organizational levels

· Ability to respond in an effective and timely manner

· Subject matter expert in an analytics specialty

· BA / BS in Statistics, Mathematics, Econometrics or computer science

· Min 5-year experiences as analytics team lead or manager
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Detroit, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,Cannabis Laboratory Lead Scientist-2 years experience required,-1,"Bay City, MI, United States

Therapeutic Health Choices, LLC (THC) is a cannabis safety testing laboratory. It provides analytical chemistry and microbiology testing services for cannabis cultivators and processors as mandated by the state of Michigan. THC is a small, privately held company that provides access to a healthcare and 401(k) plan. It offers an exceptional work environment and long-term growth opportunities in an expanding market. If you work smart, play hard, and want to use your technical skills in a rapidly expanding laboratory sector, we’d love to hear from you!

Essential functions*:

Technical
Oversees day to day operations by managing multiple analytical projects related to the development, qualification and/or troubleshooting of sensitive, efficient, and reliable assays for a wide class of molecules simultaneously.
Prepares, reviews, and edits method transfer, qualification, and validation protocols, analytical technical reports, and regulatory documentation.
Ensures test results are accurate and valid.
Maintains equipment and instruments in good operating condition recognize any malfunctions and troubleshoot as needed.
Completes routine preventive maintenance and troubleshooting on instruments and equipment.
Provides technical expertise and advises project representatives/teams on topics pertaining to assay analysis and development. Often presents findings and/or results to client senior management.
Provides technical guidance to others in resolving challenging issues relating to analytical methods.
Validate reporting requirements in the statewide monitoring system.
Performs other tasks as specified by the manager/director and/or duties required and published by regulatory agencies.
Regulatory
May act in the capacity of a Cannabis Laboratory Testing Analyst.
Ensures compliance with all regulatory agency requirements (MRA, LARA, ISO, etc.) through documentation, audits, and corrective action.
Participate in the development of new SOPs, validations new tests
Performs quality control procedures to ensure accuracy of clinical data.
Participates in the updating of departmental standard operating procedures and database to accurately reflect the current practices.
Responsible for maintaining updated understanding and knowledge of the methods employed in the laboratory.
Ensure employment of personnel who are competent to perform test procedures, and report test results promptly, accurately, and proficiently.
JOB REQUIREMENTS*
Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: *
_Experience in cannabis safety testing is not necessary but __highly__desirable._
Thorough understanding of analytical technology, method development, method qualification/validation, and regulatory analytical requirements.
Laboratory experience performing method development, qualification, and validation activities.
Ability to multi-task and work in a fast-paced, changing, and challenging environment.
Regulatory experience preferred.
Proven ability to successfully work in a team environment.
Superior oral and written communication skills.
Ability to make independent decisions.
Competencies (“soft skills"", traits, behaviors): *
Leadership, self-motivated, shows initiative, results oriented, creative thinker, detail oriented, focused on continuous development, effective time-management skills.
Education/Experience: *
PhD or MS in analytical chemistry or related discipline with previous cannabis safety testing experience.
PhD in analytical chemistry or related discipline, with 2+ years relevant experience
MS in analytical chemistry or related discipline, with 3+ years relevant experience
Job Type: * Full-time
Salary: *
Language: *English (Required)
Work authorization: * United States (Required)
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
analytical chemistry: 2 years (Required)
cannabis: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Therapeutic Health Choice,"Bay City, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
88,Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"26-Aug-2020

Job ID
301660BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""ONE Global Discovery Chemistry Community working across 7 disease areas at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is seeking a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to join our Computer-Aided Drug Discovery (CADD) Department in Cambridge, MA. The successful candidate will join an energizing and collaborative research organization, working alongside colleagues who are dedicated to improving human health through the discovery of transformative medicines.

We are seeking an outstanding data scientist with the skills, experience and passion to extract new knowledge and ground-breaking insights from the expanded body of data collected by one of the world’s leading pharmaceutical companies. You will be a member of our global CADD group, an interdisciplinary team of expert molecular modelers, cheminformaticians, and data scientists. Teamed up with domain specialists from biology, chemistry and translational medicine, this is a unique opportunity to develop and apply cutting-edge machine learning technologies to uncover insights to real-world drug discovery problems and innovate paths to transformative medicines.

What you'll do:
Develop and implement approaches for extracting patterns and correlations from both internal and external data sources using machine learning toolkits
Develop workflows for conducting comparative analysis among Novartis’ diverse data sources as well as generalizing approaches crafted in-house or externally.
Enable open-source solutions for internal use and implement cutting-edge published scientific methods.
Develop customized machine learning solutions including data querying and knowledge extraction.
Interact and be part of matrixed project teams to drive effective decision-making by mining and developing predictive models
Develop skills in the area of cheminformatics and drug discovery and improve those to accelerate development of novel machine learning algorithms
Know the latest breakthroughs in scientific literature and interact with scientists to integrate data science technologies
Posting Title
Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
89,Finance Data Analyst Internship - Paid,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Finance Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Finance Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Design, develop, implement and maintain various dashboards and tools.
Utilize SQL and VBA to create tools to increase efficiency in financial processes.
Support the finance department with SQL queries (querying data) and ad hoc analytical tasks.
Gain exposure to multiple business units including Corporate Finance, Accounting, Credit Research / Analysis, Tax, Operations and Corporate Audit.
Enhance technical and financial skills through on-the-job experience and training.

Minimum Requirements
Candidates must be pursuing a Bachelor's degree related to Finance, IT, or Analytics.
SQL or relevant programming experience preferred.
Demonstrate strong problem solving, analytical, leadership and communication skills.
Ability to work on tasks independently.
Microsoft Excel skills required, Access skills a plus.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First-class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
90,Data Scientist,$67k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"STRATACACHE provides salable customer experiences, empowering retailers to learn deeply about their customers’ shopping preferences and behaviors, allowing for personalized shopper interaction. Our solutions deliver consumer activation at the point-of-decision, generating new sales opportunities and enhanced retail profitability. With 3 million+ software activations globally, we power the biggest digital networks for the world’s largest brands. Across the STRATACACHE family of complementary digital media/ad tech solution companies, we have the technology, expertise and track record to bring retail innovation that delivers results.

Learn more about the STRATACACHE family at www.stratacache.com.

Data Scientist

Do you love data? Do you enjoy creating statistical models and finding insights that make a difference? Are you interested in the future of retail, commerce, and customer analytics? If so, this is the role for you. In this role you will have the opportunity to work with software engineering, sales, and product organizations to develop innovative, impactful data applications. Your efforts will enhance the overall product quality utilizing many aspects of data science, including various types of modeling that drive toward strategic analytics. You will be focused on the future of the restaurant and retail experience by discovering insights while creating strategic, marketing, retail, customer experience and digital analytics. Your background in statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quantitative research, and/or analytics consulting will be very beneficial as you take on this exciting position in the company and join our Data Science team. In this role you will also have the opportunity to continue to build and improve the marketing of technology products that are influenced by data, understand human behavior and determine how to influence and impact the retail marketplace with exciting new solutions and insights.

Responsibilities include:

Design, build, and deliver statistical models and related actionable data-focused results to support product and customer requirements and initiatives.
Work closely with engineering, product and sales teams to understand business and technical requirements, translate these into important discovery directives, and follow through to optimize and support the enhancement and growth of Stratacache products.
Establish and make effective use of internal and external datasets to back up and support key strategic, product, and customer decision-making efforts.
Serve as the data science expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives and education on accessing and utilizing qualified and focused data for decision making.
Analyze, propose, design and successfully deliver data experiments for engineering, product and sales teams to ensure statistical rigor and effectiveness.
Provide expertise and professionalism in handling sensitive, privacy-protected data, including sources, structures, organization, and optimization.
Communicate complex ideas about our product through visual aids like charts and dashboards.
Keep up-to-date with emerging data science and statistical technologies, methods and practices.
Create and/or use existing data models for predictions regarding user behavior.
Communicate ideas, processes, and results to all levels of internal and external clients and teams.
Basic & Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Analysis, or other technical field related to software development.
Minimum 3 years of related experience working with data science and statistical modeling.
Experience in the QSR, retail or ecommerce industries from a data perspective is required.
Experience with recommendation engines and discovering new and advanced modeling methods i.e. deep neural networks, gradient boosted decision trees, etc.. is required.
Experience with SQL and at least one functional or statistical programming language is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with R and Python is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with REST APIs is required.
Experience working with Postgres, Timescale DB and/or other related database technologies is required.
Ability to distill complex statistical concepts and methodology, and articulate insights to cross-functional teams and clients with varying levels of knowledge in this space is required.
Ability to work with distributed and remote teams is required.
Experience with complex query writing is required.
Experience with result-set performance tuning and related data administration is required.
Experience with big data technologies is required.
Experience and understanding of various statistical modeling tools and platforms is required.
Experience in ecommerce, wifi, app messaging, social and other datasets is beneficial.
Experience in machine learning and artificial intelligence methods and practice is beneficial.
Understanding and experience with database technologies is beneficial including Oracle, SQLServer, etc..
Understanding and experience with BI technologies is beneficial: Tableau, Microstrategy, Microsoft, OBI, etc..
Experience with kafka, Go, or Redis is beneficial.
Understanding of data modeling techniques and star schemas is beneficial.
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce is beneficial.
Experience with ftp, file transfers, data exchange methodologies.
A solid understanding of methodology, data and systems from a broad range of research and analytics providers, including emerging tools and methods is required.
Ability to articulate and tie data to business strategy.
Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint skills
Self-motivated, self-starter with a team-centric focus while working in a fluid environment.
Exceptional communication skills: verbal, written, and presentation.
Experience in the following areas: strategic analytics, marketing analytics, digital analytics, data analytics, statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quant research, analytics consulting.
Desire and interest to uncover and discover insights using disparate data sources.
Desire and interest in being the “Go To” person for data science.
Dynamic personality and passion for data, analytics, visualizations and storytelling is beneficial for this role.
Keen sense of user interface design, style, aesthetics and effective visual presentation.
Experience with agile development methodologies.
Ability to work effectively in fast-paced, results-oriented work environment.
Ability to handle and adjust to change in requirements and direction.
Positive attitude, attention to detail, and great problem solving skills are important.

STRATACACHE and its family of companies provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition, veteran, marital, parental, citizenship, or domestic partner status, or any other status protected by applicable national, federal, state or local law.

While we are excited and appreciate you interest in our opportunities, please keep in mind that we are not able to contact all applicants that have applied.

No vendor/agency solicitation please.",3.6,"STRATACACHE
3.6","Malvern, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
91,Data Scientist,$80k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.7,"IFG Companies
2.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
92,Automated Cell Based Assay Scientist,-1,"Currently, Spectrix Analytical Services, LLC is searching for candidates for one long term, permanent position in Redwood City CA.
Job Responsibilities*
· Completion of routine cell cultures, along with performing the cell-based screening assays

· Collecting and providing assay data QC/QA, and uploading the assay data.
Job Requirements: *
· BS in Biology or a related field with at least 2 years of experience or MS with 0-1 years of experience in cell culture and cell-based assays.

· Should be highly detail-oriented and flexible, with proficiency in general computer skills, and Microsoft Office suite, as well as a high accountability and ownership for projects.

· Must be self-motivating, have excellent interpersonal and communication skills, be able to multi-task, be highly organized, have the ability to work in a multi-functional team setting, and adhere to specific timelines and deadlines.

· Ability and desire to master new skills, methods and technologies in a technology-enabled environment are very important.

· Ability to work well with all team members, have a positive customer service focus, and be reliable is essential for the position.

· Ability to document work in notebook, summarize observations, trouble-shoot, and present work in small group setting required.

· Job location is Redwood City, California

Spectrix offers flexible schedules, competitive salaries and a committed work environment; the company provides automatic benefits of life insurance, short and long term disabilities. Optional benefits include health, dental, and a retirement savings plan. Spectrix is not a placement agency. Spectrix is participating in the E-Verify program of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (phone number: 888-897-7781, and website: www.dhs.gov/E-Verify). 20200521
Job Type: Full-time*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
cell culture: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Spectrix Analytical Services, LLC
4.0","Redwood City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Contract,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
93,Process Control Scientist,$44k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Come Be Part of a Mission that Matters!*
WHO IS NEOGEN: *
From farm to fork, we offer solutions to enhance the quality, quantity and safety of the global food supply. Our food safety diagnostics are used within farming operations to the production facilities of most of the world’s best-known food companies. Neogen’s solutions are critical to the health and well-being of our customers’ operations – and in turn their consumers. *What we do matters!*
Neogen’s culture combines stability with a deep believe in providing professional and personal growth. Our *Pillars of Trust* – the principles which guide our everyday decision—making, include *Openness, Honesty, Credibility, Respect, and Service* . It’s the belief in these characteristics that provide a consistent, happy and healthy work environment for our employees.
Neogen is looking for a Process Control Scientist to design and conduct experimentations to determine root cause for product variability. The Process Control Scientist will analyze and communicate their information (ex. audit findings, status updates, process improvements) to the Process Control Manager. Demonstrates up-to-date expertise of products and documentation systems, and applies this expertise to the development, execution, and improvement of precision plans.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities* include the following. Other duties may be assigned.
Designs and conducts in-depth experiments to resolve instances of process failure.
Coordinates process audits of Lansing based operations including written audit findings, corrective actions; performs follow up and closure.
Assists with in-depth audits when questions regarding process control arise.
Analyzes experimental data and bases conclusions on said data.
Designs experiments to determine critical process points.
Be present for customer, government and 3rd party certification audits, assisting with corrective action follow up/closure.
Ensure documentation complies with cGMP and ISO requirements; gives feedback to improve the documentation.
Qualifications: *
Knowledge and experience in laboratory techniques and process development.
Strong communication skills.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment, managing multiple projects with attention to meeting project milestones and timelines.
Ability to work effectively as a member of a project team, interacting with members of other departments including R&D groups, Sales & Marketing, Business Development, Manufacturing, Quality Control and Technical Service.
Education and/or Experience: *
BS in Chemistry, Microbiology, or Biochemistry or related field with 3+ years laboratory experience
or
MS in Chemistry, Microbiology, or Biochemistry or related field with 2+ years laboratory experience
or
PhD in Chemistry, Microbiology, or Biochemistry or related field.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $35,000.00 - $40,000.00 per year",2.7,"Neogen
2.7","Lansing, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
94,Lead Data Scientist,$102k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.7,"TRANZACT
3.7","Fort Lee, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Content function

We are One. That’s the foundation of our company culture at TVH. We’re the worldwide leading supplier of quality replacement parts, safety equipment, and accessories for the material handling and industrial equipment industry. We’re seeking a Business Intelligence Analyst that Partners with the business to gather business requirements for reporting and design and implement various analytical reports based on requirements defined by business users. Translate requirements and ideas into creative and statistically driven solutions.

Essential Functions & Responsibilities

Work closely with business partners to analyse and understand business processes to create and design insightful and intuitive reports
Leverage understanding of business intelligence software to advise the business on best practices in order to deliver the most valuable insights, including:
Advising stakeholders on your views and ideas in order to optimize the reports to be efficient and effective
Understands the impact of one's actions on others and demonstrates respect for others
Effectively communicate findings and solutions to a variety of audiences.
Provide advice and support to executives, managers, clients, and other stakeholders in using business intelligence dashboards
Propose changes that make the BI solutions more efficient and/or reduce operation or maintenance cost
Lead reporting projects from business requirements gathering to delivery
Facilitate communication and understanding between business users and data team
Take ownership of all assigned tasks and project related assignments
Organize and lead meetings with the business and project teams
Profile
Support prioritization of scope based on end user needs and business value
Report project progress at all levels, including management and/or the stakeholders

Ensure the quality, validity and accuracy of reporting provided to the business including detecting and adjusting abnormalities or errors within the reports

Share and define best practice for business intelligence reporting, including:

Develop and implement organizational reporting standards
Collaborate with business users regarding standardization and delivery
Share best practices with other Business Intelligence Analysts and Developers and the IT team in general
Analyze and recommend new ideas and opportunities to streamline processes, address inefficiencies and increase business satisfaction

Deliver business intelligence reporting training to business users as required and address functionality questions to promote the usage of Business Intelligence tools within the organization

Update and maintain professional knowledge and gain insights in business intelligence solutions, tools, and practices including participation in training, staying current with business processes and practices, and enhancing expertise in this area

Travel internationally up to 10% to collaborate with Belgian colleagues

Offer

Education & Skills

Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university in Business, Information Technology, Management, Business Administration, or another applicable field

Must possess a minimum of two years work experience performing a substantially similar role working in functional or business analysis for an ERP system in the specified business area
Demonstrated interest and/or experience working with business intelligence tools and/or reporting
Demonstrates proficient knowledge of business ERP systems with a focus on financial modules including data analysis, typical business processes, reporting, and interdependencies on other ERP modules
Proven track record in project management, planning, implementing, and communicating technical information
Demonstrated ability to work independently, take initiative and effectively manage multiple projects and changes quickly and effectively
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel

Desirable qualifications:

Experience, knowledge, and/or training with visualization tools (Tableau, Qlikview, BigQuery)
Experience, knowledge, and/or training with the Agile/Scrum methodology
Project management and Stakeholder management experience

TVH offers a competitive benefits package including medical, dental, and vision insurance, access to an onsite health clinic for you and your family, vacation and sick time, a retirement plan. And, if you need to take a quick break, take a lap around the TVH campus and earn points through our Wellness program or grab your laptop for a quick walk on one of the treadmills located on our Olathe campus. That’s just the start. Want to learn more and see our dynamic work environment? Apply today to join the TVH team.

EEO/AA/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans",4.0,"TVH Group / mateco GmbH
4.0","Olathe, KS",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
96,Data Scientist,$94k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will conduct sophisticated data analysis to help address critical business and member questions, the outputs of which enable members to drive improvements in clinical, operational, and economic outcomes.

Responsibilities:

Provide analysis to identify critical issues/questions around member performance.

Conduct exploratory data analysis from complex, disparate data sources to recognize patterns, and identify member performance improvement opportunities.

Generate hypotheses and analyze data to test and interpret results.

Design and develop data models to predict member outcomes or future impact of key member decisions.

Communicate findings from exploratory and predictive data analysis broadly to team and leaders.

Identify improvement opportunities in reporting and BI tools and collaborate with Products Technology to implement enhancements.

Serve as the resident data expert and share best practices/approaches for statistics, machine learning techniques, data modeling, simulation and advanced mathematics.

Collaborate with key leaders and clinicians to build analytical acumen across all analytic roles in the organization.

Qualifications:

Relevant degree preferred. Advanced degree a plus.

5 or more years of relevant work experience.

Proficient programming experience using SAS/Python/R.

Demonstrated ability to manage large disparate data sets and using quantitative and qualitative analysis.

Experience effectively communicating and presenting data to a variety of audiences required.

Experience working with health care administrative claims data (ICD-10, MS-DRG, CPT/HCPCS) or electronic medical record data tools (Epic Clarity/Caboodle, Cerner CCL-Discern/PowerInsight) strongly preferred.

#LI-DM

#IDS

Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",4.0,"Vizient, Inc.
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
97,Associate Data Scientist – Network Analysis and Control,$73k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE’s Infrastructure and Networking Technical Center is looking for a motivated and passionate early career data scientist to join our Network Analytics department. As part of a collaborative team of scientists and engineers, you will have an opportunity to apply machine learning and data-centric approaches to complex networks. Our multidisciplinary team thrives on the opportunity to tackle new challenges in the public interest, looking for solutions that no one else has considered. We approach problems with an entrepreneurial mindset, a willingness to take risks, and a desire to advance the state of the art for intelligent networks, all while contributing to MITRE’s mission of Solving Problems for a Safer World.

Responsibilities include:
Develop prototypes of intelligent network capabilities in MITRE advanced labs
Work on collaborative research teams to develop innovative solutions using commercial and MITRE developed technologies
Conduct performance assessments of current and emerging technologies
Execute data science research beginning at data wrangling and cleaning all the way through to reporting and visualization
Scale solutions to work across large enterprises and large data sets
Analyze data from network sensor systems and integrate additional data sources for improved outcomes
Communicate technical approach and findings to internal and external stakeholders
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in related fields outlined below, or equivalent knowledge and skills.
Computer Science
Software Engineering
Electrical Engineering
Mathematics
Information Systems, Information Technology, SW Engineering
Operations Research
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
A passion for technology and a desire to learn
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems
Knowledge of various machine learning paradigms (deep learning, reinforcement learning, neural networks, etc.) with an understanding of mathematical underpinnings of various models
Hands-on software development skills in a modern programming language (e.g. Python, R, Scala, Java)
Working knowledge of data science workflow from data acquisition to reporting findings
Strong understanding of streaming and batch data workflows, including message queues, processing directed acyclic graphs (DAGs) and data stores
Obtain and maintain a Secret level security clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or similar field
Experience working with Big Data tools (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, Kafka)
Experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, Elasticsearch)
Familiarity with cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure
Experience conducting original research using data science techniques, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations leveraging a modern programming language
Familiarity with basic networking and security concepts/capabilities such as TCP/IP stack, routing, and firewalls
Exposure to network programmability concepts such as software define networking and programmable data planes
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
98,Clinical Laboratory Scientist PM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Night shift
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
99,NLP Data Engineer,-1,"Job Description:
The Opportunity:


Are you interested in changing the world of work? We’re building a world-class analytics team to apply data science to the soft side of how work gets done. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history; come join us!

Workhuman is seeking a Natural Language Processing (NLP) Data Engineer to join our Workhuman iQ team as a domain expert. This role is responsible for developing infrastructures and platforms for a wide variety of NLP /AI and data analytics products. The person will work with data scientists and engineering teams to build products that uncover insights hidden in recognition moments across dozens of countries for our customers, the industry and our company.

The projects that our team work on are built from the ground up and we look for individuals who want to take ownership and implement solutions independently and thrive in a collaborative environment. Your work will be project-oriented, and you will often be responsible for bringing together the needs of data scientists, engineering team, product managers and other internal customers to provide viable solutions and communicating your thoughts effectively.

This position will report to the NLP Manager.

Main duties & responsibilities:
Work with Engineering and Architect teams to implement data pipeline on AWS (including data collection, data pre-processing, data sampling and validation) for Workhuman data products
Partner and collaborate with Data Scientists to build training pipeline to facilitate the training of large-scale machine learning models for Workhuman AI products
Implement processes to gather usage data generated from Workhuman AI products and build tools to facilitate performance analysis
Develop cloud-based platforms and web apps for launching Workhuman AI and analytics products
Develop tools to facilitate data review and analysis
Required skills and experience:

Bachelor’s (or above) degree in software engineer, computer science, computer engineering, data engineering or other related field
3+ years of industry experience in software development, data engineering, or related field
Experience with and track record of building data pipeline for machine learning product
Strong knowledge of AWS (S3, EC2, GLUE)
Experience with AWS Sagemaker
Good in programming languages such as: Python, Spark, and Java
Good understanding with state-of-art machine learning framework such as: Tensorflow, Pytorch, Pandas, Scikit-learn, Keras, etc.
Knowledge with web app development such as: database, REST API and cloud
Practical knowledge of data processing needs and trade-offs
Comfortable handling a high volume of work daily
Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
Willingness to support several projects at one time, and to accept reprioritization as necessary
Experience with process design and documentation
Preferred skills:

Exposure to ML, NLP, and deep learning methods
Knowledge with the front-end languages such as: Javascript, HTML, React, or CSS
Experience with developing back end and front end of web applications for data analytics and business intelligence apps
Experience with working with large-scale of text data across languages
Understanding in model inferencing, monitoring, feedback loop and data capture in real time at scale
The Company:


Workhuman® is the world’s fastest-growing integrated Social Recognition® and continuous performance management platform. Our human applications are shaping the future of work by helping organizations connect culture to shared purpose. With a consistent stream of gratitude fueling unparalleled, provocative workplace data and human insights, Workhuman® Cloud is a critical software engine for global companies seeking to motivate and empower their people to do the best work of their lives. Workhuman® (formerly known as Globoforce) was founded in 1999 and is co-headquartered in Framingham, Mass., and Dublin, Ireland.

Did you know:
We are #1 Great Place to Work in Ireland for the 2019 medium-sized workplace category and have been named one of the 2018 Top Places to Work in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe
Workhuman® is used by 4.5 million employees across 160 countries.
Our core values are; Respect, Determination, Innovation and Imagination
Perks & Benefits for our Happy Healthy Humans:
Comprehensive Health Plans
Fully paid parental leave (12-week maternity/4-week paternity) effective day 1
Peer-to-peer recognition program
401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Commuter bus from downtown Boston
On-site fitness center
Wellness rewards and reimbursements
Fully stocked kitchen (cold brew on tap - snacks and coffee machines as far as the eye can see…)
Regular celebrations for employees, families and special guests
At Workhuman, we love what we do because we’re shaping the future of work through our people and our technology. Our human cloud-based applications are helping some of the world’s leading global brands connect culture to shared purpose. The Workhuman Cloud empowers employees to thank, talk and celebrate each other, creating an environment that sparks gratitude and human connection while increasing employee engagement and productivity.

Workhuman is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees. We proudly provide a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. Employment decisions at Workhuman are based on solely on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Workhuman believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.",4.3,"Workhuman
4.3",Tennessee,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
100,Senior Data Analyst,$81k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Company:
Industrious is the largest premium workplace provider in the U.S. with nearly 100 locations in more than 50 U.S. cities. Its Workplace Experience platform, which pairs thoughtfully-designed spaces with hospitality-driven services and amenities, has reshaped the concept of coworking into a scalable solution for companies of all sizes and stages. Since its founding in 2013, Industrious has helped thousands of companies scale their businesses while maintaining the highest NPS scores in the industry. For more information, visit www.industriousoffice.com.
As we shape the future of workplace experience, we're looking for motivated, thoughtful, and collaborative people who are excited to join a high-growth, warm, and welcoming team. For more information, please visit www.industriousoffice.com/careers.

About the Role:
As the Data Analyst at Industrious, you are responsible for building the data-models that underpin our analytics and reporting. You have a flexible skillset: someone who is adept with SQL code, is experienced in ad-hoc data-modeling, and can partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse.

This is an amazing role for a curious, analytical mind who is excited to touch all elements of the business and lay the foundation for analytics and insights.

You are a great fit for this role if:
You are eager to sit at the intersection of technology and analysis
You are an independent operator who can build from the ground up
Data engineering? Data analysis? Data science? You want to work with all three pieces of the analytics cycle
Responsibilities:
Partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse
Develop the Redshift/Snowflake models that underpin our analytics and reporting
Serve as the bridge between our Analytics and Technology teams
Requirements:
Very strong SQL skills (preferably Postgresql)
Experience creating ad-hoc databases (e.g., using DBT or equivalent)
Experience transforming and analyzing large datasets
Demonstrated ability to learn new technologies and techniques
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science, Mathematics or similarly quantitative/technical field
Experience in analytics or a technical field
Preferred qualifications:
Experience with Data Lakes (e.g., (Redshift/Snowflake preferred) and proven ability to produce scalable solutions
Experience with connectors (e.g., FiveTran, Stitch)
Experience with visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Looker)
Experience working in a cloud-based environment (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google-Cloud)

Perks:

In addition to our incredible team, there are lots of other fun reasons to work with us.
Daily breakfast, snacks, coffee, tea, and drinks at all Industrious locations
Health care, including vision and dental
401K plan
Generous vacation time
Paid parental leave
Industrious in the News:
Industrious CEO Sees Company as Less Risky Than WeWork
Industrious' Jamie Hodari on the Return to Work
Coworking Spaces Prepare To Welcome People Back, Expect the Industry To Grow
Industrious is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. Industrious believes that diversity is critical to our success in delivering great workplace experiences and is committed to creating an inclusive, mutually respectful environment which celebrates diversity of our people. We seek to hire on the basis of merit, competence, performance, and business needs.

#LI-LC1",3.6,"Industrious
3.6","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Membership Organizations,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
101,Data Scientist,-1,"Sartorius Stedim Data Analytics, a market leader in advanced analytics and provider of Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions, is on a strong growth path driving new innovative solutions in the field. It currently has an outstanding opportunity for a Data Scientist to drive customer applications, support the Sartorius sales teams and feedback customer needs into the development of new solutions. The incumbent for this key role will have a strong customer focus to help secure innovation and growth from both new and existing customers.

What you can look forward to
Assisting customers in solving business related problems using advanced data analysis and data driven technologies
Supporting implementation of advanced analytics in industry
Analyzing large amounts of data and building data driven models
Initiating, leading and driving customer projects
Training customers on the use of our software
Supporting sales (pre/post)
Supporting marketing & development
Performing regular follow up with customers to track satisfaction, secure project momentum and discover additional opportunities
Creating technical documents
Attending and presenting at conferences, seminars and forums
Developing & cultivating strong relationships with external and internal stakeholders
Being part of a team of data scientists
Skills and experience
Minimum of a bachelor's degree (master’s degree preferred) in a relevant field (engineering, life sciences, informatics, automation/control, etc.)
Minimum two years’ work experience within Biopharma or Pharma
Minimum two years’ working knowledge of applied statistics including MVDA, DOE, MSPC, PAT, QbD, Model Predictive Control (MPC), MMPC, AI/Machine learning
Strong bioprocess knowledge preferred
Familiarity with Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions preferred (MODDE, SIMCA, SIMCA-online, Control Advisor, Active Dashboard)
Working knowledge of prescriptive analytics a plus
Working knowledge of Python scripting preferred
Working knowledge of MATLAB, data historians and control strategies a plus
Teaching, consulting and project management experience a plus
Excellent communications skills, strong presentation skills
Comfortable working independently
Comfortable working from home office, willingness to travel (~25%)
Strong identification with Sartorius core values: sustainability, openness, enjoyment
Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organization suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognized for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans.

Please view equal employment opportunity posters provided by OFCCP here

E-Verify Participation Info

E-Verify Workers Rights

Interested? Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organisation suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognised for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

To find out more about Sartorius as an employer visit us on Sartorius Careers

Become part of our global team.",3.7,"Sartorius
3.7",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
102,Business Intelligence Analyst & Developer,$36k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Everyone wants to work with people they respect. Even better if you can work with a company you respect. We have both at The David J. Joseph Company, and a 135+ year track record on operating an ethical business with a positive work culture. It may sound cliché, but it’s true. We’re a big, global company that still feels small.

Working at the David J. Joseph Company is unique. We offer employment in diverse settings such as traditional corporate headquarters, dynamic sales locations, and scrap recycling facilities. This workplace diversity gives our employees the variety they crave and the exposure to a global business. A career at The David J. Joseph Company is ideal for self-starters seeking to make an impact on our company and their careers.

The David J. Joseph Company (DJJ), founded in 1885, is a world leader in scrap metal recycling & trading. With over 80+ locations, the Joseph Company is headquartered in Cincinnati, Ohio and is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nucor Corporation (NUE) a Fortune 200 Company.

Responsibilities
Performs solution design, development, testing, debugging and maintenance for one or more of the following enterprise data team areas of responsibility:
Enterprise data modeling
ETL systems
BI semantic layers
Dashboards and reports
Ad-hoc data analysis
Participates in requirements gathering, design sessions, fact-finding and prototyping activities to drive business adoption of data products.
Documents detailed solution specifications, data mappings, test cases and maintenance routines.
Works collaboratively with other team members to evolve best practices and team standards for data visualization, data modeling, or data integration.
Develops and maintains knowledge of customer’s business by learning through a mix of project work, partnering with business users, and seeking out learning opportunities.
Participates, along with other team members, in a support rotation, handling system triage and resolving user-facing tickets.
Delivers solutions that are optimized for performance and proactively tunes and refactors existing solutions.
Develops and refines new and existing data products to ensure data quality and single source of truth.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Computer Science or Business-related discipline is preferred. Equivalent combination of experience and education will be considered.
Minimum 2 – 5 years related experience including working knowledge of relational databases, data warehouse environments, and SQL.
Minimum 2 – 5 years related experience with business intelligence, data integration or data analytics tools and languages (for example: MicroStrategy, PowerBI, Tableau, MDX, multidimensional or tabular cubes; ETL development; R, Python).
Preferred experience utilizing source control systems to perform development tasks (git or TFS).
Preferred experience developing cloud-based data solutions (Azure, SnowFlake, RedShift, etc.)
Demonstrates working knowledge, practical skills and the ability to perform work under moderate supervision.
Must be detail-oriented with the ability to manage multiple assignments effectively.
Requires effective communication skills to convey status, ideas and concepts in a team environment.
Requires professional demeanor with a high degree of flexibility, responsiveness and self-direction.
Benefits


We offer a competitive compensation and benefit package including paid training, bonus program, medical, dental, vision, life and disability coverage, vacation, paid holidays, a 401(k) plan with match, tuition reimbursement and other great benefits.

EEO Statement


The David J Joseph Company (DJJ) is a drug-free workplace and conducts pre-employment testing as a condition of employment.DJJ is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, lactation/breastfeeding, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, age, marital status, familial status, disability, genetic information, protected veteran status, military status, or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal laws, rules, or regulations. DJJ hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled. If you’d like more information on your EEO rights under the law, please click here.

DJJ reasonably accommodates qualified individuals with disabilities to enable them to receive equal employment opportunity and/or perform the essential functions of the job, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship to the Company. This applies to all applicants and teammates.DJJ also provides a work environment in which each teammate is able to be productive and work to the best of his or her ability. We do not condone or tolerate an atmosphere of intimidation or harassment. We expect and require the cooperation of all teammates in maintaining an atmosphere free from discrimination and harassment with mutual respect by and for all teammates and applicants.

E-Verify Information | E-Verify Notice

EJN


EJN",4.5,"The David J. Joseph Company
4.5","Cincinnati, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1885,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Metals Brokers,Mining & Metals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
103,"Data Scientist II/III, Drug Safety",$83k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist II/III will research into innovative scientific approaches to enhancing understanding of therapeutic target safety liabilities and proposing rational risk mitigation strategies for various drug development projects by mining, processing, and analyzing large amounts of structured and unstructured preclinical and clinical data.

As an employee of Boehringer Ingelheim, you will actively contribute to the discovery, development and delivery of our products to our patients and customers. Our global presence provides opportunity for all employees to collaborate internationally, offering visibility and opportunity to directly contribute to the companies' success. We realize that our strength and competitive advantage lie with our people. We support our employees in a number of ways to foster a healthy working environment, meaningful work, diversity and inclusion, mobility, networking and work-life balance. Our competitive compensation and benefit programs reflect Boehringer Ingelheim's high regard for our employees.

Duties & Responsibilities:

Independently access, curate, visualize, and analyze large volumes of data to bring structure and derive insights into ambiguous problems.
Independently perform target safety assessments for novel therapeutic targets based on public data and knowledge base.
Independently implement text-mining to help address unresolved, complex drug safety-associated questions.
Independently design and develop robust algorithms for in-house scientific platforms using machine learning, natural language processing (NLP) techniques, etc.
Communicate new ideas, findings, research areas and opportunities to advance drug research and development (i.e., publish peer-reviewed literature, deliver oral & written presentations at internal/external expert meetings); Reports and treats data with a high level of integrity and ethics.

Data Scientist II Requirements:

B.S. degree from an accredited institution with three-plus (3+) years of experience; or M.S. degree from an accredited institution with zero-plus (0+) years of experience in Data Science/Analytics, Computer Science, Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Statistics, or similar area(s) of study.

Data Scientist III Requirements:

B.S. degree from an accredited institution with seven (7) years of experience; or M.S. degree from an accredited institution with three-plus (3+) years of experience in Data Science/Analytics, Computer Science, Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Statistics, or similar area(s) of study.

Other Requirements:

Strong knowledge of data mining algorithms and statistics.
Experience in data mining in the context of molecular biology, pharmacology, toxicology, and/or clinical trials is a huge plus.
Experience in NLP technologies and analyses
Good understanding of molecular or cell biology, pharmacology, toxicology, or medicine
Proficiency with programming languages (e.g., Python, R, or Java) is a must-have
Experience with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure)
Familiarity with LIMS systems and/or experience with data visualization tool (e.g., Tableau, JReview, Spotfire) is a plus
Strong verbal & written communication and record-keeping skills.
Demonstrated ability to multi-task and work effectively in highly collaborative and diverse team environment.

Eligibility Requirements:

Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without restriction.
Must be willing to take a drug test and post-offer physical (if required).
Must be 18 years of age or older.

Who We Are:

At Boehringer Ingelheim we create value through innovation with one clear goal: to improve the lives of patients. We develop breakthrough therapies and innovative healthcare solutions in areas of unmet medical need for both humans and animals. As a family owned company we focus on long term performance. We are powered by 50.000 employees globally who nurture a diverse, collaborative and inclusive culture. Learning and development for all employees is key because your growth is our growth.

Want to learn more? Visit boehringer-ingelheim.com and join us in our effort to make more health.

Boehringer Ingelheim, including Boehringer Ingelheim Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Boehringer Ingelheim USA, Boehringer Ingelheim Animal Health USA Inc., Boehringer Ingelheim Animal Health Puerto Rico LLC and Boehringer Ingelheim Fremont, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; citizenship status, marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition; physical or psychiatric disability; veteran or military status; domestic violence victim status; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.

#LI-SS1

Job - Research & Development
Primary Location - Americas-US-CT-Ridgefield
Other Locations - Americas-United States
Organization - US-BI Pharma/BI USA
Schedule - Full-time",3.9,"Boehringer Ingelheim
3.9","Ridgefield, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1885,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
104,Clinical Lab Scientist l,-1,"JOB DESCRIPTION & *
COMPETENCY EVALUATION *
POSITION TITLE: *Clinical Laboratory Scientist *JOB CODE: *121
DEPARTMENT: *Clinical Laboratory (7060) *SALARY GRADE: *
REPORTS TO: *Department Manager, Clinical Laboratory *EXEMPT/NON: *Non-exempt
Position Summary: *
Under general supervision and medical direction, performs laboratory test procedures in a manner that provides accurate, timely, and meaningful results.

This position requires the full understanding and active participation in fulfilling the Mission of the Organization. It is expected that the employee will demonstrate behavior consistent with the Core Values. The employee shall support the
Organization’s strategic plan and the goals and direction of the Performance Improvement Plan (PIP).
General Accountabilities: *
_The following are essential job functions and accountabilities *_
_ *_*
Demonstrates an understanding of the District’s guest relations’ policies and programs by initiating and maintaining positive relations with patients, patient families, visitor, medical staff members and other employees of Oak Valley
Hospital District (OVHD), regardless of age, cultural or ethnic backgrounds.
Understands and adheres to hospital requirements for the assessment and provision of care which considers the personal, cultural, spiritual and/or ethnic beliefs of patients.
Assures that the rights of all patients are respected and maintained by allowing for privacy, confidentiality, and dignity in the provision of service.
Demonstrates the ability to follow the Standards of Behavior.
Maintains current professional licenses and/or certifications as and when required by state, regulatory agency, or hospital mandate.
Demonstrates knowledge of, and adheres to, all applicable professional regulatory practice acts, state/federal regulations and policies and procedures of OVHD, including JCAHO, Title XXII and requirements of other regulatory agencies, as applicable.
Identifies patients at risk for abuse and/or neglect, as well as associated signs and symptoms. Adheres to mandatory reporting requirements for healthcare professionals per Administrative Policy & Procedure.
Practices Universal Precautions while providing care and performing other hospital services.
Demonstrates the knowledge and skills to safely and appropriately fulfill job specific responsibilities related to safety, security, emergency preparedness, control of hazardous materials/waste, life safety, medical equipment and utility systems as outlined in the hospitals environment of care plan. Observes safety precautions to ensure a safe environment for patients, patient families and guests of all ages. Adheres to National Patient Safety Goals (NPSG).
Actively supports the organizations mission, vision, values and goals. Participates in activities within the organization that support performance improvement.
Meets current hospital standards as defined by the Oak Valley Hospital District Employee Handbook and the hospital’s
Administrative Policy and Procedure Manual.

Job Description
Laboratory Scientist
Meets the age specific clinical, interpersonal and interactive responsibilities, as outlined in the Human Resources
Policy and Procedure _“Age-Specific Interpersonal and Interactive Relationships”._
Meets the clinical competency requirements as outlined in the Department Specific Skills Checklist.
Meets State of California standards by completing an annual TB test during the established time frame, in accordance with OVHD established TB testing schedule.
Reviews the job description with the designated supervisor during the annual performance appraisal and recommends changes, as necessary.
Position Accountabilities: *
_The following are general job accountabilities *_
_ *_*
Demonstrates the skill to appropriately utilized multiple computer systems and L.I.S.
Demonstrates good communication skills to ensure continuity of care as it pertains to laboratory testing, including relaying information to supervisor, relaying information between shifts, relaying information to the Supervisor and relaying of information between shifts.
Acts as a resource for orientation and training of new employees. Disseminates accurate and complete information.
Judiciously uses supplies and suggests cost saving measures. Ensures appropriate use of inventory and its management.
Is courteous and professional with patients, coworkers and visitors.
_*_
_ *The following are unit-specific accountabilities *_
_ *_*
Read and follow all policies and procedures
Perform quality control on all test systems as required and document corrective action
Operate analyzer according to manufactures specifications and perform maintenance as required
Evaluate sample integrity and reject compromised specimen
Accurately enter test results and document read back
Assist in the work up of new test systems as directed by Medical Director
Communicate problems to supervisor or Medical Director as necessary
Oversee the duties of Lab Assistant I/II. Direct as necessary
Correlate Clinical Data
Phone all alert value results and document read back.
Position Qualifications: *
Minimum Education: *
BS/BA in chemical, physical, biological or laboratory science
Minimum Experience/Skills: *
One (1) year experience as a technologist in a laboratory is preferred

2
_The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. *_
_ *_*

Job Description
Laboratory Scientist

Able to perform basic mathematical calculations
Licenses/Certificates/Credentials: *
Current CA license as a Clinical Laboratory Scientist
Physical Demands: *
Prolonged, extensive or considerable standing/walking
Lifts, positions, pushes up to 50 pounds
Considerable reaching, stooping, bending, kneeling, crouching
Manual dexterity and mobility
Ability to move quickly
Vision Requirements: *
Ability to adjust vision sufficiently to perform duties
Working Conditions: *
Regularly exposed to the risk of contagious and blood borne diseases
Subject to varying and unpredictable situations
Exposure to unpleasant elements (accidents, injuries, illness)
Emergency and crisis situations
Subject to irregular hours
Increased stress due to multiple calls and inquiries
Occasional exposure to radiation hazards, radioactive substances and biohazard material

3
_The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. *_
_ *_*

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $15.24 - $17.31 per hour

Work Remotely:
No",-1,OAK VALLEY HOSPITAL DISTRICT,"Oakdale, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
105,Contract Data Analyst,$54k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Contract Data Analyst located in Rosslyn, VA. The successful candidate must have A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree with a major in any field, that includes or is supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization. Also, a minimum of 2 years of experience serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities and Skills:

Knowledge of WAWF eBusiness processes.
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process.
Knowledge of contracting principles, laws regulation and procedures.
Knowledge of methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems.
Knowledge and Experience of the WAWF eBusienss Suite, to include: iRAPT, EDA, IUID, CDR, MyInvoice, and Contract Closeout.
Good verbal, analytical and written communication skills.
Good organizational skills in tracking data and actions.
Knowledge and Experience writing professional documents.
Knowledge and Experience in Customer Service.
Skilled in Business Intelligence Reporting.
Proficient in the use of the Microsoft suite of applications including Word, SharePoint, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Project as well as with Adobe Acrobat.

Supported Technologies:
Integrative Acquisition Environment
DOD acquisition system

Qualifications:

Required Skills and Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and preferred majors are accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization.
2 years of experience required in serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Knowledge of Federal and DOD acquisition procedures

Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.
Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.
Physical Demands
Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",4.1,"Amyx, Inc.
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
106,"Sr. Director, Office of Data Science",$232k-$367k (Glassdoor Est.),"Advance your career at Liberty Mutual Insurance - A Fortune 100 Company!

Job Summary:

As the Senior Director, Office of Data Science, you will manage the Office of Data Science function for Corporate Actuarial. Responsible for leading and advancing data science at Liberty by improving collaboration and coordination of data science teams/departments across the enterprise including business embedded data science teams, technology, and product. Provides updates on initaitives to the Liberty Mutual Executive Leadership team. Manages a team of 10+ staff comprised of data scientists and product owners. Key responsibility is establishing and executing a data science vision and strategy across Liberty. Applies comprehensive knowledge of the business operations and data science abilities to identify opportunities and influence the courses of action of key stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

Develop and implement a Data Science Talent Strategy that support business needs and drives business value through the support and partnership of the DSPRG and T&ES.
Guide Data Science Technology initiatives through product ownership with an emphasis on self-service data science.Responsible for enabling rapid experimentation and adoption of Data Science, AI, and realize their potential in production. Supports and champion data science initiatives to enhance business collaboration, value, & success.
Cultivate Data Science excellence to create a sustained competitive advantage including tactical experimentation to improve standards and tools.
Act as a cross functional leader on high visibility and impact DS related efforts that span the enterprise.

Qualifications:

Minimum of ten years in leadership roles and at least ten years of data science related experience. Demonstrated ability to integrate data science strategies and programs across multiple functions. Strong experience effectively influencing at all levels of the organization. Must possess strong analytical, strategic, project management, decision-making and problem-solving skills. Excellent communication and interpersonal skills. Bachelor`s Degree required, advanced degree preferred. Strong business acumen with an understanding of insurance operations and the procedures of Financial, Underwriting, Claims, Statistical, Technology, Legal and Sales departments.

Deep knowledge of predictive analytic techniques and statistical diagnostics of models. Expert knowledge of predictive toolset, with the ability to drive thinking about appropriate tool usage. Proven ability to lead and drive projects and assignments to completion through others, to include prior experience effectively managing talent. Exchanges ideas and conveys complex information clearly and concisely, verbally, visually (presentations and exhibits), and in writing, consistent with the audiences and stakeholders with which s/he interacts up to and including SBU/Corp Dept leadership and enterprise wide. Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills required to establish and build effective relationships within and outside the organization and company. Regularly interacts with senior executives. Demonstrated ability to anticipate areas of senior management concern, integrate different perspectives, and respond accordingly.

Benefits:We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview: At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
107,Data Analytics Engineer,-1,"Our Data Analytics Engineer will engineer elegant and performant analytic code, predominantly in Scala (and Spark), Python and/or R. You will join a growing multi-disciplinary team of Data Scientists, Engineers, and Solutions Experts with deep domain knowledge working to develop new capabilities and workflows to solve real- world client problems.

Your work will include notebook-style ad hoc analytic development (similar to tools such as Beaker, Julia, Zeppelin) within the QOMPLX:OS SaaS platform as well as true server-side analytic development. Projects may include near real-time and batch-oriented data processing for analytics and simulation modeling. As an internal user of the QOMPLX platform, your experience will inform the development of the QOMPLX product suite to improve capability, usability and performance.

Our ideal candidate will have a strong work ethic, fantastic attitude and be comfortable tackling any challenge set before him or her. We provide significant flexibility and autonomy to team members, have high expectations and expect everyone to contribute meaningfully to our broader collective goals.

Responsibilities
Engineer data pipelines that handle collection, parsing, cleansing and enrichment of terabytes/petabytes of data to meet the clients analytics needs
Developing state-of-the-art analytics ranging from ad hoc analysis to production-grade pipelines and workflows
Providing mathematical algorithms and implementations to serve the needs of data analysis workflows in QOMPLXs modular SaaS platform
Build model management frameworks for data analytics that include both statistical and machine learning models
Understanding customer business challenges and sourcing the most appropriate data sets, algorithms, and architectures (using QOMPLX OS) to solve them quickly and cost-effectively
Own the end to end model development lifecycle and establish and adhere to best practices
Working collaboratively to ensure consistent and performant approaches for analytical code that is integrated with our commercial offerings
Interacting directly with Product, Business Analysts and Customer Success teams to support live customer deployments
Qualifications
Reside in the greater Washington D.C. area or able to relocate
Bachelor's Degree or 8 years of relevant work experience
2+ years of data analytics experience that includes data engineering & analytics
Proven expertise in Machine learning algorithms, libraries & technologies including Neural Networks
Expert knowledge of Scala and/or Python
Expert knowledge of SQL and NoSQL technologies
Experience with agile development within commercial projects or elite non-commercial research
Adept at learning and applying new technologies and solving new problems
Hands on expertise in data analytic technologies such as Apache Spark, Apache Flink, MLOps Pipelines and notebooks like Polynote/Jupyter
Experience blending analytic and simulation modeling approaches to problem solving
Effective organizational skills with strong attention to detail
Strong communication skills - both written and verbal
Desirable
Experience with graph databases and cyber security
Advanced mathematical modeling skills
About QOMPLX

QOMPLX applies artificial intelligence to solve complex, real-world problems at scale. Our Human+AI operating system, QOMPLX:OS, blends capabilities ranging from data handling, analytics, and reporting to advanced algorithms, simulations, and machine learning, enabling decisions that are just-in-time, just-in-place, and just-in-context. If this type of environment sounds exciting reach out to us directly via application at https://www.QOMPLX .com/careers with a resume and cover letter.

QOMPLX offers a competitive salary, a full range of benefits, including 401(k) and medical, dental & vision coverage, flexible Personal Time Off (PTO) plan and 10+ paid holiday days per year",3.4,"QOMPLX
3.4","Tysons Corner, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
108,Clinical Laboratory Senior Scientist - Tatitlek Federal Services,$99k-$194k (Glassdoor Est.),"_Job specifications are intended to present a descriptive list of the range of duties performed by employees. Specifications are not intended to reflect all duties performed within the job. The employer retains the right to change or assign other duties to this position._ *Essential Duties and Responsibilities: * _Essential functions are intended to present a descriptive list of the range of duties performed by employees. This list of essential functions is not intended to reflect every duty that may be performed within the job._ * Serves as the Clinical Laboratory Senior Scientist for high-complexity labs analyzing samples under the specialty of Microbiology/subspecialty-Virology accredited under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Program (CLIP). * Provide full time on-site support to be available to the laboratory and provide oversight and recommendations/guidance as specified in this PWS. * The Clinical Laboratory Senior Scientist is responsible for the selection of the test methodology that is appropriate for the clinical use of the test results. * Establish a quality control program appropriate for the testing performed and establish the parameters for acceptable levels of analytic performance and ensuring that these levels are maintained throughout the entire testing process from the initial receipt of the specimen, through sample analysis and reporting of test results. * Identify training needs and assure that each individual performing tests receives regular in-service training and education appropriate for the type and complexity of the laboratory services performed. * Provide feedback to the Government on the performance of individuals responsible for high complexity testing at least semiannually during the first year the individual tests patient specimens. Thereafter, feedback must be provided to the Government at least annually unless test methodology or instrumentation changes, in which case, prior to reporting sample results, the individual’s performance must be reevaluated by the Government to include the use of the new test methodology or instrumentation. * Provide information to the Clinical Lab Director as requested * As requested, produce/compile/present data from samples analyzed by the lab to answer questions being put forward to support DA and DoD guidance and Senior Leader needs * Maintain direct mentorship and provide daily feedback to the technical individuals conducting the tests responsible for the technical and scientific oversight of the laboratory through feedback provided to the Government. * Responsible for the verification of the test procedures performed and establishment of the laboratory’s test performance characteristics, including the precision and accuracy of each test and test system. * Resolving technical problems and ensuring that remedial actions are taken whenever test systems deviate from the laboratory’s established performance specifications; * Ensuring that sample results are not reported until all corrective actions have been taken and the test system is functioning properly. * Verifying the competency of all testing personnel and assuring that the staff maintain their competency to perform test procedures and report test results promptly, accurately and proficiently. The procedures for evaluation of the competency of the staff must include, but are not limited to— * Direct observations of routine patient test performance, including patient preparation, if applicable, specimen handling, processing and testing; * Monitoring the recording and re- porting of test results; * Review of intermediate test results or worksheets, quality control records, proficiency testing results, and preventive maintenance records; * Direct observation of performance of instrument maintenance and function checks; * Assessment of test performance through testing previously analyzed specimens, internal blind testing samples or external proficiency testing samples; and * Assessment of problem solving skills. *Non-Essential Duties: * * Other duties as assigned *Required Skills* *Education and Experience* *The Clinical Laboratory Senior Scientist must qualify under one of the following options: * * Be a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the State in which the laboratory is located and be certified in clinical pathology by the American Board of Pathology or the American Osteopathic Board of Pathology or possess qualifications that are equivalent to those required for such certification. * Be a doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathy, or doctor of podiatric medicine licensed to practice medicine, osteopathy, or podiatry in the State in which the laboratory is located and have at least 1 year of laboratory training or experience, or both, in high complexity testing within the specialty of microbiology with a minimum of 6 months experience in high complexity testing within the subspecialty of virology. * Have an earned doctoral degree in a chemical, physical, biological or clinical laboratory science from an accredited institution and have at least 1 year of laboratory training or experience, or both, in high complexity testing within the specialty of microbiology with a minimum of 6 months experience in high complexity testing within the subspecialty of virology. * Have earned a master’s degree in a chemical, physical, biological, or clinical laboratory science or medical technology from an accredited institution and have at least 2 years of laboratory training or experience, or both, in high complexity testing within the specialty of microbiology with a minimum of 6 months experience in high complexity testing within the subspecialty of virology. * Have earned a bachelor’s degree in a chemical, physical or biological science or medical technology from an accredited institution and have at least 4 years of laboratory training or experience, or both, in high complexity testing within the specialty of microbiology with a minimum of 6 months experience in high complexity testing within the subspecialty of virology. *Physical Requirements: * _The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions._ While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk or hear. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. *Working Conditions: * _Work Environment characteristics described here are representative of those that must be borne by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions._ Job is performed in an office setting with exposure to computer screens and requires extensive use of a computer, keyboard, mouse and multi-line telephone system. *Additional Qualifying Factors: * Must have a satisfactory background screening, negative drug test, positive references and proof of identity and legal authorization to work in the United States and for TTI are required. The Tatitlek Corporation gives hiring, promotion, training and retention preference to Tatitlek shareholders, shareholder descendants and shareholder spouses who meet the minimum qualifications for the job. As an equal opportunity employer, The Tatitlek Corporation recognizes that our strength lies in our people. Discrimination and all unlawful harassment, including sexual harassment, in employment is not tolerated. We encourage success based on our individual merits and abilities without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or employment. We support and obey laws that prohibit discrimination everywhere we do business. Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Health insurance * Paid time off * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * laboratory: 4 years (Required) Education: * Doctorate (Required)",3.2,"The Tatitlek Corporation
3.2","Aberdeen Proving Ground, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Municipal Governments,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
109,Lead Data Engineer,$83k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a data engineer in Zipcar’s data engineering team, your mission is to build real-time and offline solutions to make data accessible and reliable while leveraging the largest-scale data processing technologies in the world -- and then apply them to the Zipcar's most critical and fundamental data problems.

What you will do:
Build and own mission critical data pipelines that power Zipcar’s business
Develop solutions in bleeding-edge data technologies on AWS eco-system
Partner with architects and data analysts to make the best technology decisions
Create and maintain data models, data catalogs, and data security
Mentor team members and assist them in developing, testing and deploying software
What you’ll love about being a Zipster in Engineering:
You’ll get to come to work every day knowing that you’re contributing to the success of the world’s leading car sharing network
You'll be joining a collaborative, diverse, passionate team of Zipsters
You’ll get to work in a flexible work environment that is innovative and resourceful
At Zipcar, we encourage new tools and ideas- your opinion always matters!
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer scienceor related field
5+years’ experiencewith data engineering or data warehousing, or an equivalent data-oriented software engineering background
5+ years’ experience with SQL, optimizing queries and tuning database performance
3+years’ experiencewith key AWS technologies (Redshift, S3, IAM;alsoKinesis, Lambda, EMR, Spark, Hive)
3+years’ experiencewith ETL technologies (e.g. Talend, Informatica,Matillion)
4+years’ experiencewith Java, Python,Scalaand other programming languages
Experience withdbtand Airflow a strong plus
Familiarity with data analysis and data science tools (Looker,Jupyter, R) is a plus
What tops off the tank:
Competitive Medical, Dental, Vision, Life and Disability Insurance and other voluntary benefits through our parent company, Avis Budget Group
Generous paid time off, including holidays, vacation, personal, sick, volunteer and Parental Leave options
Up to $5,500/year tuition reimbursement
Tax-free benefit for public transportation or parking expenses
Bicycle Reimbursement program
401(k) Retirement Plan with company matched contributions
Free Zipcar Membership and other employee discounts, including discounts on renting and buying Avis/Budget cars
Community involvement opportunities
Who are we?

Glad you asked! Zipcar is the world’s leading car-sharing network, found in urban areas and university campuses in more than 500 cities and towns. Our team is smart, creative and fun, and we’re driven by a mission – to enable simple and responsible urban living.

Being a Zipcar member gives you easy access to a car nearby without all the cost and hassle of owning one. Founded in 2000, Zipcar disrupted – or innovated – the traditional model of car ownership and independent studies show that Zipcar’s model of car sharing is proven to reduce vehicle ownership, freeing up more city space for people. Zipcar provides members with socially responsible, sustainable mobility options that support the global environment, their communities and city livability.

Zipcar is a subsidiary of Avis Budget Group, Inc. (Nasdaq: CAR), a leading global provider of mobility solutions. For more information, visit:www.zipcar.com.

The extra mile:

We encourage Zipsters to bring their whole selves to work - unique perspectives, personal experiences, backgrounds, and however they identify. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer – M/F/D/V.",3.2,"Zipcar
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Car Rental,Travel & Tourism,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
110,Data Analyst - Catalog Research,$38k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are

At True Fit, we believe when it comes to fashion, its all about the details.

True Fits personalization platform is strategically leveraged by 250 global retail sites, representing 17,000 brands and 175 million registered users. Since 2010, we have built the worlds largest data collective connecting consumers with apparel and footwear they will love and keep.

As our data collective continues to grow, so does our team! Lets disrupt this $3 trillion industry together.

True Fit, named a Top Place to Work, is looking for a Data Analyst.

What We Do

True Fit is building a comprehensive taxonomy of clothing products powered by text, image, user interactions, and manually derived data. The Data Science team at True Fit is leveraging this information to power the next generation of fashion recommender systems and help shoppers navigate the fashion world.

We are looking for a Data Analyst to help us expand what we can do with our fashion catalog.

COVID-19 and True Fit

While this role is based out of our Boston HQ, due to the ongoing response to COVID-19 all True Fit employees are working on a remote basis, with a return date TBD. Once our offices are reopened, we can remain flexible and work together on a schedule that best suits your needs at the time.

Responsibilities
Contribute to ongoing efforts to expand the features of clothing we model.
Collaborate with Data Scientists to measure performance of recommender systems and devise improvements.
Develop a holistic, data-driven perspective on the accuracy, coverage, and consistency of product features.
Own the Science code base for product-specific analytics. Build centralized reporting mechanisms.
Work with Scientists, Engineers, and Product Managers to communicate important results.
Develop techniques for increasing stakeholder awareness across the organization.
Required Skills
Experience solving data problems using quantitative tools. For example, experience acquired with a Bachelors in a quantitative field (computer science, math, physics, computational biology; economics, psychology, or other quantitative social science; or related fields) and 1-2 years of work experience.
Experience applying analytical tools such as statistics to real world problems.
Experience querying large complex datasets with SQL
Experience writing data analysis scripts with Python.
Excellent communication skills.
Willingness to learn new tools as they become needed.
Nice to Have
Experience with analytics dashboards.
Experience or interest in machine learning and/or mathematical modeling.
Experience with big data tools and frameworks, such as Spark.
Previous experience working with clickstream data and/or transaction data.
Why True Fit?

One size does not fit all in what you wear or your True Fit career. Everyone at True Fit has the opportunity to push their professional boundaries, while balancing personal ambitions.

Together weve built a tight-knit culture thats reflected in our Glassdoor reviews; Great people, cool product refreshing place to work everyone actually works together like a team, employees are all pro-active and genuinely take pride in their work growth potential plus culture management is approachable, mindful of their people opportunity to learn/work on new technology you are an integral part of the success of the company the work you are doing everyday really matters and makes a difference managers provide autonomy and trust you really innovative company, open to share ideas to make a better product great culture with the right vision.

We believe that how we dress is an expression of who we are and the confidence we feel. As an EEO employer, we work to help all team members experience an inclusive, diverse and accepting work environment, so you can be True To You.

Powered by JazzHR",3.6,"True Fit
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
111,Data Engineer - Cloud Services,-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

A leader in the post-hardware era, 2nd Watch walks alongside our clients to help them navigate and embrace change to provide better customer experiences through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our world-class cloud native capabilities in strategic consulting, workload design, technology deployments and workload management enable our clients to have the agility of a growth company and the security of a leader.

Selected by global brands for our thought leadership and agility through tested, proven and trusted customer-obsessed solutions for people, processes and technology, we are hyper-focused on six solution areas:
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

Data Cloud Engineer :

The ideal candidate is someone who
Operates with the highest levels of integrity
Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges
Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner
Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better
Has a passion for technology
Expertise you bring:
Owning the technical engagement and ultimate success around specific implementation projects.
Developing a deep expertise in enterprise cloud technologies and services.
Being subject matter expert and taking on a consultative role as it pertains to cloud adoption.
Ensure that our applications and infrastructure are designed and implemented to the highest security standards thus maintaining and enhancing customer trust
Evangelize security within 2nd Watch and be an advocate for keeping customer information secure
Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges
Other duties as assigned
Specialized Knowledge & Skills Requirements
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining cloud-native data lakes
Demonstrated experience providing customer-driven solutions, support or service.
In-depth knowledge of SQL or NoSQL and experience using a variety of data stores (e.g. RDBMS, analytic database, scalable document stores)
Extensive hands-on Python programming experience, with an emphasis towards building ETL workflows and data-driven solutions.
Able to employ design patterns and generalize code to address common use cases. Capable of authoring robust, high quality, reusable code and contributing to the divisions inventory of libraries.
Expertise in big data batch computing tools (e.g. Hadoop or Spark), with demonstrated experience developing distributed data processing solutions.
Applied knowledge of cloud computing (AWS, GCP, Azure).
Familiarity with open source machine learning toolkits, such as sklearn, Keras, or TensorFlow.
Applied knowledge of data modeling principles (e.g. dimensional modeling and star schemas).
Understanding of relational database internals
Experience using tools for infrastructure-as-code (e.g. Docker, CloudFormation, Terraform, etc.)
Experience with software engineering tools and workflows (i.e. Jenkins, CI/CD, git).
Education and Licenses:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field, or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Benefits and Perks of working at 2nd Watch:
Competitive salaries and all employees are bonus eligible.
401(k) with company stock plans to all employees
100% paid medical, dental and vision coverage for all employees and 90% paid for family, along with other wellness and disability plans.
Open and flexible Paid Time Off Policy
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
112,"Data Scientist, Senior Level",$110k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Category: Data Scientist

Title: Data Scientist, Senior Level (50-277)

Location(s): Chantilly, VA

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with appropriate agency Polygraph

Salary: Maximum of $160,000/year

Geodata IT, a subsidiary of Freedom Consulting Group, is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist, in Chantilly, VA.

This position required a bachelor s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent and five to seven years of relevant work experience.

The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for producing innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. And applying knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to prototype development and product improvement. He or she needs to be able to use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data. You must have knowledge on generating and testing hypotheses and analyzing and interpreting the results of product experiments.

Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP is a plus. The ideal candidate will have experience in developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack and Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc. Excellent verbal and written communication and being a strong team player, capable of working collaboratively is required.

This position falls within the DoD 8570 baseline of IAT II. You must have an active TS/SCI and a CompTIA Security +. A copy of your certificate(s) will be required before you can be submitted for the position.

Geodata IT values quality and has an eye for unrecognized talent. Specialized knowledge will be given consideration when evaluating the years of experience requirement. We love coworkers that can bring forward new ideas to move the GIS community forward.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with an appropriate agency Polygraph is required

U.S. Citizenship is required

Applicant Federal & E-Verify Postings

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",4.4,"FREEDOM CONSULTING GROUP
4.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
113,Data Scientist - Genomics,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualifications & Competencies:

Required

- Ph.D. or completion within 6 months in Computer Science, Applied Math or Statistics, - Computational Biology or related field; or M.S. degree with three or more years experience.

- Proficiency in quantitative modeling techniques such as statistics, machine learning, optimization, and simulation

- Proficiency in predictive modeling including comprehension of theory, modeling/identification strategies and limitations/pitfalls

- Proficiency in at least one modern programming language (e.g. Python, Java, etc.)

- Strong communication including the ability to make presentations and deliver complex quantitative analyses in a clear, concise and manner

- Strong organizational, interpersonal, and written communication skills

Desired

- Knowledge of a biological domain such as genetics, molecular biology, or plant breeding

- Experience applying analytical techniques to genetic or genomic data

- Experience with Cloud Computing environments",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
114,Aviation AI/ML Data Scientist,$109k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking someone with aviation experience and skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, and summarization mean something to you and you’ve applied them to aviation data, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. The candidate will be responsible for working both individually and with a team of data scientists in the following tasks:
Performing anomaly detection and capability development using a variety of aviation safety data
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Demonstrable aerospace/aviation knowledge or experience, this is a must
Bachelor’s Degree in Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions
Excellent Communication Skills (with the ability to explain tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team
Preferred Qualifications:
5 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, Mxnet, etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Azure, Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, D3, etc).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization, search (e.g. ELK Stack), entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintaining good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
115,Consumer Lending Data Analyst,$44k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are searching for a Consumer Lending Data Analyst to research and analyze data in order to make strategic business recommendations. In this role, you will perform competitor research to enhance our product strategy and direction. Having 3 years' experience in a complex analyst role will help you succeed in this role. Additionally, having an understating of lending principals and risk metrics will help the candidate be successful.
Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job Duties:
In partnership with key stakeholders, analyze, test and launch new initiatives to increase productivity
Provide data driven insights and recommendations to various departments within the credit union
Perform key competitor research and analysis to better inform product strategy and direction
Creating advanced reports, dashboards and deep dive analyses that inform and drive the
credit union’s product and business strategy
Create and refine predictive models on product, marketing, and risk initiatives
Uncover actionable insights for increased product performance
Partnering with marketing, finance and digital teams to enable business and systems synergy
Essential Skills:
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience in a complex analyst role; financial institution strongly preferred
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience with data collection methodologies
Experience with relational databases, e.g., SQL, Alteryx, and Tableau will help you succeed in this role
Familiarity with coding languages, e.g., R, Python
Strong understanding of statistical overlays and models for predictive analytics
Ability to analyze data from a strategic point of view and contribute to and influence discussions that drive the business
Ability to use key performance metrics and data to provide insights and make strategic business recommendations
Proficiency to organize, analyze and interpret data to explain complex irregularities or trends
Form strong relationships with cross-functional teams where support, resources and synergy is needed
Basic understanding of lending principals and risk metrics
Project Management experience; familiarity with Six Sigma/DMAIC methodologies
Expert knowledge of Excel
Education: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, other related fields of study or equivalent experience
Location: Hillsboro, OR 97124

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position

FT123

#LI-EK",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","Hillsboro, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
116,"Data Scientist, Cloud Business Operations",$111k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"53303

About NetApp

NetApp provides software, systems, and services to manage, store and share data via on-premises, and private and public clouds to customers worldwide. NetApp is emerging as a leader in providing public cloud services on all major cloud platforms, including Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft , and Google Cloud Platform (GCP). These cloud services, such as Cloud Volumes; Cloud Insights, Virtual Desktop Service, Global File Cache, SaaS backup, and Spot, avails customers to consider many more options on how and where to manage their critical workloads and data for optimal business and financial outcomes. The NetApp Public Cloud Services business unit is at the forefront of our effort to transform NetApp into a leader in the cloud market.
Job Summary
About the Position

This Cloud Business Operations Data Scientist will be the primary go to person for all of NetApp Public Cloud Services needs for analyzing tons of cloud services usage and billing data to derive intelligent business insights for enabling NetApp’s highest growth business. This person will be an expert in both understanding the data, as well as architecting and developing business logic and code to deliver automation in business intelligence. This is a highly technical role with deep understanding of Azure programming, R, SQL databases, visualization on Tableau, and scripting, along with years of experience in cloud services business operations. Knowledge of public cloud-based transactions on the top 3 cloud provider marketplaces (AWS, Azure and GCP) is a must, along with experience and understanding of integrations with internal systems for CRM, CPQ, Subscriptions Billing and Finance.

This role will coordinate with product management, IT and operations, and other NetApp functions including sales, marketing, and finance to understand, analyze and improve product pricing, SKU design, and transaction processing of our existing cloud offerings and upcoming innovations. This role will also act as the primary operations liaison between product management teams and business operations. The right person for this role has deep understanding of public cloud marketplace transaction processing, billing, metering, and revenue/usage reporting. This person also has extensive experience in dealing with cross-functional business requirements and engaging with key stakeholders at both the executive/VP level and with delivery teams.
Job Requirements
Key Responsibilities
Analyze usage and billing data from multiple sources to derive business intelligence
Develop business logic and write code to automate BI output
Design and develop visualization dashboards in Tableau
Understand public cloud marketplace transaction processes and provide guidance to business operations teams on implementation best practices
Leverage business insights to provide guidance to product management for pricing and transaction processing design
Skills and Qualifications
10+ years of experience working with various cloud providers, software vendors and/or consulting organizations
5+ years of experience in data analysis and business insights
5+ years of experience in Azure programming, R, SQL databases and Tableau
Understanding of enterprise cloud solutions and related technical offerings
Collaborative personality; comfortable working across many functions and teams, and engaging with senior executives
A creative go-getter who is full of ideas and can execute on those ideas in a fast-paced, demanding environment with excellent interpersonal and social skills
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.
Travel Required

20% (includes domestic and int.)
Education
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.

Nearest Major Market: San Jose
Nearest Secondary Market: Palo Alto
Job Segment:
Operations Manager, Scientific, Database, Cloud, Operations, Engineering, Technology

Apply now »",3.7,"NetApp
3.7","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1992,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
117,Data Scientist,$101k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is currently seeking a TS/SCI Data Scientist to serve as a data specialist: finding, analyzing, and vetting potential data sources for applicability in a geospatial problem domain.

Responsibilities include:
Explores data sets and verifies data quality to gain an understanding of relevant data, then identifies differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the machine learning model in an operational environment.
Identify data sets of machine learning tests and use cases.
Develops and tunes machine learning model's hyper parameters.
Basic Qualifications:
Function independently and can present/defend/communicate the results and ideas to key decision makers.
Experience in visualizing and manipulating big data sets, including leaflet, plotly, D3, and ggplot.
Demonstrated background in data mining and statistical analysis. Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills.
Desired Skills:
Modeling familiarity: ability to understand how to optimize datasets for use in computational models.
Graph Indexing: ability to develop logical connections between disparate data via indexing in an efficient manner, and building/understanding graph algorithms to maximize value of retained data.
AWS familiarity: ability to use and manage AWS instances as well as coding lambda functions (etc) to minimize expenditure while maximizing throughput.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI required to start
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","McLean, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
118,Data Scientist,$79k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientists

Job Description
Join an elite group dedicated to continuous personal improvement as GCT is currently seeking Data Scientists of all levels to support an intelligence agency with insights gained from analyzing voluminous sensor data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. Candidates must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Clearance: TS/SCI w/Full scope polygraph (or used within the past 24 months)

Education/Experience Requirements

Senior Positions:
Masters degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field, or extensive comparable experience
10+ years of relevant experience
Junior/Intermediate Positions
Completed B.S. in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a closely related technical field
3-9 years of relevant experience
Qualifications
Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights fromlarge data sets
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Strong problem solving skills
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Desired Skills
Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, Bayes, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience using web services: Redshift, S3, Spark, DigitalOcean, AWS, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc.
The success of Great-Circle Technologies depends on the success and well-being of its employees. GCT promotes work/life balance and encourages the overall well-being of each of its contributors. A comprehensive benefits package is provided, which currently includes company paid single medical, dental, life, disability, and long-term care insurances (with contributions to family premiums,) matching 401k plan, 34 days off per year including 10 Federal holidays plus the day after Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year’s eves!

Join us at Great-Circle Technologies, where innovation is the shortest distance between two points.

Great-Circle Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Great-Circle Technologies ensures all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, race, ethnic background, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or protected veteran status.",2.2,"Great-Circle Technologies
2.2","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
119,Data Scientist-Junior,$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 years experience and a BA/BS degree

Responsible for assisting more senior positions and/or performing functional duties under the oversight of more senior positions.

Current TS/SCI Clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
120,Sr. Manager Advanced Analytics (Data Scientist),$129k-$210k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Information

Job Title: Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics)
Department: Management Accounting
Business Unit: Administration
Reports To: Director - Business Intelligence & Advanced Analytics
Supervisory Role: Yes
FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Summary

The Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics) provides support to executive management and operational departments by developing complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value. The role will include partnering with internal stakeholders across the business locally and internationally. The individual optimizes business processes through modern machine learning techniques and supervises integrating the developed models into productive software.

Essential Functions
Develop and supervise complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value.
Ownership of full lifecycle development from analyzing current processes, providing functional specification, designing and developing solution, testing and providing on-going support once live
Through modern machine learning techniques, optimization of business processes using predictive and prescriptive methods.
Lead the transfer from current Excel-based analysis tools to advanced analytics products
Cross-analyze data from different sources in order to create new insights to the business to solve real-world business problem
Support the departments concerning questions of advanced analytics and development of own proposals to move the company forward
Responsible to research other potential software solutions
Integrate the developed models into productive software.
Upskill colleagues by creating a culture of experience exchange with the aim of improving understanding and efficiency of the department’s processes and products
Train and guide the work of other team members, quality checks on work and ensuring deadlines are met
Cultivate a culture of learning and knowledge extension in the department to better understand the “why” behind tasks and therefore increase efficiency
Perform all other duties as assigned
Required

Required Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

Strong knowledge in big-data technologies
Strong knowledge of machine learning, optimization, and data mining methods (e.g. with Python, R)
Statistical knowledge, predictive modelling
Knowledge of applying time-series / regression analysis, clustering-methods, effectiveness testing (A-/B-hypotheses testing) to solve diverse business problems
Strong Ability to understand complex problems and scenarios, and analyzing them in detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and to deliver accurate results
Excellent communication skills and ability to work well in a team
Self-motivated and proactive individual with a can-do attitude and the ability to work on projects and solve problems independently

Preferred Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

German language skills

Required Education, Certifications/ Licenses, Related Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in data science, mathematics/statistics, computer science, physics, or a related subject
5+ years of experience in related field in corresponding subjects or related fields

Physical Job Requirements

Ability to work a variety of shifts including nights, weekends, and holidays as needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced working environment, including the store(s), distribution center(s), warehouse(s), and/or corporate office(s) with the capability to switch job functions/roles quickly
Ability to remain in a stationary position (standing and/or seated) more than half the time
Ability to maneuver cases of product (lift, move, carry, slide, etc.) up to 30 lbs.
Ability to operate machinery and/or equipment that requires the constant use of hands/fingers/wrists
Ability to spend more than half the time viewing computer monitors
Ability to identify and distinguish between colors more than half the time

Travel Requirements

This position commutes between stores, regional offices and/or distribution centers less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight domestic travel less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight international travel less than 25% of the time
Anticipated travel will be by car, air, and/or train
Preferred

Lidl US, LLC & Affiliates provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to, including but not limited to, race, sex, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity or expression, national origin or ethnicity, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, disability, or veteran status, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.5,"Lidl US
3.5","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Private,Grocery Stores & Supermarkets,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
121,Program and Data Analyst,$40k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Program and Data Analyst

Role Overview:

The Program and Data Analyst is the data analytics expert serving the Recruitment, Admissions, and Digital Marketing teams at Urban Teachers. The Program and Data Analyst is responsible for building and maintaining all our data management systems, conducting analysis on trends in the data, providing partner teams within the organization access to critical recruitment and admissions data, and maintaining the knowledge management system for the recruitment and admissions teams.

The Program and Data Analyst is a strategic member of the Recruitment and Admissions team and is a key part of the leadership team. This position reports to the Vice President of Recruitment and Admissions.

Location:

Due to the impact of COVID-19, our regional offices are closed and staff members will work virtually until further notice. Otherwise, location is flexible for the right candidate, though a strong preference will be given to candidates in the Baltimore/Washington metro areas.

Key Areas of Responsibility

Data Management and Analysis
Conduct data analysis to identify the impact of recruitment and engagement efforts. Monitor progress towards recruitment goals. Loft challenges and opportunities present in the data to help guide the recruitment, admissions, and digital marketing teams to capitalize on opportunities and address concerns
Support the customization of Salesforce to better support Recruitment and Admissions. Manage Salesforce infrastructure updates
Develop and maintain Salesforce reports and dashboards
Establish rules for data management and structure including campaign hierarchy, recruiter event tracking, lead source, affiliations, etc.
Knowledge Management, Training and Support
Train and support recruitment, marketing, and admissions staff members on utilization of Salesforce, Power BI, and other data management and reporting platforms
Ensure strong data quality across the recruitment and admissions team and support with data quality management
Develop a strong reporting knowledge management process to ensure long-term data management
Determine the technology needs to evolve recruitment, admissions, and marketing reporting
Participate in teacher selection and interview days
Relationship Management
Serve as a liaison between IT and the Recruitment and Admissions teams
Design presentations for the Urban Teachers’ board meetings to highlight recruitment and admissions work
Provide ad hoc reporting on recruitment to other teams within the organization including The Black Educators Initiative, Development Team, Performance & Evaluation, and regional site teams
Requirements
Bachelor's degree from an accredited institution
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products. Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Experience using and customizing Salesforce. Experience creating reports, dashboards in Salesforce is a must. Salesforce Administrator certification highly preferred.
Experience building reports and visualizations in Power BI or similar data business intelligence software is a must
Advanced ability to analyze data and use analysis to inform strategies and efforts
Results-oriented, self-directed and a self-starter who is comfortable operating in grey space
Ability to work as a part of a remote team
A deep commitment to ending educational inequity
How You Operate
Operate with a strong internal locus of control—proactively problem-solving, voicing questions/concerns, and taking ownership of your team
Lead with and project sense of possibility, imagining and thinking boldly about what we will accomplish
Contribute to the collective, pitching in to support teammates when needed and feasible
Always strive to have a growth mindset and a learning orientation
About Urban Teachers

The mission of Urban Teachers is to improve educational and life outcomes of children in urban schools by preparing culturally competent, effective career teachers who accelerate student achievement and disrupt systems of racial and socioeconomic inequity. Urban Teachers accomplishes this by recruiting outstanding candidates, equipping them with state-of-the-art training, and linking their certification to their demonstration of effective teaching practices and skills. Participants in the Urban Teachers program also receive a Master’s of Science in Education from the Johns Hopkins School of Education – a top 15 graduate school of education according to U.S. News and World Report. Founded in 2009, Urban Teachers is on the cutting edge of teacher preparation. Learn more about Urban Teachers on our website: urbanteachers.org

As an Employer of National Service, Urban Teachers recognizes the unique skills of national service alumni. Accordingly, AmeriCorps alumni, returned Peace Corps volunteers, and other national service participants are encouraged to apply to our job openings.

Urban Teachers does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, age, or national and ethnic origin in hiring and employment, nor in the administration of its educational policies, admissions policies, scholarship and other programs.

Our VALUES:

WE SERVE CHILDREN: Children are the center of our work. We rely on the communities we serve to guide and inform the decisions we make about our curriculum, program and practice.

WE ARE AN ANTI-RACIST ORGANIZATION: We are committed to ongoing knowledge seeking, reflection, and action to deliberately oppose racism. We are an inclusive organization that values the diversity of people, backgrounds and perspectives. We are active allies who pursue justice in the communities in which we live and work.

WE ARE LIFE-LONG LEARNERS: We are dedicated to continuous improvement, innovation and excellence. We strive to be on the forefront of what is best for teacher education and students based on research and practice.

WE VALUE EACH OTHER: We value each other as whole people. We are servant leaders who foster a supportive working environment that is empathetic and caring, and values direct, constructive feedback. It is our VISION that every student in the United States is taught by committed, well-prepared, culturally competent teachers.

Qualified individuals who are fully invested in Urban Teachers’ mission and vision and who thrive in a fast-paced, results-oriented setting are encouraged to apply.",4.2,"Urban Teachers
4.2","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Nonprofit Organization,Education Training Services,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
122,Data Analyst,$38k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the role:

Dodge Data & Analytics is searching for a Data Analyst who will responsible for the production, support, and maintenance of custom Dodge Research and Analytics products and services. The Analyst will work closely with the Dodge sales force and will serve as part of a team for the Analytics group customers in the support and use of their products.

What you'll do:
Work in a group of 4-6 analysts to provide regular data analysis and delivery of ongoing services to a set of clients.
Support clients by providing an understanding of our proprietary data and its application to their business and industry.
Work in a PC based environment using a variety of software and database packages to provide data analysis and production of numerous client-specific deliveries.
Work directly with specific customers as the key contact for certain information services.
Build strong relationships with the internal sales team to enhance existing services and to support new business opportunities.
Maintain quality standards in all client deliveries.
Develop a thorough knowledge of Dodge Analytics databases and products.
Work with the Analytics sales specialists in supporting our products with customers and supporting any efforts to maintain or enhance our current client relationships. This will eventually include some direct client contact by telephone and email.
What you'll bring:
Strong analytical and problem-solving ability, self-motivated team player, and capable of working in an independent atmosphere with minimal supervision.
Technical proficiency with database (Microsoft Access) and spreadsheet (Excel) applications beneficial.
Strong written, oral, and interpersonal communication skills, including the ability to effectively interact with both customers and team members. The Data Analyst will be a direct point of contact for customers whose services are assigned to him/her.
Familiarity with basic business analysis.
BA/BS or more required
0-3 years of professional experience required.
Dodge Data & Analytics is committed to leveraging the talent of a diverse workforce to create great opportunities for our business and our people. EOE/AA. Minority/Female/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Disability/Veteran",2.6,"Dodge Data & Analytics
2.6","Bedford, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,Head of Data & Insights,-1,"As Skillshare’s Head of Data and Analytics, you’ll lead and develop the team that answers the big questions that shape the growth of our business and community. Reporting to our CFO, this will be a highly visible, cross-functional role that works closely with the company’s executive leadership and supports their various teams and functions. With more than 12 million users, 30,000 classes and hundreds of millions of minutes watched every year, this is a data leader’s dream job.
What you'll do:
Data and analytics: Your team will answer the big questions around our product, content, and community. What content drives the most engagement and retention? How do we cluster and segment our users to deliver a personalized experience? What features help us optimize for retention and growth?
Business intelligence: The day-to-day tracking of our core operations. Every week you’ll lead the conversation about what numbers are up or down and why, and keep the departmental leads focused on the most important metrics and KPIs.
Data foundations & infrastructure: We see the data organization as absolutely essential to our long-term growth and strategy, and we will look to you to see around corners and develop the people, processes, and infrastructure we need to reach our full potential. In this function, you will partner closely with the data engineering team and our CTO.
Why we're excited about you:
Communications: Data can make your head hurt, but you package and communicate the essential information in a way that is perfectly tailored to your audience. You can go deep and technical with your team of data scientists, and you can bring it up a few notches for Board presentations and investor decks.
Partnership: This is a highly cross-functional role, and your visibility and accessibility across the organization make you a go-to resource and valued partner to our teams.
Technical skill: You inherit a strong group of data scientists and analysts, and your technical expertise makes you a valuable sounding board and mentor to the current team and future hires.
People management: We place a lot of value on great managers, and you are an accomplished leader, coach, recruiter, and mentor.
Strategic: You may have the technical details nailed, but you know how to pull back and see the forest through the trees. Your insights will be essential as we plot our long-term strategy and vision.
Why you're excited about us:
Impact: There are few roles at Skillshare that will have more impact and visibility. Your team will be partnering with every department to give them the data and insights they need to achieve their goals.
Growth: You’ll have the opportunity to wear a lot of hats and take on more responsibility over time. We have a fresh $70 million in capital and a very, very long to-do list.
Teamwork: We have a passionate, talented team that is a lot of fun to work with.
Mission: We’re doing work that matters – connecting lifelong learners around the world and empowering them to pursue their creativity.
Flexibility: We believe that doing your best work means living a full life. That means different things for everyone, so we optimize for trust, invest to support remote teams, have an unlimited vacation policy (with a required minimum!), and encourage work-life balance.
About Skillshare

Skillshare is an online learning community for creatives. We have thousands of inspiring classes for creative and curious people, and millions of members who come together to find inspiration and take the next step in their creative journey. We are a series-D company backed by OMERS, Union Square Ventures, Spark Capital, Amasia, Spero Ventures, and Burda Principal Investments.

Skillshare is committed to building a diverse team that reflects a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. We’re proud to be recognized as a top place to work by BuiltinNYC, Crain’s, and Forbes, in addition to being one of the five best places to work for women by Bpeace, and a top-rated workplace for dads by Fatherly. We work to ensure a consistent interview process, fair compensation, and inclusive work environment for all.",3.9,"Skillshare
3.9",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
124,Data Science Support Analyst,$72k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
125,Data Scientist,-1,"About O'Reilly Media

OReillys mission is changing the world by sharing the knowledge of innovators. For the last 40 years, weve been helping people learn new skills, track significant new technologies, and build careers in technology and business. This extends to our employees: we have a long and proud history of encouraging and enabling the people who work here to take advantage of OReillys resources and network to keep learning, take on new challenges, and build careers. OReilly Media has two main offices, in Boston and Sebastopol (San Francisco Bay Area), with a large portion of our employees working remotely.

About your team

Data drives much of what we at OReilly Media do, making the Data Science Team central to how the company operates and continues to grow its influence. We provide business analysis and reporting, build machine learning models, develop prototypes for data-intensive components to the platform, and maintain data systems. We are a distributed team working remotely from home offices, but we place a strong emphasis on teamwork and collaboration: an ideal candidate is one that is both self-motivated and enjoys working with others. Team members are encouraged to learn new skills and technologies as they relate to our mission. We believe work should be fun and friendly, and we hold dear our core belief in maintaining a healthy work-life balance.

About the Job

We have an opening for a Data Scientist who will perform a variety of analyses and data tasks to support core business capabilities such as marketing, sales and product improvements.

Both quantitative and qualitative aspects of analysis are important to this role. The Data Scientists primary responsibilities include pulling, cleaning, transforming and analyzing both internal and external data, as well as performing more advanced modeling and machine learning tasks. Some of our projects are based on requests from other departments, others are driven by larger data science team goals. Often we are asked to look into fairly open-ended problems, which requires a degree of creativity, curiosity and research skill.

Crucial to this role is seeing the bigger picture: not just following the instructions of a JIRA ticket or request, but realizing the implications and actionable potential of an analysis. The Data Scientist must understand what data we have or need to obtain in order to provide significant insights and value to our learning customers and internal organization. This demands creativity and drive to figure out how to get the data, and how to use the data to keep OReilly at the forefront of learning.

The Data Scientist works on problems that are core to the companys mission. Our team is at the forefront of some of the businesss major challenges, for example, understanding and modeling how users progress through content and developing metrics that describe their learning experience. This role has a significant opportunity to positively impact the company through data-driven means.

Most of our analysis is performed in Python and SQL. Our primary data storage systems are based on Postgres, Redshift, MySQL, BigQuery and Google Cloud Storage. The Data Scientist will:
Extract, transform and analyze platform and customer data based on requests from product, sales, marketing and executive teams
Write code to automate processes for routine data reporting requirements
Undertake research to explore more open-ended data problems
Effectively present and communicate research results with coherent visualization and actionable recommendations
Work with product teams on platform features such as user-facing dashboards, personalization, topic organization, search and content discovery
Maintain our backend data ETL processes and automated reporting services
Drive the Data Science Teams impact in the company by taking the initiative with data-driven solutions for company problems
About You

You should have a strong foundation in Python programming for data-related tasks, including experience with data science packages such as numpy and scikit-learn, and strong SQL skills. The level of coding required will go beyond simple scripts and queries: we are always trying to automate the boring stuff with well-designed and efficiently engineered packages of code. Some knowledge of git, unix commands and big data / distributing computing solutions is highly valued.

Key skills and Experience
2+ years in data science / analytics, or equivalent
Excellent Python skills
Strong SQL skills
Personable and able to work with with others in a team
Significant experience combining and transforming data
Experience with wrangling dirty data
Excellent critical thinking skills and the ability to develop creative solutions to challenging problems
Ability to create effective data visualizations
Excellent written, verbal, and presentation skills
Experience with scientific computing and machine learning, especially numpy, scipy and scikit-learn
Experience working with unstructured text data and performing NLP tasks
Comfortable working on a Linux server
Self-motivated and ability to work independently when necessary",3.5,"O'Reilly Media
3.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
126,Scientist - In Vitro Assays and Drug Discovery,-1,"At Visikol, our mission is to accelerate the discovery and development of therapeutics through transforming tissues into quantitative data sets that we mine for actionable insights. We do this through leveraging our imaging, image analysis and advanced in vitro services that are based on a suite of proprietary software and cutting-edge research. As a company, we operate as a contract research organization and conduct contract research for the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. We are currently looking for a Scientist to join our team that will be responsible for the execution of research projects for our Clients and designing novel drug discovery assays. Specifically, we are looking for a Scientist who will lead complex in vitro assay services as well as developing novel cell based assays. This will be a unique opportunity to work side-by-side with our team of Scientists to develop novel drug discovery technologies for use with our pharmaceutical Clients. We are looking for a Scientist and are open to broad backgrounds within the imaging, cell culture and image analysis spaces. Specifically, we are looking for Scientists that have the following skills and background.
Great project management skills and the ability to manage several complex research projects simultaneously.
An ability to troubleshoot complex assays and develop novel solutions for problems.
Excellent presentations skills and the ability to communicate complex scientific findings with diverse audiences.
A thorough understanding and demonstrated track record of designing, implementing and reporting on assays to address specific research questions.
Substantial wet lab experience running and interpreting assay results.
BS + 5 years of experience, MS + 3 years of experience, PhD + 0-2 years of experience
The candidate should have a strong background in several of the below fields.
Fluorescent microscopy - confocal microscopy a plus.
Routine mammalian cell culture - 3D cell culture a plus.
Execution of in vitro assays.
Experience immunolabeling and optimizing fluorescent labeling.
Traditional histology - grossing, embedding, sectioning, staining.
Image analysis experience using ImageJ or other software tools.
Details: *
Position is located in Hampton, NJ

Compensation will be commensurate with experience

In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification form upon hire.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",-1,Visikol Inc.,"Hampton, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
127,Data Scientist,$65k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"HPOne, named CT Magazine's 2018 Great Places to Work, is looking for a Data Scientist to join our team.

The Data Scientist is responsible for collecting, cleaning, translating data to meet the company's needs. Every business collects data, whether it's sales figures, market research, logistics, or transportation costs. The Data Scientist will use that data and machine learning to help drive HPOne's business plans.

What you'll do:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Develop insights and deliver recommendations based on data analyses
Work with business leaders to articulate business requirements for data analyses
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies for specific models or analyses
Optimize joint development efforts through database use and project design
Create automated reports and dashboard products, in order to display results to internal teams
Develop end-customer segmentation schemes by analyzing customer behavior
Perform ad hoc analyses and deliver recommendations
Develop and implement predictive models like decision tree, regression using R or similar
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Required Skills/Abilities:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field
Five years' experience with SAS (or similar), ETL, data processing, database programming and data analytics
Experience in data mining and statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience with programming languages such as Java / Python (or ""R"")
Experience conducting regression analyses
Understanding of relational databases and data management as well as experience with data aggregation and normalization
Advanced excel expertise (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, report filters, etc.)
Ability to approach tasks strategically, while owning and mastering the details
Exceptional problem solving, as well as analytical and strategic thinking skills
Initiative to own projects from start to finish
Strong oral and written communication skills, with ability to work well with people across the company at all levels


Preferred Skills/Abilities:
Coursework in at least one of the following: mathematics, business, analytical marketing, information systems, programming/databases, statistics/statistical modeling, finance, economics, or physics
Experience conducting analyses and building predictive models using SAS (or similar)
Experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools preferred (like Domo or Tableau)
Physical Requirements:
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer, typically in an office or cubicle environment (constant noise, fluorescent overhead lighting)
HPOne is an Equal Opportunity Employer:

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) is a fundamental principle at HPOne, where employment is based upon personal capabilities and qualifications. HPOne does not discriminate because of actual or perceived sex, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity, gender, transgender, race, color, religion, national origin, creed, citizenship status, ancestry, age, marital status, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, medical conditions including genetic characteristics, mental or physical disability, military and veteran status, or any other protected characteristic as established by law. HPOne requires the necessary drug testing and background checks as part of our pre-employment practices.",3.5,"HPOne
3.5","Trumbull, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
128,Data Scientist,Employer Provided Salary:$80k-$120k,"About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
129,Computer Scientist 1,-1,"Computer Scientist

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a broad software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the Jr. Computer Scientist position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software repository containing code in Python, MATLAB, C++ and Java. Candidate will also be responsible for maintaining this repository and its accessibility. Machine Learning, Cloud Technology, and a strong CS background is highly desired. Good communication skills with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Some experience in scientific programming
Experience programming in a high-level language such as C/C++ on Unix/Linux platforms
Experience programming in high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Familiarity with interfacing C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages.
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
130,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst - Developer,$82k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1886, Buckeye Partners, L.P. has a proven track record of stability and success. We pride ourselves on the laser focus we apply to safely providing service and value to our customers, operating under a strong set of values, and empowering our employees to make decisions. We have a tenacious commitment to environmental responsibility and regulatory compliance in all that we do.

It is our internal culture that sets us apart from other companies. Our goal is to provide our employees with a greater span of responsibility, the ability to make decisions, and access to experts to help you build your skills and experiences. Each of our career tracks provides employees with the ability to innovate and be a significant contributor from their first day on the job.

Buckeye Partners is currently seeking aSr. Business Intelligence Analyst - Developerwith experience in the design and support of new and existing enterprise planning and business intelligence information systems. in the Oil& Gas Industry to join our team!

Role Summary:

The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst– Developer works with business and IT counterparts and is responsible for the design and support of new and existing enterprise planning and business intelligence information systems, dashboards and reports. This role prioritizes data and information requirements and helps to solve complex technical and analytical problems. This position participates in project teams to define and implement new or updated technologies, standards, testing methodologies, training for enterprise wide business intelligence and planning solutions.

Responsibilities& Essential Functions include:
Serve as an expert/lead technical specialist for the direction and development of complex, enterprise class business solutions.
Drive the planning, budgeting, business intelligence and data warehouse design in concert with business and IT resources.
Responsible for the design, documentation, development, testing and deployment of various business intelligence and planning applications, dashboards and reports in support of the business.
Help to support, troubleshoot and maintain existing legacy business applications (Microsoft environment, Cognos, etc.).
Communicate and demonstrate design concepts and development principles to others on the team.
Act as subject matter expert for Business Intelligence in support of all business applications.
Participate with other teams in integration efforts as new systems are deployed or legacy systems are retrofitted into Buckeye business practices.
Develop and provide training for new and existing applications.
Support other areas/special projects as needed.
And other duties as assigned.
Position Requirements:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in an Information Technology, Data Science, or Data Analytics
10+ years related experience in appropriate specialty areas including but not limited to: Analysis and design, Business Intelligence principals, database analysis, application support management, financial applications and related data
Experience in the Microsoft platform (Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate, Microsoft Azure Cloud) is desired
Knowledge base with Azure Cloud BI data architechture including but not limited to Azure Data Factory, Azure Databricks, Azure Analysis Service, and Azure Synapse Analytics is desired
Prefer experience with ETL processes
SQL Server experience is required
Cognos experience in any of the following areas Cognos 10 BI, PowerPlay, Report Studio, Metric Studio, Analysis Studio.
Ability to travel up to 20% domestically and internationally
Certificates& Licenses:
Microsoft Certification preferred
Other Business Analysis, Business Intelligence and Data Architecture certifications desired
Other Skills, Attributes and Abilities:
This position requires exceptional analytical and technical skills. One must be able to pay particular attention to detail and accuracy, and be able to recognize symptoms, analyze business scenarios, and take appropriate action to define and implement successful business strategies
This position requires strong communication and interpersonal skills. One must be able to assist users in a pleasant, non-technical manner for problem resolution.
Essential Functions:
This position requires the ability to safely and successfully perform essential job functions consistent with ADA, FMLA and other federal, state and local standards, including meeting qualitative and or/quantitative productivity standards.
This role requires the ability to maintain regular, punctual attendance consistent with the ADA, FMLA and other federal, state and local standards.
This position requires compliance with all personnel policies.


Physical& Safety Requirements:
The person in this position needs to occasionally move inside the office to access file cabinets, office equipment, etc.
This role continuously operates a computer and other office productivity equipment (i.e. a calculator, copy machine and computer printer).
About You:

To be successful in the Buckeye culture, our employees must Possess excellent communication skills, both written and verbal. You must be able to work independently. You must also be able to exercise tact, discretion, and professionalism when dealing with internal clients and external counterparties (customers, vendors, etc.), as well as when handling sensitive and confidential information.

Buckeye Partners wants to create and reward an organizational focus that stimulates the creative and entrepreneurial actions of our employees and results in innovative ways of reducing costs, generating revenues, improving productivity, or improving processes.

About Us:

Buckeye Partners, L.P. is the logistical solutions partner of choice for the global energy business and one of the nation’s largest independent petroleum products pipeline transportation and terminalling service provider; our strength is to create centers of expertise around our products, technologies and client needs.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP on the following website:http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm",3.3,"Buckeye Partners, L.P.
3.3","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1886,Company - Public,Oil & Gas Services,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
131,Machine Learning Engineer,$68k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Perspecta Labs

Perspecta Labs generates transformative applied research to fuel solutions for our customers’ unique challenges. We are a self-sustaining research center within Perspecta that provides applied research and engineering to enable government agencies, utilities and commercial enterprises to fully exploit the future of communications, analytics and cyber security.

Responsibilities

Perspecta has an exciting opportunity for a Machine Learning Software Engineer to aid on the development of machine learning models and the software that is needed for the training and deployment of these machine learning model. In addition, the qualified candidate will engineer both structure and unstructured data that will be fed to and taken from the machine learning models. Because the qualified candidate will be working closely with the Data Scientist, the candidate must have general understanding of machine learning. This position is located onsite at Picatinny Arsenal, NJ.

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree in Physics, Mathematics, Electrical, Computer, or Software Engineering
3 -5 years experience developing machine learning models in areas such as classification from video, object detection and classification, and reinforcement learning.
Experience with machine learning algorithms such as Neural Networks, Boosting algorithms, Decision Trees, etc.
Software development experience in Python and/or C++ Experience in software design and development Experience with TensorFlow and other machine learning libraries
Broad knowledge in current machine learning techniques and ability to adapt novel techniques to research questions

Preferred Skills:

Familiarity with reinforcement learning and computer vision techniques would be a plus
Good Communication and Presentation skills are a plus. E
xperience with Linux is highly desirable.

The successful candidate must be a U.S. Citizen and possess and be able to maintain a DOD Secret Security Clearance, as a qualification and condition for employment.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Wharton, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,Deep Learning Algorithm Scientist,-1,"VIDA is a growing company with BIG focus. Our amazing team is focused on transforming pulmonary care through a combination of AI-powered analysis and image analysis services. We are on the leading edge of artificial/augmented intelligence (AI) in medical imaging, with a focus on computed tomography, and are working with the industry's biggest players. We are fighting to provide greater precision and personalization across a range of lung diseases from emphysema and airway obstructive diseases (COPD) ―to asthma, interstitial lung disease, and lung cancer. While we are a small company, our benefits reflect those of a larger company. We love and are very passionate about the work we do and want to add to our VIDA team!

LOCATION: Coralville IA, Minneapolis MN, or Remote
POSITION SUMMARY: *
VIDA is seeking an experienced Deep Learning Algorithm Scientist to develop imaging-based AI and predictive analytics to transform pulmonary care. VIDA has an extensive, curated database of images and associated metadata, as well as strong research and clinical collaborators to leverage for the development of AI-enabled workflows and analyses to aid in the detection, diagnosis, treatment and management of patients with lung disease. The ideal candidate is creative and innovative, loves to solve problems, has a strong technical background and a passionate desire to help patients. This role comes with the opportunity to be a high performer within a company that’s fast-paced, dynamic, and quickly growing in all areas.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS*
Develops novel algorithmic approaches to solving clinical challenges, leveraging image and associated metadata information
Defines data requirements for training and testing of machine learning methods and works with the broader team to amass data from internal and external sources
Seeks out important problems to be solved and/or improvements to existing solutions
Develops research plans, designs feasibility studies and outlines research procedures to be followed.
Provides expertise in their scientific field of specialty to managers, other department members, research partners and customers.
Packages algorithms for incorporation into VIDA’s products, ensuring algorithms meet resource, robustness, and performance requirements as well as clinical requirements.
Prepares reports and authors detailed findings. Supports research partners’ publications and publishes in line with company’s research goals
Contributes to patent strategy of the company, identifying patentable ideas and supporting the patent process
Ensures that research and algorithm development activities are conducted in compliance with company processes and requirements
POSITION REQUIREMENTS*
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge skills and abilities required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE*
_*Must*_
PhD in Computer Science, Applied math, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related field (or MSc with additional experience)
Advanced understanding of deep learning with applications in image processing, with a strong track record of publications or significant product contributions in these areas
Strong mathematical background, especially in optimization theory, stochastic algorithms, and/or numerical methods with a passion for solving hard math problems
Strong Python programming skills and experience with Tensorflow and Keras
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills are required along with the ability to work in a dynamic, clinically-focused, distributed team. Your history of mentoring other engineers and interns is a great bonus
_*Desired*_
Medical and clinical background
Strong C++ programming skills
Experience translating research to commercial product and clinical utility
Experience developing data mining applications
Systems software engineering knowledge and expertise in optimizing software for computational performance.
Education and Credential Requirements*
PhD in Computer Science, Applied math, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related field (or MSc with additional experience)
Supervision Requirements*
This position reports to: COO

This position supervises: None

Job Type: Full-time

Education:
Master's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Fully Remote
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Day shift
Company's website:
www.vidalung.ai
Work Remotely:
Yes",3.6,"VIDA
3.6","Coralville, IA",-1,Unknown,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
133,Claims Data Scientist,-1,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary
As a Claims Data Scientist at ConcertAI, you will be responsible for data exploration, and analysis on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain, including claims and claims-clinical linked data assets. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in healthcare. You should have previous experience with healthcare claims. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand external claims data assets and oversee the ingestion, processing, de-identification, and provisioning for data assets and research projects.
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Become the internal subject matter expert on all things claims.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Experience with healthcare claims data
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy).
Firm understanding of claims data processing and adjudication, including rejections, re-submissions, and identifying final claims.
Ideal candidate would have a competency around linking EMR and claims data via identity management.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.6,"ConcertAI
3.6",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
134,Data Scientist - Clearance Required,$76k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"TUVA, an Akima Company, provides turnkey solutions that offer better systems, tools, and methods to further your goals, reduce costs, and streamline operations. From requirements analysis, design, and implementation to operations and training TUVA’s personnel are well-versed in best practices across Enterprise IT, Mission Support Services, and Specialized Technologies. Our personnel enjoy competitive benefits packages and challenging roles in work environments committed to innovation, diversity and opportunity for career growth. As an Alaska Native Corporation (ANC), 100% of our company’s profits go back to our 14,300 Iñupiat shareholders that have resided near and above the Arctic Circle for more than 10,000 years. Our business helps support their way of life and contributes to the survival of a culture that has thrived in a challenging environment.

Responsibilities:

Tuva is seeking an experienced Data Scientist with specific functional knowledge to work with a key customer in the Intel space.

Structure and analyze data using statistical techniques and provide detailed reporting.

Extract, clean and manipulate data from multiple sources and systems.

Develop analytical approaches to answering intelligence questions and produce. actionable intelligence products by developing complex queries, organizing data in large databases, and linking information.

Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets and provide detailed reporting of findings.

Minimum Qualifications:

BS Degree (in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Information Management or Computer Science Preferred).

Top Secret Clearance.

Proven working experience of Data Analysis, Database Administration and Database Development.

Technical expertise regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques.

Experience with Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) data input.

Familiar with data visualization products (Tableau, Gephi, ggplot).

Ability to create ad hoc queries and reports using Transact SQL

Strong knowledge and experience with reporting packages.

Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets (Excel, SAS, etc).

Strong analytical skills with the ability to organize, analyze, and convey information through key analytical processes.

Excellent communicator with the ability to clearly articulate findings verbally and in writing.

Capable of evaluating and recommending new technologies and software in support of ongoing operations.

It is important for the selected candidate to be familiar with/lightly skilled in the following computer languages and databases:

My SQL, Oracle JavaScript, XML, C++, R, Virtual Studio, Perl, VBA, SQL, Microsoft Access and Excel.

The selected candidate will provide detailed analysis and advice to both Managers and Intelligent Analysts.

The duties and responsibilities listed in this job description generally cover the nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this position. This is not intended to be a complete list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required. Subject to the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement, the company management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as may be necessary. We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for the position; however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted.

We are an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, gender or gender-identity, age, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or parental status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you have a physical and/or mental disability and are interested in applying for employment and need special accommodations to use our website to apply for a position please contact, Recruiting Services at job-assist@akima.com or 571-353-7053. Reasonable accommodation requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

The dedicated email and telephonic options above are reserved only for individuals with disabilities needing accessibility assistance to apply to an open position using our website.

Please do not use the dedicated email or phone number above to inquire on the status of your job application.

In order for our company to stay compliant with government regulations, please apply on line. Please DO NOT email resumes or call in lieu of applying online unless you have a physical and/or mental disability and need assistance with the online application.",3.3,"Akima, LLC
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
135,Big Data Engineer (3+ years),$56k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

What’s in it for you?

Vectorworks Inc. is a global software product company targeting entertainment, architecture and landscape industries with enterprising and intuitive solutions that allow users to create unique designs. We are looking for a Data Engineer to build, maintain, and refine our data pipelines to generate detailed metrics and reports of our software. This person will work as part of our software engineering team.

It’s an exciting time to join the Vectorworks family, and if you are looking for an opportunity to have a lasting impact on a growing team, we hope you’ll take the time to learn more about this opportunity!

Responsibilities:

In this role, you should expect to:

Build and maintain our data infrastructure
Utilize understanding of ETL principles
Exhibit a proficiency in Python and AWS analytic stack (especially S3, RDS, RS, EMR, EC2, Lambda)
Work closely with engineering and other teams to organize and extract data for analysis

Why do you want this job? Because you are:

A self-starter who is motivated to take ownership of projects and drive tasks to completion with minimal supervision
Able to provide direction and identify new areas where data can be applied to improve software and business decision making
Looking for an opportunity where you can grow and move forward with the latest trends in big data technology
Enthusiastic about improving existing data systems and adapting them to be more powerful, usable, and robust.
Qualifications:

Why do we want you? Because you have:

A Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or a related field
A minimum of 3 years’ experience developing data pipelines
Solid understanding of ETL principles and how to apply them
Proficiency in Python, SQL, Spark, and Unix shell
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including the ability to communicate across business areas
The ability to work in a fast-paced and agile development environment
Strong interest in learning and using the latest technologies

Extra Credit:

Experience with Kibana, Redshift, and Tableau Software
Hands-on expertise in many disparate technologies, ranging from front-end user interface to back-end systems as well as all points in between
Experience with distributed computing, NoSQL, and Flask
Familiarity with software logging

Vectorworks Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer",3.2,"Vectorworks Inc.
3.2","Columbia, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
136,Senior Data Scientist,$136k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNSs powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Masters Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.

Powered by JazzHR",3.0,"GNS Healthcare
3.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
137,Data Scientist – Protein Sciences,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"13-Oct-2020

Job ID
304587BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""127! That’s the number of drug discovery projects impacted this year by protein science data at Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

Are you a curious and inspired Data Scientist passionate about bringing protein science data to the next level of informing and impacting drug discovery projects? Do you like working in cross-functional and multidisciplinary teams? Do you enjoy transforming scientific challenges into computational solutions to catalyze efficiency in data-driven drug discovery? As a team member of a global Data Science group with expertise in protein data science, data engineering, computational biology, bioinformatics, screening analytics and predictive modelling this is a unique opportunity waiting for you to leverage protein science data at scale.

Your responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Engage in an interdisciplinary environment with structural biologists, biophysicists, protein chemists, proteomic scientists and molecular modelers to advance structure-based drug discovery using innovative computational approaches.
Champion data stewardship in protein crystallography, biomolecular NMR, cryo-EM and biophysics to enable predictive science.
Design and implement robust applications, methods and end-to-end analysis workflows for automated data processing, quality control and publishing.
Exploit and integrate internal and external protein data sources to generate drug discovery impact.
Ideate and proto-type tailored visualizations and webservices for data dissemination across the organization.
Mentor scientists who are developing their computational skills.
Posting Title
Data Scientist – Protein Sciences",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
138,Data Analyst,$47k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position is responsible for analyzing, reporting and maintaining information within iCare’s enterprise data warehouse and associated databases based on business unit priorities. Additionally, this position may be responsible for assisting with system configuration and support.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIES:

Conducts business analysis, data modeling, logical and physical database design, database optimization, load strategy design and implementation, security and change management.
Create, manage and maintain reports using standard reporting technologies.
Develop strong working relationship with the business units to determine needs and solutions that monitor trends.
Maintain and manage a centralized data dictionary.
Ensure best practices are utilized in defining business processes, including identifying and reporting on trends and deviation.
Ensure adherence to company data architectural guidelines, principles and standards in all project milestones and deliverables.
Work with team to optimize system performance
Create appropriate documentation to support effective requirements definition including charts, graphs, and logic model diagrams as necessary.
Fully participate in iCare’s Compliance Program, including compliance with iCare’s Code of Conduct, policies and procedures, and all applicable Privacy and Security laws

An individual in this position must be able to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities listed above. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.

The above list reflects the general details necessary to describe the principle and essential functions of the position and shall not be construed as the only duties that may be assigned for the position.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Engineering or related field, or equivalent experience
2+ years proven design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
2+ years of experience with relational database systems.
Proficiency in database design concepts and techniques for OLAP
Experience with enterprise-level DBMS systems and tools.
Extensive experience in Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services and Microsoft BI Tool set.
Strong problem-solving skills, logical process thinking, and end-to-end system concepts.
Strong verbal and written communication skills which can clearly articulate complex concepts and ideas to all levels of the organization in both technical and non-technical terms.
Strong knowledge of data mapping and data modeling processes.
Strong knowledge and experience creating reports that allow business users to drill into details.
Analytical skills which effectively deal with conceptual and tangible ideas along with attention to detail.
Working knowledge of the IT development process and life cycle, i.e. roles/responsibilities, tasks, milestones, deliverables.
Team oriented with ability to work effectively with many different people across many diverse organizations.
Ability to work on multiple, concurrent projects in a dynamic environment and manage time appropriately.
Management skills with the ability to plan, organize, and orchestrate activities such as Joint Application Development and review sessions.
Ability to identify and manage risks and issues, providing appropriate escalation when needed.
Data Analyst I (1-4 years of experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development)
Data Analyst II (4-10 years of experience in data analysis and ETL design & development)
Data Analyst III (10+ years of experience in data analysis, ETL, and/or EDW design & development

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Understanding of Medicaid/Medicare
Understanding of healthcare insurance industry

PHYSICAL AND MENTAL DEMANDS:

Physical and mental stamina to handle heavy workloads.
Ability to operate a computer and typical office equipment.

The mental and physical requirements described here are representative of those that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of this position.

WORKING ENVIRONMENT:

iCare is a multi-cultural environment committed to diversity and service to people with disabilities.
Independent Care Health Plan is a professional, performance-oriented organization. Additional time and effort beyond a normal workweek may be required to accomplish company and individual objectives and to provide a high level of service to our members.
Most of work is performed in an office environment.
Periodic business-related travel may be required.
Work conditions may involve stress producing activities and/or timelines.

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an individual encounters while performing the essential functions of this position.

Experience
Required
1 year(s): experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development
2 year(s): experience with relational database systems
2 year(s): design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
Education
Required
Bachelors or better in Engineering or related field
Bachelors or better in Management Information Systems or related field
Bachelors or better in Computer Science or related field
Behaviors
Preferred
Innovative: Consistently introduces new ideas and demonstrates original thinking
Functional Expert: Considered a thought leader on a subject
Detail Oriented: Capable of carrying out a given task with all details necessary to get the task done well
Motivations
Preferred
Growth Opportunities: Inspired to perform well by the chance to take on more responsibility
Self-Starter: Inspired to perform without outside help
Goal Completion: Inspired to perform well by the completion of tasks",2.9,"Independent Care Health Plan
2.9","Milwaukee, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
139,Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology,-1,"We are seeking an exceptional Biology candidate as Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology to advance/lead our CNS biology team and to drive CNS drug discovery programs.
Company Overview: *
ADARx Pharmaceuticals Inc. is a genetic medicine company focusing on base editing of mRNA transcripts. We discover and develop innovative therapeutics that can utilize a family of endogenous enzymes called adenosine deaminase acting on RNA (ADAR) to precisely target and correct single point mutations on a mRNA, thus the production of desired and functional protein is restored. Our vision is to provide effective and safe therapeutics to patients who suffer from currently undruggable diseases.

We are well-financed by a group of renowned VC funds, and our research facility is located in San Diego, California.
The job responsibilities include: *
Play a key role in the execution of neuroscience discovery projects from hit generation to lead optimization
Lead the CNS biology team efforts and contribute to implementation of the R&D strategy for CNS disorders
Drive results in multiple programs
Collaborate with cross functional teams
Interpret, summarize, and present data at project team meetings
Make clear decision in a fast-paced drug discovery environment
Inspire, direct, and manage scientists, and move activities across multiple drug discovery programs forward in a timely manner
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in neurology or related field
8+ years of drug discovery experience in pharmaceutical industry with demonstrated success in leading programs from early stage to candidate nomination
Strong biology leadership
Proven track record for successful drug discovery within neurology
Demonstrated scientific acumen and deep understanding of the disease biology of neurology
A track record of evaluating and leading external collaborations
Collaborative, team-oriented mindset with strong oral and written communication skills
Successful track record in managing biology department/teams including Ph.D. Scientists and Research Associates
Preferred Qualifications: *
Experience leading teams and programs in a pharmaceutical or biotechnology setting
Demonstrated ability to lead and focus teams and drive results on a timely basis
Track record of innovative and creativity
Compensation*
Pay commensurate with experience
401k with company match
Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, FSA, Employee Assistance Program, Employee Discounts
Performance based bonuses
PTO and Holidays
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
_ADARx Pharmaceuticals is an EEO employer committed to an exciting, diverse, and enriching work environment._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
Leading Teams: 5 years (Required)
Drug Discovery: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Location:
San Diego, CA 92121 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.adarx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ADARx Pharmaceuticals,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
140,Machine Learning Engineer,$76k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer

US Citizenship is required due to security clearance requirements.

Are you a motivated engineer who is passionate about embracing new challenges and solving the hardest technical problems in a team-oriented environment? Every day, the engineers at Expedition Technology work together to solve our Nations defense and intelligence challenges by using Machine Learning and Deep Learning to demystify data obtained from signals and images.

Our applied research and development mindset afford our people the opportunity to work on the most cutting-edge methods of optimizing deep learning networks, developing state-of-the-art algorithms and ultimately producing software products that are critical to our nations defense infrastructure.

The success we have already achieved has made Expedition Technology one of the top Machine Learning/Deep Learning research organizations in the Defense and Intelligence communities and we need additional intelligent, passionate, creative people to join our team.

When you join our team, youll have the opportunity to:
Dive directly into the latest computer vision and signal processing research to replicate new techniques published in academia and find ways to make those ideas work on a larger scale
Use your strong Python coding skills to research, design, develop and expand upon algorithms that will train neural networks to deliver actionable intelligence faster and more effectively
Develop deep-learning software prototypes that demonstrate potential usefulness to our customers
Analyze data from disparate sources including images, video, radar, signals and more
Brainstorm solutions to the toughest problems alongside a team of smart, creative, passionate engineers
Participate in machine learning brownbag sessions and other forms of collaborative learning to keep abreast of the constant changes in Machine and Deep Learning
Required skills:
Strong problem-solving skills combined with deep intellectual curiosity and the desire to push technical boundaries
Strong coding skills- preferably in Python, C/C++, Julia or other object-oriented language in a Linux environment
Software development skills and the desire to work on cutting edge development in a Cloud environment
Deep understanding of data structures and algorithms
Knowledge of computer vision and/or signal processing including techniques for classification and feature extraction
Excellent oral, written, presentation and communication skills
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related field. Advance degrees welcome
US Citizenship- Must be a US Citizen eligible to maintain a US Government security clearance
Desired skills:
Experience with deep learning frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Caffe or Keras
About Expedition Technology

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers work on the most challenging problems in Computer Vision, Digital Signal Processing and Software Engineering from a Machine Learning/Deep Learning perspective and collaborate to find the answers. We are a research-focused company whose mission it is to solve our customers most pressing needs in a creative, novel manner.

Expedition Technology offers self-directed, company-paid Medical, Dental and Vision benefits and the freedom to allow you to select which benefits matter most. We offer a 401k with a generous company match, a student loan repayment program, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off and an education reimbursement allowance. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

Interested in joining our team? Lets explore together.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
141,Market Data Analyst,$31k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking a creative, data driven Marketing Analyst to join our fast paced, growing organization. Candidate is responsible for researching product and manufacturing trends, evaluating campaign results and making recommendations for growth and operating efficiency improvements to our management team. The ideal candidate will have experience with complex data mining/analysis and implementation. This is a growth position with upward mobility. Complete benefit package includes medical, dental, vision life insurance, student loan repayment assistance and a 401(k) company matched contribution.

Responsibilities:
Evaluate market trends and patterns to suggest new & complementary products
Manage Distribution Price List and analyze market data to identify cause and effect relationships
Evaluate product, pricing, placement (distribution channels) and promotion (advertisements/marketing campaigns) and present recommendations to management
Work closely with Distribution Channel Partners to grow market share in under-represented markets
Examine return on investment of marketing campaigns
Travel to customers and industry events to gather market intelligence
Visit other Amphenol Business Units domestically and internationally to learn best-practices and facilitate implementation internally
Work closely with Sales and Marketing to track competitive landscape and market trends
Requirements:
Undergraduate or Masters degree in Marketing, Business, Engineering or related field
Demonstrated aptitude for analytics
Proven record of leadership in a work setting and/or through extracurricular activities
Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Preferred:
1-3 years of experience in a fast-paced global manufacturing environment
“An Equal Opportunity Employer” Minority/Female/Disabled/Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity or National Origin"" Drug free workplance.

ITAR - The candidate must be able to legally work in the United States; we are unable to provide sponsorship. Position requires candidate to be a US Person as defined in ITAR, 22 CFR 120.15 (US Citizenship or Resident Alien Status) and defined by 8 USC 1101(a) (20).

Apply for This Position",3.5,"SV Microwave
3.5","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Public,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
142,Data Scientist - TS/SCI w/ Poly,$76k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Why wake up every day and want more when YOU CAN HAVE IT? Do you love KNOWING at the end of each day that your work made a difference? We embrace and solve some of the world's toughest challenges. We’re focused on ensuring our intelligence customers have the right tools, technologies, and tactics to keep pace with an ever evolving threat landscape and succeed in their mission to protect people and critical assets around the world. Who wouldn’t be fulfilled being part of that every day? We know once you join Team Leidos, you are sure to go home at the end of every day knowing YOU MADE A DIFFERENCE, resulting in one of the most REWARDING careers you could have imagined. EACH DAY MATTERS!

We have an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Jr Data Scientist to provide mission critical support to our customer. As part of an Agile Team, you will design, develop, and maintain software applications using a tailored SAFe Agile DevSecOps Scrum process. This role implements data auditing, reporting, and security through the use of existing tools and developing new ones. This role requires familiarization with a broad range of data analysis tools and techniques This role leads complex projects requiring data analysis, interpretation, and communication to support decision-makers and customers.

Primary Responsibilities

Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Participate in the development of documentation.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Analyze data to effectively coordinate the installation of new systems or modifications to existing systems.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Apply best practices and standard operating procedures.

Basic Qualifications

Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders.
Experience querying and analyzing machine logs.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across team
Candidate must have a BS and 4-8 years or prior relevant experience or Masters and 2-6 years or prior relevant experience.
Additional years of experience can be accepted in lieu of education.

Clearance/Citizenship

Candidate must be US Citizen.
Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with Polygraph

""External Referral Eligible""

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
143,Computer Science Machine Learning Engineer,$85k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

If you are a talented and motivated early career computer scientist (or equivalent) looking to put your skills to use in a challenging environment that includes supporting military tactical operations and military intelligence, then this is the opportunity for you! MITRE’s Army Division has openings for recent graduates in computer science, machine learning, software engineering or similar degree programs to work a variety of cutting edge projects in information warfare, command and control, fire support (artillery), smart munitions, intelligence, signal processing and much more. The technical work areas include applying machine learning for real-time signal processing, data modeling/management, sensor integration, and UML for software designs. Modern technologies such as React, Node.js, Angular, Protobuf, git, NOSQL, Atlassian, Slack, and more are utilized. Opportunities in research and development exist in such areas as Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Natural Language Processing, and Distributed Computing to support the Army command, control, communications and intelligence capabilities of the future!

MITRE’s Army division has locations in Aberdeen, MD; McLean, VA and other locations.

Responsibilities include:
Develop and hone machine learning algorithms and techniques for real-time operations
Develop software using agile processes and tools (JIRA, git, Jenkins/gradle, and more)
Deliver machine learning based designs and prototypes to Army R&D and Acquisition, Logistics and Technology sponsors
Develop methods and algorithms to represent complex data into usable formats and presentation for decision making
Evaluate technologies and commercial products for potential military applicability
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Programming Language experience with either
Java or similar object-oriented language
Python
Understanding of current machine learning techniques, methods and best-practices
Understanding of software design patterns and best practices
Enthusiasm and a desire to learn and grow
Candidate must be able to obtain and maintain a DoD Secret Clearance which requires US citizenship
Preferred Qualifications:
Advance degree Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Two years of relevant experience
Proven experience with machine learning
Building software with languages/frameworks such as Maven
Understanding of databases (relational or NOSQL)
Familiarity with serialization formats including JSON, XML, and Google Protobuf
Technical writing skills such as drafting software designs and technical guidance
Strong interpersonal, briefing, and communication skills
Ability to obtain and maintain a DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Aberdeen, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
144,"Medical Lab Technologist- MLT, Clinical Lab Scientist- Microbiology",-1,"*Position Type: * Can be full-time or part-time (looking for full-time tech and PRN tech)
*Scheduled Hours per 2 week Pay Period: * 16-20 hrs
*Primary Location: * Eustis, Florida REFERENCE LAB

*Shift: * Flexible-8 hr shift weekend

*Job Summary*
Performs laboratory analysis on received specimens, providing clinical information for diagnosis, treatment and prevention of diseases. Responsible for overall quality, efficiency, and safety in the performance of assigned technical duties in the Microbiology and Molecular departments.

*Essential Function*

· Demonstrates proficiency and follows testing procedures and policies by adherence to quality assurance guidelines for equipment and work area, documenting corrective action to any non-conforming event.

· Prepares reagents, maintains an adequate supply of materials for test procedures and manages inventory to effectively reduce departmental waste/expense.

· Exercises clinical judgment in assessing priorities while identifying, problem solving and offering solutions to test systems through the appropriate department channels, i.e. contacts hotline to troubleshoot with a specialist when necessary to resolve the issue or set-up service when appropriate.

· Maintains clear, real time communications shift-to-shift and with leadership regarding issues, concerns and problems which may affect patient care or the operation of the department.

· Participates in competency assessment program, where qualified.

· Enter data from analysis of medical tests or clinical results into LIS system.

*EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE REQUIRED**: *

· Associates Degree minimum, Bachelor’s degree preferred

· Science degree meeting state licensure requirements (64B3-5.003).

· *Plate Reading and Molecular testing experience preferred**.*

*LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION OR REGISTRATION REQUIRED**: *
State of Florida- Medical Technologist License in at least one specialty: (Microbiology specialty required) Clinical Chemistry, Hematology, Molecular and/or Serology

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
Schedule:
* Day shift

Experience:
* Microbiology: 2 years (Preferred)

Work Location:
* One location

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
* Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous

This Company Describes Its Culture as:
* Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused

Company's website:
* Mid-florida Pathology

Company's Facebook page:
* Mid-florida Pathology

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Mid-Florida Pathology,"Eustis, FL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
145,Sr. DATA SCIENTIST,$155k-$247k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.8,"Samsung Research America
3.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
146,Customer Insights Data Scientist,$82k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Hi, We’re AppFolio.

We’re innovators, changemakers, and collaborators. We’re more than just a software company — we’re a cloud-based powerhouse that creates products to make our customers’ lives easier. We’re revolutionizing the way people do business, and we want your ideas, your enthusiasm, and your passion to help us keep on innovating.

We love where we work, and you can, too.

To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.

Who We're Looking For:

The Customer Insights Data Scientist will bring together quantitative and qualitative data and be responsible for the ongoing analysis, reporting, and insight identification for vital Customer Experience programs and metrics such as but not limited to NPS and VOC. As part of the CX team to build a focused set of CX metrics used across the business as predictive measures that improve the customer experience and drive business outcomes.

Outcomes
Launch VOC text analytics capabilities by leveraging technology and machine learning.
Implement & create text analytics models and processes to synthesize and identify emerging customer insights informing product development.
Stitch together multiple customer data sources (CRM and product data) to perform comprehensive CX analysis to identify past, present, and potential customer patterns yielding actionable insights to drive business change.
Build CX metrics - data and dashboard
Bring together multiple customer data sources (CRM and product data) to perform comprehensive CX analysis to identify past, present and potential customer patterns yielding actionable insights to drive business change
Own monthly analysis and insights for NPS program leading to recommendations for actions across the business to drive an increase in NPS in targeted customer segments
Contribute to ongoing improvements to NPS reporting, dashboards, and engagement across the company.
Identify and champion impactful customer experience insights aligned to our key business priorities across customer segments, markets, and offerings.
Competencies
Strategic Thinking. Ability to execute against a clear framework for defining a predictive set of Customer Experience metrics that drive business outcomes. Experience with CX metrics industry trends, best practices, and technology capabilities is preferred.
Tireless Advocate for the Customer. Lead with the customer's voice in everything you do and instill the customer mindset across the organization.
Analytical Skills. Able to synthesize quantitative and qualitative data across separate customer listening posts to draw impactful insights that inform strategy and prioritization.
Agile & Experimentation Mindset. Unafraid to take innovative approaches to problems and bring other's creative ideas forward with an agile ""progress over perfection"" mindset.
Business Acumen. Ability to connect the dots and communicate how customer experience efforts and metrics can impact business priorities and commit to delivering specific business outcomes.
Communication. Storyteller with the ability to weave together data, insights, and voice of the customer to inspire an organization to action.
Influence and Partnership. Relationship builder with the ability to navigate across the organization to drive alignment and action effectively.
CX Industry Expertise. Develop expertise, knowledge, and connections of the CX industry, best practices, and experts to inform our work and how we operate.
Must-Haves
2+ years experience in the CX space understanding how customer data can be used to dig into problems and work cross-functionally to improve the customer experience.
Experience building and leading text analytics models with experience building using Clarabridge(preferably), Qualtrics, and or Medallia.
Solid understanding of industry-standard methodologies of customer insights, and desire to help evolve our VoC program
Strong ability to analyze quantitative and qualitative data, optimize data sets, tools, and analysis techniques to drive business outcomes.
Understanding of how to apply statistical methods to identify drivers of business results based on customer feedback and customer journey touch points.
Sharp emotional intelligence and skills in leading robust multi-functional relationships.
Effective communicator with written and oral presentations to inspire actions. Demonstrate validated presentation, demonstration, and technical writing skills.
Substantial experience with analytical software (Tableau, SQL, data warehouse, etc.) preferred.
Experience working in a fast-paced, data-driven B2B SaaS environment is preferred.
Bachelor's degree, Master's Degree preferred.
Our Story

AppFolio (NASDAQ: APPF) was founded in 2006 with the mission to revolutionize vertical industry businesses by providing great software and service. Our easy-to-use, cloud-based software helps our customers more effectively market, manage, and grow their businesses. Today our software solutions exist in two verticals including the real estate (AppFolio Property Manager, AppFolio Property Manager PLUS, and AppFolio Investment Manager) and legal (MyCase) industries.

To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.",4.6,"AppFolio
4.6","San Diego, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
147,Data Engineer,$58k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you passionate about Data and Cloud Technology? Do you enjoy working with Python, ETL Frameworks, and BI Reporting? Are you intrigued by Investments and Finance? Do you want to join an Innovative Team with a start-up mindset and fortune 100 stability? If Yes, there’s a place at Liberty Mutual Investments for you!

About the job:

The Data Engineer will help build technology to enable Back and Middle Office Investment functions (trade flows, accounting, reconciliation, reporting, and automated batch scheduling workflows) for integration with the investments Accounting Book of Record. Knowledge of investment financial data to serve application integration to trading platform and reporting is strongly desired. Prior experience working on Agile scrum teams in a scaled framework is preferred.

You will possess a hardworking “can-do” mindset with focus on the collective success of the scrum team to iteratively deliver high quality products to enable the investments business.

Collaborates with the Product Owner, Scrum Master, Subject Matter Experts and Development team to define and analyze user stories tracked in Jira.

Collaborate in design, development and implementation of software solutions for LMI Tech using modern technology stack.

Demonstrates solutions and articulates business value to LMI business partners at sprint showcases.

Desired skills:

Bachelor’s degree in technical discipline, or equivalent professional experience.

Minimum 3-5 years' experience as Data Engineer.

Expertise in MS SQL Server (Programming views, stored procedures, and functions).

Expertise in Python (ETL tools- Pandas/NumPy, Python unit testing etc.).

Experience with Cloud platform technologies (AWS/Azure).

Experience with Data Warehousing, Dimensional Modeling (Kimball etc.), and Data Extraction Utilities.

Experience with business intelligence tools and reporting solution (PowerBI, Tableau etc.)

Experience with Financial Systems and reporting (Investments accounting/General Ledger)

Preferred skills:

Experience in integrating large scale financial investment/ERP systems (SimCorp Dimension or similar platform) is a plus.

Experience with CI/CD pipeline, and DevOps.

Experience with REST API.

Experience with Git/Bitbucket.

Experience in Agile software development practices (story sizing, sprint planning, retrospectives).

Experience with automated testing software (Selenium, Ranorex, Tosca).

Benefits: We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview:

At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.

We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
148,Big Data Analyst BSLEP7,$44k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings requires the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel.
Through the use of effective “big data” technologies and solutions, CBP ensures that the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure. In response to this challenge, ManTech, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified and versatile data analysts to facilitate data-driven decision making in response to national security threats.
The primary objective of the data analysis team is three-fold: 1) Support the development of predictive models via the identification of behaviors and attributes that inform illicit activities; 2) Provide on-demand analysis to support emergent operational needs; and, 3) Develop performance dashboards and artifacts to inform resource allocation, justify requirements, and support statutory reporting mandates.
In all three areas, data analysts must be capable of transforming large volumes of raw data, both structured and unstructured forms, into mission-focused insights that enhance understanding of mission performance, workload, and/or behavioral trends (i.e., strategic, tactical, and operational insights). Analysts may be called upon to support a diverse array of initiatives involving complex queries in support of network analysis, entity resolution, threat research, visualization, and impact assessments.

The strongest applicants will engage in highly dynamic, threat/risk driven operating environments. They will bring a proven track record of working with decision support tools and applications operationally employed by mission-support entities. Within three to six months of joining the project, we expect analysts will:
Master relevant data schemas, reference data, joining conditions, and relationships of existing databases, as well as associated warehouses and data marts, involving trade, travel, national security, and law enforcement data.
Conduct exploratory analysis demonstrating: a refined understanding of the strengths and weaknesses of the underlying data; a willingness to explore non-traditional data sources and evaluation methods; and a clear link to mission need.
Construct query code as well as run, save, edit, optimize, and document queries using SQL and other languages including Spark to extract mission-critical insights.
Design, develop and deliver analytic artifacts such as dashboards, scorecards, and structured Excel reports that: support executive-level, at-a-glance findings; empower non-technical users to explore user-specific equities (e.g. PowerBI); and/or provide detailed information informing operational outcomes.
Assess validity, accuracy, completeness, consistency, and uniformity of data as well as develop mitigation steps and processes to address data quality issues in support of clean data.
Translate findings (e.g. mission impacts, limitations of findings/ analytical confidence, analytical methods and techniques employed) to clearly articulate the “so what” within the context of mission performance to technical and non-technical audiences in the form of written reports and in-person briefings.
Engage internal and external stakeholders in a professional and informed manner to collect analysis requirements and ensure alignment of expected outcomes.
Integrate with, and materially contribute to, portfolio teams as a matrixed resource to provide data analytics expertise in support of modeling, ad hoc query support, or performance assessment initiatives in collaboration with data scientists, intelligence analysts, developers, and other participants under the direction of a project manager.
Applicants should note that while some formal training exists to support building knowledge of missions and the implementation of data-driven solutions, but much of the knowledge must be gained through on-the-job training and individual initiative. Technical knowledge is insufficient to achieve effectiveness in this operating environment; expertise must be enhanced with rapid acquisition of mission knowledge and demonstrated commitment positive mission outcomes. Therefore, we seek self-starters who are capable of independent exploration and knowledge acquisition, willing to develop informal support networks, and with an appreciation for the immense challenge of safeguarding the Nation’s borders.

BS Degree in a related technical fields (Computer Science, Math, Statistics, etc.)
Hands on experience working with data-mining, analysis or statistical software such as R, Matlab, SAS Enterprise Miner, SPSS Modeler, or SQL Developer for data analysis
Hands on experience with at least one of the following technologies: Hadoop eco system, including HDFS, YARN, Cassandra, Hive, Pig, and Spark
Hands on experience with Batch-oriented and streaming distributed processing methods such as Nifi, Spark, Kafka, or Storm
Hands on experience with distributed search engines like Elasticsearch or Solr
Conceptual understanding of – and/or prior experiences related to – data profiling, fuzzy matching, entity resolution, and signal detection theory (specifically with respect to SD theory: designing and improving upon systems that monitor, minimize, and balance false positive and false negative outcomes)
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with programming languages such as Java, Python, and SQL
Unix / Linux experience
Experience working in field of entity resolution, analytics, data mining or name matching.
Delivering solutions using Amazon Web Services (e.g., AWS EC2, RDS, S3)
Experience with Javascript frameworks like Angular, React and JQuery is a plus
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI)

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
149,Advanced Computer Scientist,-1,"Advanced Computer Scientist

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a detailed software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the Advanced Computer Scientist position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software environment containing code in Python, MATLAB, C/C++ and Java. A strong CS background is needed and experience in cloud computing and machine learning are very desirable. Good communication skills, with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Master’s degree and 5+ years applied and relevant experience or Bachelor’s degree and 7+ years’ experience
Demonstrated capability in scientific programming of high-level language such as C/C++on Unix/Linux platforms
Working knowledge of high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Experience with interfacing extensive C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages.
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
150,Associate Clinical Scientist,$42k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Associate Clinical Scientist will serve as a clinical scientist providing pharmacology support and execution of the development, update and maintenance of the TRHC?s clinical decision support system (CDSS) of drug-drug interactions based on drug pharmacokinetics properties. The successful candidate will have a working knowledge of clinical pharmacology, drug metabolism, drug transporters, and related pharmacokinetics principles. This person will work in collaboration with other research and clinical scientists in the Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development institute for the integration of generated information and of knowledge into the overall program strategies, to improve the efficiency of the TRHC?s CDSS, improve our mechanistic understanding and provide scientific rationale. This individual will also work in close collaboration with the TRHC academy to provide advanced training and review educational programs related to the TRHC?s CDSS. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a high-impact clinical pharmacology team and collaborative setting.

TRHC Scientific Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development Institute (SPPRDI) is committed to the development of proprietary products, their validation and recognition by the scientific and regulatory communities to optimize medication regimen in order to improve patient outcomes, reduce utilization of various healthcare services, lower healthcare costs, and manage risk.
Accountable and responsible for ensuring maintenance and update of drugs into the CDSS.
Performs, integrates and interpret PK analysis including pre-clinical and clinical studies.
Interpret enzymatic assays, in vitro/ex vivo drug metabolism studies. Integrate metabolism and transporter data to provide mechanistic interpretation into the CDSS.
Fully knowledgeable about PK?s drugs; to address, identify and resolve scientific issues.
Contributes to expert pharmacology input into educational training programs and materials.
Complies with all applicable regulations, maintains proper records in accordance with SOPs and policies
Education:
PharmD or MD equivalent and PhD from an accredited institution in Clinical pharmacology, Pharmacokinetics, Drug metabolism, or other relevant fields or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience:
Experience in clinical pharmacology research.
Experience in research (post-doctoral formation/fellowship; up to 2 years) would be advantageous.
Specific Skills:
An in depth knowledge of drug metabolizing enzymes and transporters would be considered highly beneficial.
Demonstrated ability and strong understanding with preclinical and clinical PK data.
Demonstrates ability to drive for results independently.
Participates in team for ensuring valid methods and in assessing review process.
Applicant should be organized, self-motivated and capable of working autonomously and in a collaborative environment.
It would be advantageous for the candidate to have knowledge on pharmacogenomics.",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Orlando, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
151,Associate Data Scientist,-1,"Associate Data Scientist
Location


United States - Remote (location open)

Functional Area


Research & Analytics

Employment Status


Regular

Apply Now

About Press Ganey

Press Ganey pioneered the health care performance improvement movement more than 30 years ago. Today, Press Ganey offers an integrated suite of solutions that enable enterprise transformation across the patient journey. Delivered through a cutting-edge digital platform built on a foundation of data security, Press Ganey solutions address safety, clinical excellence, patient experience and workforce engagement. The company works with more than 33,000 health care facilities in its mission to reduce patient suffering and enhance caregiver resilience to improve the overall safety, quality and experience of care.

Job Overview

Press Ganey is looking for an energetic, creative and curious data scientist to join its Data Science team! We have an opening for a data geek (statistician, data scientist, economist, etc.) interested in producing novel – and impactful - data-driven insights, and developing world-class analytic products, from our database of over 1 billion patient experience and employee engagement results, representing over 20 thousand healthcare facilities. Positions are available for our Boston, Chicago, Charlotte, or Baltimore office.

Duties & Responsibilities:
Function as technical lead, in collaboration with other business partners serving the analytic client, to develop deliverables requirements
Independently write programs in appropriate language (e.g. R, SQL, Python), to develop data (sets), from multiple databases, needed to support deliverables
Independently produce analysis (e.g. basic data analysis, statistical test, statistical modeling) or analytics (e.g. a dashboard), with appropriate tools (e.g. Excel, R, Python, HTML, Tableau)
Document work
Produce written reports, for internal constituents, which summarize analytic deliverable; including methods, interpretations, and business implications
Provide ad-hoc analytic support to internal clients (e.g. sales, account management, advisory services, product management, and consulting), including answering data and methodology questions, interpretation of results and
Stay abreast of contemporary analytics, such as big data technologies (e.g. Azure, AWS, Hadoop, OLAP tools), analytic technologies (e.g. SAS, R, Python, Tableau, etc.), and statistical (including data-mining) methods
In collaboration with business partners (e.g. Knowledge Management, Engineering, Product Management, and Custom Reporting), develop prototypes of scalable, novel analytic solutions that address important business questions
Develop and prototype novel data sets that integrate existing PG or external data, for the purpose of developing novel analytic solutions
Stay abreast of healthcare industry issues affecting PG clients (e.g. value based reimbursement programs, meaningful use, “Population Health”)
Develop internal network of colleagues, and a corresponding reputation for collaboration, that removes barriers to analytic production and enables problem solving
Qualifications:
Intermediate to advanced proficiency with SQL, SAS, R, STATA or other high level data programming language
Basic proficiency with Python, PHP, Perl, VB, JavaScript, C++ or other programming language
Formal training or extensive applied experience with advanced statistical methods such as regression-type modeling and data-mining methods (e.g. classification trees)
Proficiency with data visualization
2+ years developing data that merges relational tables, either within a relational database or related “big data” environments (e.g. SQL Server, Hadoop)
2+ years of data and statistical analysis
1-2 years project management experience, including demonstrated success with cross-functional collaboration
1-2 years implementing novel analytics with minimal supervision
Minimum Education:
Bachelors or higher in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, or other quantitative discipline.
All positions at Press Ganey require an applicant who has accepted an offer to undergo a background check. The specific checks are based on the nature of the position. Background checks may include some or all of the following: SSN/SIN validation, education verification, employment verification, criminal check, search against global sanctions and government watch lists, fingerprint verification, credit check, and/or drug test. By applying for a position with Press Ganey, you understand that you will be required to undergo a background check should you be made an offer. You also understand that the offer is contingent upon successful completion of the background check and results consistent with Press Ganey's employment policies. You will be notified during the hiring process which checks are required for the position.

For more information about Press Ganey, visit our web site at pressganey.com .

Press Ganey Associates, Inc. is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and well committed to a diverse workforce. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.

Pay Transparency Non-Discrimination Notice – Press Ganey will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information.",3.9,"Press Ganey
3.9",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
152,Data Scientist,$84k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Why wake up every day and want more when YOU CAN HAVE IT? Do you love KNOWING at the end of each day that your work made a difference? We embrace and solve some of the world's toughest challenges. We’re focused on ensuring our intelligence customers have the right tools, technologies, and tactics to keep pace with an ever evolving threat landscape and succeed in their mission to protect people and critical assets around the world. Who wouldn’t be fulfilled being part of that every day? We know once you join Team Leidos, you are sure to go home at the end of every day knowing YOU MADE A DIFFERENCE, resulting in one of the most REWARDING careers you could have imagined. EACH DAY MATTERS!

We have an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Data Scientist to provide mission critical support to our customer. As part of an Agile Team, you will design, develop, and maintain software applications using a tailored SAFe Agile DevSecOps Scrum process. This role implements data auditing, reporting, and security through the use of existing tools and developing new ones. This role requires familiarization with a broad range of data analysis tools and techniques This role leads complex projects requiring data analysis, interpretation, and communication to support decision-makers and customers.

This role evaluates and uses algorithms for Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML). This role develops scripts, notebooks or applications (using Python or Java and associated libraries or frameworks: Scikit-Learn, Numpy, Tensorflow, Pytorch, Spark, Spark MLlib, H20.ai, etc.) that utilize, collect, aggregate and clean large data sets to perform analysis, clustering, entity resolution and structured information extraction for work products. Models are trained and refined using these tools and evaluated for effectiveness using appropriate criteria/metrics for the task. This role collaborates across a team of Data Scientists, Data Administrators, Software and Data Engineers to produce work products.

Primary Responsibilities

This role designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources.
This role develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, query techniques, models complex business problems, and automated processes to cleanse, integrate, and evaluate datasets.
This role supports objectives and tasks by leveraging numerous tools and techniques to include Python, Splunk, query experience, R and the like.
Works with cross-discipline teams to ensure connectivity between various data sources and business problems.
Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations.
This role develops algorithms and analytical techniques to improve business performance.
Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Experience with Python, Splunk, and query experience is required.
Experience negotiating complex scenarios and challenges and devising courses of action to resolve situations with predictable outcomes.
Experience leading critical objectives where decision making is of utmost concern to the outcome.
Experience supervising others.
Candidate must have Masters with 12-15 years of prior relevant experience or Doctorate with 8+ years of prior relevant experience. Additional years of experience can be accepted in lieu of education.

Clearance/Citizenship

Candidate must be US Citizen.
Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with Polygraph

""External Referral Eligible""

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
153,Computational Scientist I,$90k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused company that will inspire you and support your career? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as a Computational Scientist in our Cambridge, Massachusetts office.

Here, everyone matters and you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission. You will be empowered to provide leadership and global functional expertise for projects across the Takeda portfolio.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Analyzing and interpreting high dimensional molecular data for the development of GI Therapeutics
Identifying and developing advanced computational biology approaches to identify targets and provide translational medicine hypotheses.
Generate data insights to drive GI projects, Interface with research teams and support the data analysis and interpretation needs of GI projects
Drive collaborations with internal groups, external partners, including CROs and academia for data analysis and machine learning.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Support GI discovery teams to identify novel drug targets and achieve translational medicine objectives using advanced computational biology techniques.
Interact closely with biologists in the GI DDU to design experimental studies, plan analyses, data integration and data interpretation.
Process, QC and analyze microbiome datasets (16S and shotgun metagenomics)
Identify, build, and use bioinformatic pipelines to process and QC other omics data types including genomics, transcriptomics, single cell sequencing, proteomics and metabolomics.
Interpret preclinical and clinical datasets using appropriate statistical methods.
Create visualizations, interpret high dimensional data and explain results to cross-functional teams.
Perform integrative analyses with multi-omics datasets, identifying novel targets and achieving translational medicine goals.
Develop machine learning algorithms, including deep neural network algorithms.
Independently conduct data analysis tasks within a project scope, exercising judgement to evaluate a variety of statistical factors.
Independently keep abreast of current literature in computational biology for drug development.
Schedule and execute on tasks to meet deadlines.
Maintain and share code.
Plan and coordinate computational biology activities internally and in partnership with external CROs and academic partners, including complex projects requiring multiple members of the team and organization.
Prepare and present comprehensive scientific reports to a full range of internal and external audiences.
Work collaboratively with data scientists and data engineering groups to enhance our computational infrastructure, user interface, query and visualization capabilities.
Writes study reports and presents data effectively in all settings and with participants of all levels of the organization.

DIMENSIONS AND ASPECTS

Technical/Functional (Line) Expertise

Knowledge of and experience with machine learning and bioinformatic techniques.
Experience with high dimensional data analysis derived from Next Generation Sequencing, including some of the following: microbiome data, RNASeq, DNASeq, miRNA, copy number, epigenetics, and single cell sequencing
Hands-on experience developing and implementing bioinformatic pipelines for microbiome data analysis, RNASeq, DNASeq, single cell datasets, and metabolomics.
Solid knowledge of Unix/Linux, command line interfaces, and fluency in some common scripting and/or programming language (e.g., R, Python, Perl, Java, C / C++).
Familiarity with parallel computing, relational databases (e.g., SQL) and cloud computing or distributed computing (i.e. AWS)
Familiarity with Tensorflow/Keras or equivalent deep learning language
Theoretical knowledge of bioinformatics, computational biology; Keeps current with emerging trends in bioinformatics and computational biology
Familiarity with popular public domain data sources and programmatic interfaces
Experience in designing and conducting computational biology activities to meet program objectives; able to provide input on timelines and resource needs as indicated
Able to evaluate/develop computational methods based on project needs
Basic knowledge of biomedical science and technologies outside specific discipline
Strong scientific understanding of molecular biology and genomics
Excellent problem solving, communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
Independent, self-starting and supportive of team-based research and able to work effectively in a matrix organization

Leadership

Ability to work in a team and influence team to make data driven decisions

Decision-making and Autonomy

Independently manages own workload
Scientifically independent
Ability to search literature and come up with innovative solution to difficult problems

Interaction

Conducts scientific presentations to internal audiences

Innovation

Receives high level instructions on all work, determines methods on new assignments, works closely with manager, may manage junior staff
Determines methods on new assignments; perform literature search as needed to propose innovation solutions

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

PhD degree in a scientific discipline, or
MS with 6+ years experience, or
BS with 8+ years experience

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement
Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Learn more at takedajobs.com.

Takeda is an EEO employer of minorities, women, disabled, protected veterans, and considers qualified applicants with criminal histories in accordance with applicable laws. For more information, visit http://www.takeda.us/careers/EEO_Policy_Statement.aspx

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please

#LI-KL1

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
154,Senior Food Scientist,$94k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Food Scientist *
We’re looking for a Product Developer/ Senior Food Scientist who thrives on the excitement of developing and innovating natural syrup products and contributing to project teams that are re-shaping the product portfolio.

YOU are a passionate product developer with a history of successful launches. Your background includes formulation experience across multiple manufacturing processes, ingredient types, and product lines. You have a strong understanding of flavor chemistry and can create amazing flavor combinations. You prefer to work in a high-energy, collaborative product development environment where you can take initiative. You’re practiced at taking new product ideas from concept through commercialization.

You’re the type of person who moves easily from project to project. You are a ‘go-to’ for development of natural flavor systems and ingredient functionality. Your “can do” attitude, relationship-building talent, and engaging communication skills make you an effective partner in and outside of Torani.

Look out a year from now: You’re being recognized as one of our most innovative contributors. You’ve developed an “out-of-the-box” formulation for a new natural syrup that exceeded expectations. You have become the anchor of the syrup cultivation team.
SUCCESS FACTORS (FIRST 12-18 MONTHS) *
_Overall _

 *New Products*: You have renovated and commercialized one product line and key line extensions at target cost, on time, and on trend. You’ve delivered amazing, customer-preferred, easy-to-use flavor with simple, natural ingredients.

 *Formula Renovation*: You have used your bench skills to improve existing products to beat competition in preference taste tests.

 *Collaboration*: Strong relationships are in place across the organization and with external partners, as demonstrated by the successful, smooth launch of new products and integrated ways of working with partner functions. You are a leader on the R+D team.

 *Project Management: * Your project management excellence is evident through fulfillment of your product plans and milestones. You are a go-to product development expert and go between line extension, cost optimization, and flavor improvement initiatives. You are detail oriented and can stick to set timelines.

 *Expertise: * Has brought synergistic technical expertise to enhance our capabilities, and has helped us deliver the more natural, simple profiles that have expanded our product portfolio and grown our new product business.

 *Has a little fun along the way! *
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS & ATTRIBUTES: *
 Bachelor’s Degree in food science or related discipline, Master’s preferred
At least 7 years of relevant, progressive experience in beverage or flavor product development
 Successfully developed consumer-preferred, delicious products with no artificial ingredients
 Experience developing products from concept to commercialization, including: Writing and documenting formulas and specifications, Calculating costs, Conducting plant trials Positive collaboration with internal and external manufacturing partners
 Implemented test protocols for sensory and shelf life studies
 Demonstrated experience in applied flavor chemistry
 Practiced with working in product data management systems (eg Oracle PLM or similar)
 Demonstrated ability to manage multiple projects well
 Live in SF Bay Area or willing to relocate at own expense
 Eligible to work in US without sponsorship (now & in the future)
 Proficient in Word, Excel, and Outlook

Torani is one of the fastest growing and dynamic specialty food companies in the Bay Area. Perhaps you’ve been wondering if there’s a right company fit, where you might combine your deep expertise with purposeful work. If your core beliefs and values resonate with “Flavor for All, Opportunity for All”, we hope you’ll feel the spark. We’re dedicated to bringing our superb portfolio of natural flavorful products to people of diverse needs and incomes. And while our legacy of team and community focus started quietly in our passion for people development, it will flourish with B Corp certification. Torani is recognized as one of the most fun, friendly and warm companies you’ll come across.
_*_
_*_*

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Oracle: 1 year (Preferred)
Excel: 1 year (Preferred)
Microsoft Word: 1 year (Preferred)
Communication Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Microsoft Outlook: 1 year (Preferred)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative",3.5,"Torani
3.5","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
155,Sr Principal Data Scientist,$150k-$239k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

OBJECTIVE:

The purpose of this position is to provide data science expertise in the following areas:

Understanding and effectively working with a wide variety of data sources, such as wearable device data (for example accelerometry and ECG), voice recordings, imaging data, electronic health records or social media postings. Gleaning insights from these datasets and accurately assessing their usefulness and limitations.
Applying a breadth of data science methodogies as needed for various projects and data types. Projects will require advanced analytical and statistical methods, such as statistical inference and modern methods for machine learning and AI.
Identifying and applying state-of-the-art data manipulation and analysis tools, in various programming languages, to develop bespoke analysis pipelines.
Independently designing studies, ranging from simple to more complex, and supporting all aspects of projects from data wrangling through to machine learning and statistical analysis.
Understanding how data science projects fit within Takeda’s preclinical and clinical efforts, with the goal of using data science to better understand the patient journey and to help us tailor interventions that maximize patient benefit.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Independently represent data science function on global project teams in support of pre-clincial and clinical studies and compound level programs.
Play a leadership role in the development and review of the study synopsis, protocol, statistical analysis plan, clinical study report, ensuring accurate and statistically valid deliverables.
Perform end-to-end data analyses, from hypotheses formulation, experimental design, writing analysis plans, data cleaning, executing analysis, and preparing reports and documentation.
Develop and support best data handling and data provenance practices utilizing reproducible, interpretable research approahces
Strengthen Takeda’s advanced analytics toolkit by identifying and applying emerging techniques, as well as by advancing the state of the art and developing novel analysis tools as needed.
Collaborate effectively within a matrix environment, with scientists in various therapeutic areas to understand disease biology and to identify or develop appropriate goals for data science work (for example identifying sensitive and specific endpoints for segmenting patient population, tracking disease progression, quantifying quality of life, etc.) as well as with with colleagues from pharmacology, chemistry, imaging, translational sciences, computational biology, experimental medicine
Work closely with Takeda statisticians to ensure statistical issues in data analysis are addressed as needed.
Anticipate and communicate internal and external resource and quality issues that may impact deliverables or timelines of the program. Propose and implement solutions. Escalate issues to management as appropriate in a timely manner.
Increase the internal impact of Takeda’s data science work by identifying opportunities across therapeutic areas.
Increase the external recognition of Takeda’s data science work by participating in conferences, publishing work and developing external collaborations.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:

Education in a relevant field, for example a) PhD in a field such as Biostatistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics with at least 6 years of experience and a clear interest in data science methods, or b) Master’s degree with at least 9 years of relevant experience
Expert-level knowledge of data science programming languages (Python and R, or similar) and experience with recommended practices for software development.
Signficant depth of expertise in at least one field relevant to the job (for example, machine learning, signal processing, etc.) and strong background in both supervised and unsupervised machine learning.
Ability to work independently on complicated datasets, including all aspects of data analysis (data cleaning, algorithm development, statistical analysis, and documentation).
Strongly prefer a working knowledge of UNIX operating systems, ideally with experience in high-performance computing environments.
Excellent oral and written communications skills.
Strong project management skills.
Willingness and ability to self-educate in new areas.
Strong collaborative skills and ability to work with a cross-functional team.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ability to sit and stand for long periods of time.
Carrying, handling and reaching for objects.
Ability to lift and carry over 25 pounds.
Manual dexterity to operate office equipment i.e. computers, phones, etc.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Access to transportation to attend various meetings held in proximity to the Takeda offices.
Able to fly to various meetings at investigator, vendor or regulatory agency sites.
Some international travel may be required.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
156,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Machine Learning Engineer Northern, VA

Machine Learning Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Machine Learning (ML) Engineers to produce automated anomaly/object detection and characterization, forecasting, optimization, and recommendation solutions to national security challenges using modular, cloud-native, API-centric approaches. These solutions will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on incorporating machine learning insights to automate and scale analysis and improve decision support. Teams will be working in a highly collaborative environment and expected to identify opportunities to apply and improve data-driven insights and support related design and development within big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Engage with mission owners/operators to discover applications for ML, set project expectations, define requirements, and review results
Design and develop reusable workflows for data integration, transformation, and feature engineering required to train models
Train and validate models, often in big data, distributed environments
Perform exploratory data analysis to understand data and model-derived insights
Perform model introspection to understand model behaviors and explain predictions
Visualize data and model-derived insights to communicate internally and externally
Integrate models into operational systems
Lead trade studies, analyses of alternatives, and assessments of existing systems
Develops or provides input to engineering artifacts
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 5 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Ability to describe the data assumptions and processing steps of common machine learning methods, and which methods are appropriate for a variety of use cases
Expertise with ML libraries, like Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, PySpark, MXNet, MLib, and Weka
Experience with ML platforms, like KNIME, Spark, SageMaker, H2O, and TensorFlow
Familiarity with Java, Python, and SQL including related ecosystems and frameworks, like Eclipse and Jupyter Notebook
Familiarity with visualization tools, preferably Qlik, Tableau, Plotly, Kibana, Matplotlib, and QGis
Strong problem-solving skills
Strong written and oral communications skills
Able to work independently and self-identify tasks
Ability to review and maintain existing code and applications
Ability to research and evaluate new concepts and processes to improve performance
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with time series forecasting
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Machine Learning Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
157,Transportation Data Analyst III,$55k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Opportunity
The Transportation Data Analyst III is responsible to develop and maintain data analytics to measure and drive outstanding service and financial performance of the transportation and customs compliance network, across the United States, Mexico and Canada. Ability to work in a fast pace environment; partnering with management and team members to develop dynamic analytics within transportation and customs compliance that will guide continuous business improvement decisions to optimize service and financial performance.
Responsibilities
Engage with leadership and team members within transportation, customs compliance, and cross functionally, to create data analytics around key performance and financial metrics to identify data driven business decisions.
Create, develop and manage analytics using Excel, SQL and Tableau.
Analyze, model, mine, and interpret data generate new ideas through a deep understanding of the data, supply chain, customers and business.
Manage large databases that include data from various sources.
Translate data into actionable insights.
Manage report data quality, stability, scalability and trustworthiness over time.
Conduct exploratory analysis for improvement opportunities in business areas not actively monitored by stakeholders.
Present business insights, data, and KPI’s to team members and leadership.
Oversee the process to pay carriers weekly, and perform month end reporting.
Develop and implement SOP’s to effectively manage data and reporting.
Candidate Profile


Bachelor’s degree in Supply Chain/ Logistics / Business Analytics with 3+yrs years’ experience in supply chain, logistics and/or transportation / customs compliance.
Excellent oral and written communications skills with the ability to communicate professionally and effectively at multiple levels both inside and outside of the organization.
Highly proficient with Tableau, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel, Word, Power Point and Outlook.
Strong track record of performing high impact business analysis and building useful data tools with tangible business results.
Strong storytelling – interpreting insights into a concise and compelling story others can embrace.
Possess a thorough understanding of transportation finance, operations, internal systems and network functions.
Complete tasks and projects in an accurate, timely, and efficient manner.
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, and collaborative environment with a diverse group of individuals.
Bilingual – English/Spanish preferred.
Perform other duties as assigned by Driscoll’s management.
Driscoll's",4.3,"Driscoll's
4.3","Watsonville, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1900,Company - Private,Food Production,Agriculture & Forestry,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
158,Machine Learning Research Scientist,$113k-$210k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu Silicon Valley AI Lab (SVAIL) is advancing state-of-the-art AI with an emphasis on deep learning, speech, NLP (Natural language processing) and high-performance computing.

Responsibilities:
Conduct cutting edge research in speech and language technologies.
Research and develop novel algorithms and techniques to advance the state of the art in spoken language understanding.
Strengthen the position of Baidu as a leading company in AI research.
Publish peer reviewed articles in top conferences and journals.
Qualifications:
PhD in Computer Science or related field.
Basic knowledge in Information Theory, Digital Signal Processing and Linguistics.
In-depth understanding of deep learning algorithms, especially the Transformer architecture.
Hands-on experience with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch and Paddle.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
159,"Data Scientist, Product Analytics",$92k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Product Data Scientist, you will lead the charge on building our product analytical infrastructure and driving insights that lead to step-function improvements in how we operate. We handle millions of tasks for businesses looking to scale their ML development, and we’re looking for a talented product data scientist to help us understand it all in the service of building better products. In this role, you will apply statistical models, design and interpret experiments, build mission-critical dashboards, and help structure and order our data in the pursuit of transparency over how we operate and how we can improve.
You will:
Own end-to-end product analytics workflow including formulating success metrics, socializing them across the organization, and creating dashboards/reports.
Ensure product areas are performing in line with our high expectations and be able to identify, diagnose, and recommend projects to improve our performance.
Influence product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations.
Identify operational efficiencies to the business that will enable Scale to continue growing sustainably.
Design, run, and analyze experiments.
Apply statistical models to identify root causes and predict the future performance of tasks, users, and products.
Conduct statistical and trend analysis to identify opportunities, highlight strengths, and provide recommended corrective actions.
Ideally you'd have:
3+ years of industry experience in product data science broadly
Strong proficiency in writing complex SQL queries
Mastery with data science tools such as R, and/or Python
Experience with statistical modeling and experimental design
A detail-oriented and analytical mindset, with emphasis on accuracy
About Us:
At Scale, our mission is to accelerate the development of Machine Learning and AI applications across multiple markets. Our first product is a suite of APIs that allow AI teams to generate high-quality ground truth data. Our customers include OpenAI, Zoox, Lyft, Pinterest, Airbnb, nuTonomy, and many more.

Scale AI is an equal opportunity employer. We aim for every person at Scale to feel like they matter, belong, and can be their authentic selves so they can do their best work. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Scale AI is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and mental disabilities. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation in the application or recruiting process due to a disability, please contact us at accommodations@scale.com. Please see the United States Department of Labor's EEO poster and EEO poster supplement for additional information.",3.4,"Scale AI
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
160,Data Scientist,$52k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist *
National healthcare organization offering a work atmosphere committed to statistical and analytical quality while exploring and leveraging leading edge methodologies for product customization and development. We are looking for an individual who enjoys designing and building report deliverables and using data to answer challenging patient care and business questions, all within a dynamic team environment. We are interested in individuals with the ability to learn quickly, solve problems creatively, and that bring strong communication skills and work ethic while delivering innovative, high quality reporting and analyses to our clients.

This role plays a critical part in driving improvements in patient care through use of technical report building skills, combined with data management and statistical skills. Advanced knowledge and experience with “real world” data and an interest in behavioral health/clinical outcomes are required. A successful member of our data science team will have a natural curiosity for research, an aptitude for analytics, a desire for data-driven decision making, and interest in improving mental health treatment and outcomes.
Summary of Major Functions*
Uses descriptive, inferential, prescriptive, and predictive statistical/data science techniques to analyze behavioral health outcomes and clinical data in search of patterns and trends. From those analyses, develops clinically relevant and actionable insights and communicates them to clients and stakeholders through custom, recurring, and web-based automated/business intelligence reporting that uses effective data visualizations. Designs and implements statistical and data science solutions for enhanced products or services, maintaining and promoting data integrity and best practices in statistical techniques and reporting, timely production of deliverables, and documenting deliverables.
Qualifications*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential core function satisfactorily *_with or without supervisory and/or team guidance_*. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, experience, and ability necessary to perform this job.
Essential Core Functions*
Designs and executes plans to build and maintain statistical and algorithmic models using available tools and programming languages. Monitors and provides feedback on model performance as necessary.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and algorithms into automated data systems.
Designs and builds metrics and reports which align with the clinical and business needs of client hospital leadership and executives.
Assess custom data science requests; responsible for all data science aspects of delivering the request including data gathering and cleaning, applying appropriate statistical techniques, and report development inclusive of effective data visualizations.
Determines data sources most appropriate for data science projects, drawing from multiple sources to generate relevant datasets.
Conducts data science projects according to best practices and with the highest level of quality and validation. Contributes to Data Science Team quality by reviewing team work for same.
Evaluates new and existing data sources, processes, and architecture to develop recommendations for preventing system and data integrity issues, and promote efficient availability of data for statistical analysis and reporting.
Monitor data integrity and develop solutions to resolve problems.
Contributes to sharing behavioral health data insights through means such as academic manuscripts, informational short articles, and infographics.
Other Duties as assigned.
Job Specifications: *
_Education, Certification/Licensure, and/or Experience_
1+ years of experience in data science.
Bachelor’s (preferred master’s) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related disciplines
Track record of using data to provide actionable recommendations, and effectively communicating recommendations through reporting and data visualizations.
_Knowledge, skills, and abilities required_
Knowledge and ease of handling datasets with millions of records and variables spread across relational databases.
Programming skills in SPSS, SQL, SAS, R, Python and/or similar analytical languages.
Knowledge in developing and applying algorithms and predictive statistical models.
Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills.
To submit your resume please click ""Apply Now"". *
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
SPSS, SAS, Stata, Python Pandas, or R statistical software: 2 years (Required)
t-tests, Pearson's correlation, chi-square, one way ANOVA: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
WILL YOU NOW OR IN THE FUTURE REQUIRE SPONSORSHIP FOR EMPLOYMENT VISA STATUS? (E.G. H-1B VISA STATUS)",3.2,"Horizon Health
3.2","Lewisville, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
161,Data Scientist,$65k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"HPOne, named CT Magazine's 2018 Great Places to Work, is looking for a Data Scientist to join our team.

The Data Scientist is responsible for collecting, cleaning, translating data to meet the company's needs. Every business collects data, whether it's sales figures, market research, logistics, or transportation costs. The Data Scientist will use that data and machine learning to help drive HPOne's business plans.

What you'll do:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Develop insights and deliver recommendations based on data analyses
Work with business leaders to articulate business requirements for data analyses
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies for specific models or analyses
Optimize joint development efforts through database use and project design
Create automated reports and dashboard products, in order to display results to internal teams
Develop end-customer segmentation schemes by analyzing customer behavior
Perform ad hoc analyses and deliver recommendations
Develop and implement predictive models like decision tree, regression using R or similar
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Required Skills/Abilities:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field
Five years' experience with SAS (or similar), ETL, data processing, database programming and data analytics
Experience in data mining and statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience with programming languages such as Java / Python (or ""R"")
Experience conducting regression analyses
Understanding of relational databases and data management as well as experience with data aggregation and normalization
Advanced excel expertise (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, report filters, etc.)
Ability to approach tasks strategically, while owning and mastering the details
Exceptional problem solving, as well as analytical and strategic thinking skills
Initiative to own projects from start to finish
Strong oral and written communication skills, with ability to work well with people across the company at all levels


Preferred Skills/Abilities:
Coursework in at least one of the following: mathematics, business, analytical marketing, information systems, programming/databases, statistics/statistical modeling, finance, economics, or physics
Experience conducting analyses and building predictive models using SAS (or similar)
Experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools preferred (like Domo or Tableau)
Physical Requirements:
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer, typically in an office or cubicle environment (constant noise, fluorescent overhead lighting)
HPOne is an Equal Opportunity Employer:

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) is a fundamental principle at HPOne, where employment is based upon personal capabilities and qualifications. HPOne does not discriminate because of actual or perceived sex, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity, gender, transgender, race, color, religion, national origin, creed, citizenship status, ancestry, age, marital status, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, medical conditions including genetic characteristics, mental or physical disability, military and veteran status, or any other protected characteristic as established by law. HPOne requires the necessary drug testing and background checks as part of our pre-employment practices.",3.5,"HPOne
3.5","Trumbull, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
162,"Data Scientist, Business Operations - Austin",$78k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve buy and live in their dream home on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

We seek a Data Scientist to join our monetization data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms.

Responsibilities:
Understand the business and data models to effectively query data
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data.
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Work with a sense urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
Drive a project forward given moderate oversight.
Requirements:
PhD/MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields and 2+ years of experience or a BS in related fields with 4+ years of experience.
2+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Experience with Docker and AWS and taking a prototype into production.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
about realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
163,Medical Lab Scientist - Fulltime,$14-$20 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Thank you for considering a career at Bon Secours!

$5,000 Bonus Eligible!

Performs routine and specialized moderate and high complexity laboratory tests on all types of blood and body fluid specimens under minimal supervision. Insures accurate and reliable test results by adhering to a strict quality control program. Performs instrument function checks and preventative maintenance procedures according to department’s policies and procedures. Maintains records and statistical data according to regulative requirements. Teaches new employees and students laboratory policies and procedures. Collects chain of custody urine drug screens as required. Performs breath alcohol testing as needed. Assists as needed in all laboratory areas as required to maintain appropriate patient care.

Education: BS degree from an accredited college or university preferred. Degree must be in Medical Technology or one of the biological or chemical sciences. Laboratoary training through an accredited laboratory school required.

Experience: One to two years experience preferred. Will accept a new grad.

Licenses/Certificates: Registration as a Medical Technologist, MT (ASCP), MT (AMT), HEW, CLS (NCA) required.

Bon Secours is an equal opportunity employer.

We’ll also reward your hard work with:

Comprehensive, affordable medical, dental and vision plans
Prescription drug coverage
Flexible spending accounts
Life insurance w/AD&D
An employer-matched 403(b) for those who qualify
Paid time off
Educational Assistance
And much more

Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Work Shift:

Days/Evenings

Department:

Laboratory - Clinical - Southside RMC - Petersburg

All applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, genetic information, or protected veteran status, and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. If you’d like to view a copy of the affirmative action plan or policy statement for Mercy Health – Youngstown, Ohio or Bon Secours – Franklin, Virginia; Petersburg, Virginia; and Emporia, Virginia, which are Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employers, please email recruitment@mercy.com. If you are an individual with a disability and would like to request a reasonable accommodation as part of the employment selection process, please contact The Talent Acquisition Team at recruitment@mercy.com.",3.4,"Bon Secours
3.4","Petersburg, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1983,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
164,"Scientist, Metabolic Engineering",-1,"Scientist, Metabolic Engineering*
Recombia Biosciences is an early-stage synthetic biology startup that is leveraging its proprietary genome engineering technologies to optimize yeast to produce a number of different sustainable products. Our technologies enable the introduction of rationally-designed genetic modifications with unprecedented precision, efficiency, and throughput.

We are seeking a full-time Metabolic Engineering Scientist to join our team. This is an exciting opportunity to be a key member early-stage biotech startup in the San Francisco Bay Area. Candidates must have experience working with yeast (_S. cerevisiae_) or other microorganisms. Candidate will be responsible to develop high-throughput assays to select for improved strains. Ideal candidates will have a background in chemical detection, metabolic engineering, industrial fermentation, genome editing and some programming skills.

Successful candidates will design and implement robust assays to characterize, at high-throughput, genetically-modified strains of industrial yeast for production of different chemicals by fermentation. As part of the Recombia team, you will be expected to interact frequently with leadership and other lab/bench scientists, but also work independently to implement essential assays for strains emerging from Recombia’s bioengineering pipeline. Salary and equity for this position will be commensurate with experience.

Well qualified candidates will have:
Ph.D. or masters with 5+ years experience.
Background in yeast biology and standard molecular biology techniques
Experience working in industry with metabolic engineering and synthetic biology.
Experience applying or developing high-throughput assays or screens.
Programming and data analysis skills (Python, R, etc)
Strong communication skills and experience working with a team
The ability to work independently
Some additional (non-essential) qualifications:
Industry experience (especially experience working at a startup in synthetic biology, strain engineering, or industrial fermentation)
Automation/robotics experience
Postdoctoral training
NGS/Genomics experience
Microfluidics experience
FACs/cytometry expertise
Assay Development
Salary: to be commensurate with experience

U.S. Work Authorization:
Only candidates with current work authorization will be considered for this role. Recombia cannot sponsor visas.

Location:
1000 Marina Blvd, Brisbane, CA 94005

Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
Some remote work may be acceptable

For more information or to apply please visit recombia.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Employees must wear masks to the office. We provide soap and hand sanitizer as well. We allow remote work when the employee is not required in the lab.",-1,"Recombia Biosciences, Inc.","Brisbane, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
165,Project Coordinator - Data Analyst,$35k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Project Coordinator - Data Analyst
Location


Hauppauge, NY

Company Order Number

2123

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Custom Computer Specialists, Inc. is one of the largest Technical Consultants on Long Island, celebrating over 40 years in business! We continue to successfully provide network integration, support services, products solutions, and applications services to our valued clients in the northeast. Our focus is simple...our goal is to make technology easy and to help our clients use it as effectively as possible.

Position Title: Project Coordinator

Division: MSP

Reports to: James Szwed, Manager

OVERVIEW

This individual will provide project support and coordination for our healthcare sector. We are looking for a person who wants to challenge him/herself that will take ownership and assist with daily project production. Requirements include having technical and analytical capabilities, knowledge of office suite, an understanding of technical concepts, ability to plan and manage multiple tasks, outstanding written and verbal communication skills.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Responsibilities of this position include:
Creating and closing request tickets for each device
Communicating with teams to ensure timely completion of tasks
Responsible for managing inbound support tickets
Updating assets in the database with corresponding tickets
Assisting other coordinators with scheduling work to technicians
Updating assignment of new assets with client’s ITAM system
Providing operational support of physical inventory in Custom’s warehouse for old and new assets
Covering for other team members when on leave
QUALIFICATIONS

The right candidate will have:
Minimum of 6 months’ experience working as an administrative assistant or project coordinator
Capable of working with Microsoft word, excel, and power point
Professional verbal communication, customer service, organizational skills and professional manner required
Candidates must be customer oriented, self-motivated, ambitious and dedicated team players
Custom Computer Specialists Offers:


Competitive salaries
Comprehensive benefits including:
Medical and dental plans
Company Paid Vision and Short and long term disability plans
Flexible spending programs including Healthcare, Dependent Care, Transit and Parking
401K with employer match
Tuition reimbursement
Onsite Fitness Center (or gym membership reimbursement for client or satellite based employees)
Company paid life Insurance
Paid holidays and vacation
Technical certification gift card rewards program
Come experience our unique culture and see how our “right people, right results” philosophy has led to our outstanding success! We are great place to start your IT career!

EEO Statement:


Custom Computer Specialists is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other protected characteristic.",2.5,"Custom Computer Specialists
2.5","Hauppauge, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
166,Research Scientist,-1,"Job Description:

Our Reston office is seeking talented candidates to develop mathematical models and algorithms, develop and demonstrate prototype software, and participate in operational analysis related to their technical work. Our Reston office employs mathematicians, physicists and computer scientists. We routinely apply stochastic processes, statistical inference, optimization and scheduling, models of random graphs and applied physics to develop the underlying theory and applications for our clients. The successful candidate will interact with customers, gather requirements and data, write and present briefings, and contribute to the development of Metron tools.

Projects typically involve developing advanced algorithms implemented in a computer prototype system for our research & development customers. We work in small teams, led by Senior Scientists, who work closely with new employees. Project teams work together from the initial system concept, through software and algorithm design, to implementation and demonstration.

We believe an employee's specific academic training is not as important as their innate ability and willingness to learn new areas of mathematics and work on difficult problems.

Required Qualifications:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or Operations Research
Some programming experience is preferred (C, C++, Java, Matlab, etc.)
Mathematical, simulation, or physical modeling experience highly desired
US Citizenship required, position will require background investigation to authorize access to classified information

Position Location: Reston, VA

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Metron takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",3.0,"Metron, Inc.
3.0","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
167,"Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"18-Sep-2020

Job ID
303121BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""1 purpose...to reimagine medicine!

The Oncology Data Science (OncDS) group in NIBR brings together projects spanning the entire clinical development pipeline, across a wide and unique range of novel therapeutics (e.g.: targeted and immunotherapies, radioligands, cell and gene therapies). OncDS:
•Oversees NGS data generation and performs analysis for thousands of oncology clinical samples, informing drug discovery and development
•Integrates internal and external data across distinct clinical trials to produce recognized translational impact
•Applies cutting-edge technologies and analytic approaches to discover and characterize the molecular mechanisms of therapeutic response in individual cancer patients

We are seeking a data scientist who will advance the translation of multi-dimensional molecular data (e.g. NGS) to biomarker discovery in clinical trials. The successful candidate will nurture close collaborations with oncology clinical trial teams, interpret candidate biomarkers and contribute to large-scale meta-analyses across trials and indications. Specific job responsibilities include:
•Collaboration on the design and execution of molecular biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Exploration of molecular data in the context of clinical variables to discover biomarkers of response/resistance to therapy
•Communication of key findings to trial teams and diverse group of scientists
•Application of biostatistics and machine learning methods across datasets from multiple clinical trials to gain actionable biological insights
•Application and development of computational methods for analyses of longitudinal biomarker and clinical data to characterize patients’ response to treatment
•Development of innovative analytic approaches to integrate and visualize complex clinical datasets
•Interaction with clinicians, project managers, data engineers, and other scientists to facilitate progression of projects across milestones

Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
168,Data Engineer,$85k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineers develop, construct, test, and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems. They clean, prepare, and optimize data for consumption through the design and construction of massive reservoirs for big data. They solve problems associated with database access and integration and unstructured data sets to provide clean, usable data for customers and IT counterparts. These engineers serve as integrators between data architects, data scientists, and other data consumers. They apply knowledge of scripting tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build the data pipelines that enable faster, better, data-informed decision-making within the Agency.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) serves as the world leader in providing timely, relevant, accurate and actionable geospatial intelligence (GEOINT). NGA's civilian, military and contract personnel evaluate imagery, maps, charts, multiple layers of foundation data - such as terrain, elevation and gravity - and the full spectrum of visible and invisible light in order to help users visualize what is happening at a particular place and time. NGA is in search of Data Engineers who understand data, data architectures, data pipeline infrastructure, cloud solutions, and security best practices. Data Engineers create data infrastructure and integrated data pipelines; transforming, enriching, and delivering data for consumers. They may work independently and/or as part of a team of data and non-data professionals on projects of varying complexities. They will design logical and physical data models for data warehousing; develop robust data models, data dictionaries, and data flow diagrams. Data Engineers must be able to operate at the tactical and strategic level while working in a dynamic and sometimes ambiguous environment to deliver impactful results. They will leverage their strong interpersonal skills to effectively communicate with mission owners at varying levels inside and outside the Agency. As a Data Engineer, you will be tasked against the Agency's biggest data challenges in support of missions such as National Intelligence, National Security, Military Operations, and Disaster Relief and Preparedness, for a diverse audience including the Department of Defense, the Intelligence Community, and senior government officials up to and including the United States Congress and the President of the United States. Other duties may include: \* Utilize a variety of languages and tools (e.g., scripting languages) to build data pipelines to pull together information from different source systems. \* Design, construct, install, test, and maintain highly scalable data management systems; \* Develop data set processes for data discovery, modeling, mining, and production. \* Integrate and prepare large, complex data sets that meet functional /non-functional business requirements. \* Design and implement high performance data pipelines for distributed systems and data analytics for customers. \* Build, deploy, operate, and maintain big data analytics infrastructure. \* Orchestrate large PB sized data storage and compute clusters across bare-metal and cloud. \* Deploy and manage infrastructures based on Docker, Kubernetes, or OpenStack, and public Clouds such as Azure, AWS or Google Cloud Platform. \* Create tool-chains for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing AI workflows. \* Experience with engineering data pipeline from collection and processing to visualization of SQL and NOSQL cyber security data sources for threat analysis and modelling. \* Work with Agency data and machine learning experts to improve functionality in our data and model life cycle management capabilities. \* Develop enterprise interoperable coding and data standards and create processes to ensure use of enterprise-wide data architecture capabilities. \* Solve problems and deliver solutions with database access and data integration, define data conflation, fusion, and de-confliction rules. \* Collaborate with data architects, data scientists, data stewards, and customers to enable more efficient and effective data-informed decision-making. \* Apply expert knowledge of scripting, tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build databases and data pipelines. \* Accomplish data cleansing, preparation, storage, and security. \* Web-based data creation and editing through iD editor or JDSM. \* Data conflation activities through Hootenanny. \* Upgrades to the UI and system capabilities to enhance user experience. \* Use business analytics and data validation to improve campaign focus and output. \* Establish and sustain a NOME User Forum. \* Create and brief presentations around the community and conferences. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated proficiency in applied programming and/or manipulation of data with a programing language such as Python, R or Java. 2. Demonstrated experience working with one or more database management systems, e.g. relational (Oracle, MySQL, Postgresql, etc.), noSQL (MongoDB, Accumulo, etc.), graph (Allegrograph, JanusGraphy, Neo4J, etc) to include experience with database retrieval methods and optimizations. 3. Demonstrated experience working with a range of data storage/access options, e.g. File(S3, FTP,etc.) and/or API(WFS, FeatureServer, Elasticsearch, SDK, etc.). 4. Demonstrated experience enabling access to data by way of databases or dashboards. 5. Demonstrated experience cleaning, filtering, transforming data, and/or enriching data. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Science, Information Systems Management, Mathematics, Operations Research, Physical Sciences, Statistics, Technology Management, or a degree that provided a minimum of 24 semester hours in one or more of the fields identified above and required the development or adaptation of applications, systems, or networks. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. -OR- C. Experience: A minimum of 4 years of experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. -AND- IT-related experience demonstrating each of the four competencies: Attention to Detail, Customer Service, Oral Communication, and Problem Solving.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Experience as a proven innovator and strategic problem solver. 2. Familiarity with Department of Defense (DoD) and Intelligence Community (IC) activities, functions, and organizational structures 3. Knowledge and understanding of NGA operations, data infrastructure and architecture 4. Familiarity with cloud services as applied in the DoD and IC. 5. Knowledge of simplification and optimization of data automation workflows; streamlining of extract-transform-load (ETL) operations. 6. Knowledge of emerging technical skills, tools, and best practices.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $64,948 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $64,948.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
169,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Join a small, dynamic data-warehouse (DWH) team responsible for providing detailed documentation for the development of the company’s Data Warehouse. This position is not just a technical position, but a marketing/consumer/business person with strong analytical skill set. Must be hands on in this analytical role, with strong SQL skillset.

· Experience with use of data warehouse tables and operational data, to effectively write and modify SQL queries of moderate to difficult complexity.

· Support data analytic requests by gathering and documenting report requirements, validating the data, and presenting results to end customer. For involved data-extracts and reports – to precisely specify requests at a detailed field-level.

· Partner with IT, Marketing, Finance, Ecommerce, Inventory Planning, Executive team, and Merchandising for AmeriMark and Dr. Leonard’s to the information needed in order to solve business problems.

· Work with data warehouse developers to organize data in ways that will allow for more effective and accurate analysis.

· Work with IT teams to help support and troubleshoot data integrity issues utilizing the data warehouse. Work as the liaison between IT and Marketing to support internal software program.

· Develop and monitor on demand and Adhoc reports using Excel, SSRS, and SQL Server. Establish a sense of ownership of new and existing stored procedures and automated SSRS and legacy reports that are being utilized by the business.

· Become familiar with the tables and complex logic that was created to support the Analytic Data Mart load process and business rules.

· Run weekly Financial analyses of unit contribution considering various costs, scenario analysis for Finance and Marketing departments reports to management.

· Assist Marketing with financials to create factors based on prior year performance for completing their future Catalog budget plans.
Job Requirements*
· BA/BS degree or equivalent in customer science (or comparable) Database programming certification or equivalent is also acceptable.

· Advanced T-SQL skills (3+ Years)

· Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) or similar BI-reporting and dash boarding tools (Power BI, Tableau) – both from a report-design perspective and from hands-on delivery/refinement to end user needs.

· Data manipulation, transformation, and automation using SQL to transform files from outside vendor for very complex holdout (A/B) test scenarios.

· Complex problem-solving skills and ability to work with large amounts of data.

· Multi-dimensional cube (SSAS) experience a plus to support Merchandising who is utilizing the tool.

· Keep up to date documentation for all business requests and processes and data warehouse tables in modern data dictionary.

· Experienced in communication with peers and senior management.

· Strong computer skills in Excel and Microsoft Office Suite. Excellent mathematical skills.

· Strong work ethic.

· Good organization skills required. Ability to multitask and establish sense of urgency for challenging problems.

· Experience with catalog/direct mail industry, multi-channel selling, catalog planning and execution processes, merchandise management, promotion, design and reading of basic A/B market tests and test with varied factors, as well as development of key customer KPI’s is desirable.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
T-SQL: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Cleveland, OH 44130 (Required)
Application Question:
Are you local to the Cleveland area? Relocation may not be available for this position.
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.2,"AmeriMark Direct
2.2","Cleveland, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Other Retail Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
170,"Senior Scientist, Molecular Biology",-1,"Directed Genomics is looking for an exceptional and experienced senior research scientist to join a rapidly growing, multidisciplinary team who is providing contract Research and Development services for the NGS biotech community. Directed Genomics operate in the space between a traditional CRO, and a consulting agency, providing custom wet-lab and bioinformatic solutions for startup and established biotech companies alike.

The successful candidate will be working in a collaborative, dynamic team role - at times leading a project team, and at other times as a member of a project team, comprised of other senior scientists, associate scientists, and bioinformaticians. Projects may have the candidate working as an independent researcher, or as a team member of another project group. The candidate will oversee and be a point of contact with customers and with their project teams. In addition, the candidate will participate in; proposal generation for new projects, project reporting, and delivery of final methods/reports/training as needed.

Key Responsibilities
Execute scientific collaborations/contracts with clients
Work closely with senior scientists, computational biologists, and associate scientists
Develop and optimize novel NGS library preparation methods
Conduct product development and application development experiments
Supervise and coordinate experiments and data generation
Work closely with team members to design, implement, and troubleshoot experiments critical to the group’s collective success
Troubleshoot to resolve problems and participate in new technology evaluation, development, and implementation
Document, compile, and analyze experimental data
Attend and present at team meetings to share results, plan projects and experiments, and ensure that projects support team goals
Contribute to grant and proposal writing
Contribute to the overall culture and operations of the DGx laboratory
May perform other duties as assigned, including related lab management duties
Qualifications
PhD and 4+ years of postdoctoral experience in a relevant discipline; molecular or cell biology, biochemistry or related disciplines
2+ years of laboratory experience with Next Generation Sequencing
Hands-on experience with molecular biology, specifically Next Generation Sequencing (NGS)
Hands-on experience assay design and analysis
Hands-on experience with primer design
Hands-on experience with bioinformatics tools, and unix/linux OS
Experience with applications and/or product development
Ability to solve complex problems independently and as part of a team
Candidate should be a self-motivated fast learner and an innovative and analytical thinker
Candidate should possess outstanding interpersonal and communication skills
Demonstrated track record of, and continued interest in, working as a team member in a fast-paced contract environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills, lab notebook practices and attention to detail
Must be willing and able to develop and shift plans in service of a rapidly changing environment and troubleshoot to solve problems
To apply, please submit a cover letter and CV.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.directedgenomics.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/directed-genomics
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Directed Genomics,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
171,Machine Learning Engineer,$108k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"CircleUp harnesses the power of machine learning and predictive analytics to discover some of the fastest-growing companies in the consumer & retail sector. We are building a predictive data system called ""Helio"" to bring the data-driven revolution that has occurred in the public markets to the private markets, starting with consumer & retail.

We are working on challenging problems in information retrieval, entity resolution, and developing an in-depth knowledge graph of all private companies. We are mining vast amounts of data to successfully rewrite the rules on how private companies are evaluated.

With a background in both software development and machine learning, you will collaborate with software engineers, data scientists, PMs, and domain experts in consumer investing to develop & ship predictive data products in support of CircleUp's mission - helping entrepreneurs thrive by connecting them with the capital & resources they need.

You are a passionate software engineer who is comfortable working across the full stack & lifecycle of predictive data products - prototyping, feature engineering, validation, and productionalization.

CircleUp was recently honored as one of Fast Company's Top 10 Most Innovative Companies in Data Science and has been named a CB Insights FinTech 250, a Top 5 Most Disruptive Company in Finance by CNBC, and to the Forbes FinTech 50. Founded in 2012, CircleUp is headquartered in San Francisco and backed by Union Square Ventures, GV, Canaan Partners, QED Advisors, and others.

Responsibilities:
Collect and refine structured and unstructured data on private companies
Build out our entity resolution platform that can identify references to companies, brands and products in highly unstructured digital documents and link them back to real world entities
Build scalable production systems for data collection, data transformation, feature extraction, model training, and scoring, using distributed software tools
Build end to end algorithms for objectively measuring the quality of private consumer companies
Contribute to all phases of algorithm development including ideation, prototyping, design and production
We're looking for teammates who have:
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Information retrieval, Natural Language processing, Math, Statistics or related technical field
2+ years of experience in machine learning, NLP and/or information retrieval
Broad knowledge of machine learning APIs, tools, and open source libraries
Excellent coding skills and strong fundamentals in algorithms, data structures, predictive modeling and big data concepts
Experience putting models into production systems is a huge plus
An interest in disrupting and democratizing the entire industry within the private markets.
If you got to this point, we hope you’re feeling excited about the job description you just read! Even if you feel that you don't meet all of the requirements and qualifications, we still encourage you to apply. We’re eager to speak with those who share our passion to help entrepreneurs thrive - not just those who match every bullet point in our job descriptions.

CircleUp is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status (including registered domestic partnership status), sex and gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), gender identity and gender expression (including transgender individuals who are transitioning, have transitioned, or are perceived to be transitioning to the gender with which they identify), age, sexual orientation, Civil Air Patrol status, military and veteran status and any other consideration protected by federal, state or local law. We encourage those who really want to make an impact to apply for our open positions.",4.5,"CircleUp
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Venture Capital & Private Equity,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
172,Senior Physiological Data Scientist,-1,"ABOUT US:

Embr Labs believes in harnessing the body’s natural response to temperature to enhance human wellbeing. We are a wellness tech company that has developed a unique, wearable thermal technology with therapeutic applications in both the consumer and regulated device sectors.

To date, Embr has sold over 65,000 devices to customers in 150 countries around the world. A mobile app and backend augment our hardware devices, forming a unique technology platform that combines thermal stimulation, digital interventions, and data to manage symptoms and treat disease. Our technology was invented by the company’s founders while at MIT; we are backed by DigiTx Partners, Safar Partners, Bose Ventures and Intel Capital, and we have partnered with companies like Johnson & Johnson.

‘EMBR’ stands for Environment, Mind, Body Resonance: we believe that technology can help us lead more balanced lives. Our workplace cultivates both fulfillment and fun. We are looking for an exceptional candidate to help us create a future where digital thermal interventions help people live better lives.

DESCRIPTION:

We seek a smart, energetic, and impact-oriented Senior Physiological Data Scientist. This is a strategic hire that will lead Embr Labs’ expansion into continuous physiological monitoring and real-time symptom detection.

Embr is now designing its next generation of innovative products where sensors and algorithms will be critical and offer a core competitive advantage. The Senior Physiological Data Scientist will lead a wide range of activities, from database design and machine learning to project management and technical leadership.

Collaborating with Embr’s senior technical leaders, and leading research collaborations, they will develop new technical capabilities for Embr Labs by taking early concepts all the way to productizable prototypes. For the first two years, the Senior Physiological Data Scientist will also hold a Visiting Scientist position with the Department of Kinesiology and Institute for Applied Life Sciences at the University of Massachusetts Amherst (UMass IALS).

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide technical leadership for sensor data-related research and development at Embr Labs
Oversee the development of new technical capabilities that utilize physiological monitoring
Develop R&D data infrastructure to transfer and store physiological data streams, including data pipelines and databases
Train, refine, and evaluate algorithms that identify symptoms and other physiological markers from sensor data
Collaborate with researchers and engineers to translate algorithms into low-latency embedded systems on actual prototype devices, and in the translation of successful prototype devices into actual commercial products
Ensure that physiological data projects are executed on schedule and on budget, and that collaborations with academic & industry partners are smooth and efficient.
IDEAL CANDIDATES WILL HAVE:
Deep technical expertise in biomedical informatics, data science, or biomedical engineering (Ph.D. or equivalent industry experience).
Experience working with physiological data from wearables or body sensors.
Proficiency in machine learning and deep learning for human physiology data.
Successful track record of taking algorithms from conception to implementation on products.
A self-starter personality and the ability to work with broad direction and little oversight.
Proficient in Python, Matlab, or R; Git; and SQL.
Excellent communication and teamwork skills.
Experience with relational and/or NoSQL database technologies, streaming data processing and data lakes is a plus.
THINGS YOU WILL GET:
A full-time position at Embr Labs, combined with a two-year Visiting Scientist position at UMass Amherst Department of Kinesiology & Institute for Applied Life Sciences.
The opportunity to make a transformative impact at a rapidly growing wellness tech startup company.
Constant exposure to interesting science and novel technology.
Ability to build relationships with other technology leaders in the emerging Digital Therapeutics ecosystem
A strong leadership team that encourages close collaboration; talented, open-minded team of contributing engineers.
A dynamic, exciting workplace with a flexible work environment
A caring team that values mutual respect and includes three MIT co-founders, one of the top female CEOs in the Boston tech scene, bright and thoughtful employees, and a small dog.
Competitive compensation, benefits, and equity in a fast-growing startup.
LOCATION:

This position is based at UMass in Amherst, Massachusetts for the first two years. Following the completion of the project with UMass IALS, the Senior Physiological Data Scientist will be given the opportunity to work from the Embr Labs office in Boston or to keep working remotely from Amherst.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
biomedical informatics or biomedical engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Location:
Amherst, MA 01003 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.embrlabs.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.9,"Embr Labs, Inc
4.9","Amherst, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
173,Molecular Biology Research Scientist PhD,-1,"*Company Name: *Avance Biosciences Inc.

*Job Title: *Research Scientist
*Department: *Operations
*Reports To: *Department Manager
*Classification: *Full-time, Exempt
*Date: *September 2020

Avance Biosciences Inc., a fast-growing biotechnology CRO, is recruiting several Research Scientists (PhD) in its GLP and/or GMP biological testing departments. This position plans, directs, and manages research and testing projects on behalf of our biopharma and biotech clients, as well as development projects to improve laboratory operations.

*ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *

The omission of specific statement of duties does not exclude them from the position if the work is similar, related or a logical assignment to this class. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
* Plan and execute biological assay development, validation, and sample testing activities.
* Prepare study protocols and/or test plans according to client's requirements.
* Direct laboratory associates to execute experimental plans.
* Lead in incident and OOS investigation and root cause analysis per company quality policies.
* Perform data analysis and prepare project reports.
* Communicate to clients on project progress regularly.
* Establish standard operational procedures and train laboratory associates as needed.
* Ensure all project related work are done in compliance with GLP and CGMP regulations.
* May supervise a small group of lab scientists.

*QUALIFICATIONS: *

A successful candidate for this position must have the following experience, knowledge, and skills:
* Must have a PhD degree in biological sciences
* In-depth knowledge of and hands-on experience in ddPCR, NGS, and QPCR
* Post doctorate independent research experience is preferred
* Detailed-oriented and multi-tasking skills
* Strong problem-solving skills

*SPECIAL JOB CHARACTERISTICS: *Demonstrated excellent interpersonal and communication skills. Able to work independently and as part of a team on complex tasks with minimal supervision. Able to create accurate work in a fast-paced environment with constant change and interruptions. Able to prioritize effectively and manage multiple tasks simultaneously. Commitment to the mission and values of Avance Biosciences Inc.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Experience:
* Molecular Biology Lab: 4 years (Required)

Education:
* Doctorate (Required)

Work authorization:
* United States (Required)

Work Location:
* One location

Company's website:
* www.avancebio.com

Work Remotely:
* No",3.4,"Avance Biosciences Inc
3.4","Houston, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
174,Data Science Architect,-1,"Data Science Architect

INNOVATE PARTNERS

Empowers visionaries to fundamentally reshape meaningful markets.

Innovate Partners was founded in 1995 and provides capital, knowledge and resources to emerging companies that are creating change. As an operationally oriented Private Investment Company, Innovate Partners primarily focuses on growth stage venture capital and early stage private equity in companies that have substantial market traction with a proven and identified opportunity to scale.

Innovate Partners is an operationally oriented venture capital fund. Its focus is on emerging companies with disruptive technologies and prospects for both current and long-term income, strong revenues and attractive exit options.

The Fund makes equity and equity-related investments in companies that are active in technology, business services and consumer products sectors, with a strategy currently focuses on consumer technology, health and wellness.

Innovate Partners Corporate office is based in Newport Beach, California. One of their emerging portfolio Companies PEAR Sports LLC, is seeking a *Data Science Architect* to be a part of their core development team with offices in Solana Beach, San Diego, California and Auckland, New Zealand.

PEAR has smart training systems that coach you in real time, creating the ultimate workout experience, inspiring you to reach your goals. PEAR Sports LLC is an emerging organization designed by a passionate team of entrepreneurs with athletic, technology and design backgrounds.

At PEAR Sports, we are redefining health and fitness with our smart digital coaching platform, built on proven sports science and driven by AI and data analytics. As the *Data Science Architect*, you will play an integral role in defining and executing PEAR’s AI and Machine Learning platform roadmap including formulating a coherent strategy for PEAR’s IP and technology assets, architecting robust cloud-based data pipelines, collaborating with data scientists to uncover insights in the health and fitness domain, and operationalizing machine learning models and algorithms.

The R&D and Innovation team is in charge of the PEAR AI and Data Science Platform which consists of an advanced machine learning core built on sport and fitness science. This core component is part of an enterprise platform suite that empower companies to deliver a broad range of intelligent fitness management solutions. We work as a nimble cohesive team to provide the best experience for our users. PEAR is dedicated to learning, discovery and personal empowerment. PEAR’s culture rewards those who take initiative and add value in making PEAR Sports a successful, Profitable and highly respected Company. PEAR focuses on teamwork, team building and a supportive attitude among its team.

PEAR is seeking a *Data Science Architect *to join its global Innovation, Product and Engineering Team with offices in Solana Beach, San Diego, CA and Auckland New Zealand.

As a key member of this team, you will work alongside our global team to build and deliver features on the PEAR Platform and bring them to market. The wellbeing and positive contribution of every team member is truly the foundation of PEAR’s successful culture.
Responsibilities: *
Work with key stakeholders to define a coherent strategy for PEAR’s IP and data assets, including building a backlog of data-driven initiatives
Architect and develop robust data pipelines to ingest data from our mobile apps and third party sensor partners
Provide domain expertise to help define data schemas and models for PEAR’s custom library of workouts and exercises
Write scripts to clean, transform, and consolidate data to allow easy access by Data Scientists and integration into production features
Assist Data Scientists in building data-driven machine learning models and algorithms
Operationalize machine learning algorithms as cloud-based platform services
Integrate AI and data services into the existing CI/CD workflow and provide guidance on streamlining improvements
Develop operational tools to monitor data pipeline and cluster performance at a production level
Collaborate with cross-functional members to provide BI dashboards and data access to better understand performance across key metrics
Improve overall business performance through successful data-driven outcomes
Qualifications*
MS or BS in computer science or equivalent software engineering discipline
5-10 years of experience in data engineering and software development
Expert knowledge of software development lifecycle
Understanding of cloud-services such as AWS and GCP
Experience with distributed platforms such as Spark and Kafka
Working knowledge of machine learning algorithms and toolkits
Strong programming skills in Python, and Javascript, C++, and/or Java
Skilled at SQL and data warehousing
Proficient with visualization tools and/or packages such as D3 and Sisense
Experience with JIRA, git, and cloud CI/CD tools such as CircleCI, Netlify
Excellent written and verbal skills to assist with demos, whitepapers, and troubleshooting
Pluses*
Have a passion for improving people’s health and fitness journeys through AI, data, and personalized technology
Worked in a production environment streaming data at scale
Track record of leading teams of data scientists and data engineers to successful outcomes
Experience with HIPAA, GDPR and other data governance requirements and regulations
Ability to work with functional teams across a wide geographical scope
Benefits: *
Vacation, Personal time, Health, Vision & Dental, Life AD&D. Those qualified and whom possesses a positive, team player attitude, adds to the culture of our environment, please reference the above jot title and send your resume to:

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $115,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
www.pearsports.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Pear Sports LLC,"Solana Beach, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
175,Sr. Data Engineer,$69k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Datascan is a provider of wholesale and audit intelligence in the automotive industry. Datascan’s solutions are the most comprehensive in the industry, providing banks, independent finance companies, and captive financial institutions with clarity critical to their success – helping them manage risk while increasing productivity and profits. All of our solutions are web-based and delivered from our state-of-the-art DataScan-managed data centers.

Job Description


The Data Engineer will be working on creating solutions to implement and operationalize a data lake, with full support for ingestion of data from various sources. Additionally, the Data Engineer will implement security and governance controls within the data, manage a cataloging solution, and automate solutions for transforming data sets using state of the art big-data technologies (Hive, Spark, etc.).

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain one or more data lakes to support scalable ingesting, manipulation, and reporting of data.
Manipulate data to produce and maintain new data elements using repeatable, automated processes.
Combine and transform data into usable sets by other individuals in the organization, for example, data scientists and business users.
Build new software from the ground up utilizing industry standard best practices
Job Requirements
Experience working within AWS ecosystem (AWS S3, Glue, EMR, Redshift, Athena, QuickSight) or comparable cloud environments (Azure/GCP)
Experience extracting, ingesting, and transforming large data sets
Experience with working with multiple kinds of databases (relational, document storage, key-value, timeseries) and their associated query languages -- specifically understanding when to use one vs. another.
Experience with big data platforms such as Hadoop and Spark
Experience utilizing enterprise data warehousing systems such as Redshift.
Strong coding skills (Python, Java, C# are all reasonable)
Lots of experience working with common data formats and manipulating data within them -- JSON, CSV, Parquet
Experience working with Infrastructure as Code tools such as Cloudformation, CDK, or Terraform.
Experience handling sensitive data and governing access to it.
#LI-KN1

#WeDoITBetter",3.2,"DataScan
3.2","Alpharetta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
176,AI/ML Data Engineer,-1,"As a Data Engineer at MORSE, you will work with our multidisciplinary team of scientists, engineers, and software developers on a variety of programs related to machine learning and artificial intelligence. You will be expected to rapidly define, develop, implement, and exercise ETL pipelines for complex systems that use data to help produce actionable insights in operational systems.

Skills and Requirements

A successful candidate will be working with data scientists, software engineers, and data providers to maintain data and transforms on that data. The candidate will be creating and maintaining novel pipelines for on premises hardware, externally hosted hardware, cloud-computing systems. The pipelines include data primarily from computer vision systems, traditional sensing systems, robotics data, and human generated label data. All data and pipelines are used for machine learning and artificial intelligence.

US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED, or the ability to obtain a U.S. Security Clearance

BS, MS, or PhD in computer science, database management, data engineering, or equivalent

At least 5 years of experience as a data engineer

Proficiency in Python and PySpark

Experience with Docker

Good communication skills

Self-starter and driven

Desired Skills:

Experience with cloud computing (AWS, Azure, GCP) is a plus

Familiarity with Kedro is a plus

Familiarity with the latest data engineering trends

Experience with Docker-compose

Experience with Microservices

Proficiency in one or more programming languages

Demonstrated experience with large data sets in one or more of the following areas: parsing, cleaning, storage strategies, provenance tracking, database formats, and parallelized data transformations",5.0,"MORSE Corp
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
177,Clinical Laboratory Scientist AM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Supplemental Pay:
Commission Pay
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
178,Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"Overview


As a key member of the Analytics team, the Marketing DataAnalyst will be responsible for data-driven insights that enable eFinancial and Fidelity Life Association to optimize business processes and grow rapidly. The Marketing Data Analyst will gather, organize and aggregate large sets of data in order to produce meaningful business insight in areas such as lead management, call center effectiveness, marketing spend effectiveness, and revenue generation. If you would love being an owner-operator of a fast-growing complex online business with modern technology stacks, building analytical and infrastructure solutions, and driving profitability via analytics, the Senior Marketing Analyst role is for you!

Responsibilities
Own the end-to-end lead performance management analytics to maximize risk-adjusted lifetime value generated by converting marketing spend into revenue
Develop lead / traffic forecasts by marketing channel, interpret sales conversion data, analyze and monitor results and recommend adjustments to keep marketing spend efficiency on track
Develop point solutions such as dynamic bidding models to guide lead and media buy
Work effectively with cross-functional partners in Business Intelligence, Marketing, and Finance to keep data initiatives on track, and provide periodic sales lead performance reporting to management team
Extract/extrapolate trends from competitor, user behavior, and market positioning analyses and recommend tangible opportunities for Business Development teams to maximize value of marketing relationships
Qualifications
Proven analytical and quantitative skills and an ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause/ analyses
Strong verbal and written communications skills that enable you to explain complex insights with clarity and precision to executive management
Experience developing insights across various areas of customer related data: financial, product and marketing
Proficiency in MS SQL/MySQL, Tableau/PowerBI and mastery of Microsoft Suite (Excel)
Knowledge of cloud-based data structures including Redshift, and programming languages such as Python a huge plus
An analytical mindset with relevant education such as a Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Finance or any related field
2-5 years of experience as a Data/Business/Financial Analyst with large, complex data sources
EEOC/Other


eFinancial is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workplace. As an eFinancial employee, you will be eligible for Medical and Dental Insurance, Health Savings Accounts, Flexible Spending Accounts (Health, Dependent Care & Transit), Vision Care, 401(K), Short-term and Long-term Disability, Life and AD&D coverages.",3.6,"Efinancial
3.6",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
179,Automation Development Scientist,$18k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Automation Development Scientist will be responsible for designing and executing laboratory experiments to support assay development on an automation platform and phase appropriate qualification of high throughput methods. The focus will be on the development and automation of methods to support process development, high-throughput screening and non-GMP release and stability. He/she must have experience with liquid handling technologies (Tecan Fluent, Hamilton Vantage), Excel spreadsheets and Macros to generate Worklists, familiarity with ELISAs, qPCR, enzyme activity and binding assays. Experience with programming languages, magnetic particle extraction, mobile robots are a plus. Willingness and enthusiasm to work in an exciting and challenging field is a must. The ability to work independently and/or within a team environment is essential. An innovative mindset is necessary to both solve problems and bring greater efficiency to the department. The candidate must be able to effectively communicate cross-functionally with internal and external partners (CRO/CMO’s).

Job duties to include but not limited to:

Automation of methods and evaluation of automatable platform methods and technologies to support process development, high-throughput screening and non-GMP release and stability
Design and participate in phase appropriate qualification and transfer of automated methods
Author and review technical documents such as protocols, SOPs, and reports. Training of personnel for purposes of broadening the Analytical Development Toolkit.
Manage outsourced activities pertaining to the evaluation of automation platforms
Present data/results in group and department meetings
Seek out and evaluate novel technologies

Education and Experience

Ph.D. in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline with 0 – 3 year of relevant postdoctoral or industry experience.
MS in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline with a minimum of 3 years relevant industry experience.
BS in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline with a minimum of 8 years relevant industry experience.
Computer science background highly desirable
Working knowledge of common analytical platforms not limited to: ELISA, qPCR, enzyme activity and binding assays

Knowledge, Skills, and Ability:

Under general direction develop complex strategic approaches and methodologies within expertise with an understanding of how to weigh and assess technical risks. Leverage understanding of project timelines and big picture (e.g., impact on resources across functions in Pharm Sci).
Develops technical skill(s) to act as a resource/expert for the department.
Responsible for authoring and/or reviewing technology transfer documentation
Identifies and plans broader technical objectives both project and scientific related and executes plans independently or with input from management. Initiates the development of operational processes to facilitate these objectives for future projects, either independently or in consultation with manager.
Proactively builds relationships with key partners/stake holders to gain access to technologies/understanding and deliver on pipeline goals.
Responsible for coordinating cross-functional team and providing resolutions to scientific/technical challenges. Expected to fully represent their functional area to a PS sub-team or other cross functional team.
Develops the ability to define more complex/novel approaches and methodologies to solve complex technical challenges.
Keeps abreast of literature and benchmark best practices outside the company
Expertise in multiple technologies to support automated assay development
May represent Takeda in relationships with universities and industrial consortia

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Lexington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
180,Data Science Technician,$60k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the opportunity:

Are you interested in helping to develop world-class machine learning models to assist with natural resource surveys and conservation efforts? SWCA Environmental Consultants is expanding their team and looking for a dynamic individual who wishes to make a difference.

Our Technology Solutions group offers a challenging work environment where you will be a part of a team supporting SWCA’s efforts to develop new and innovative survey methodologies.

Your role will be to assist the data science team in developing training datasets for model development. You should be able to work on an as-needed basis.

What you will accomplish:

Inspect, sort, and classify digital information assets (photos, sound files, etc) as required by the data science team's development priorities and schedule. This work will be performed from home under the supervision of the data science team members.

Experience and qualifications for success:
Strong desire to pursue a career in computer science or data science.
Prior experience with image viewers and audio players.
Prior experience with Zoom as a collaboration tool.
Demonstrated ability of data transfer, data analysis, data mining and data inventory using basic spreadsheet applications (ArcGIS, Access, Excel)

Preferred Qualifications:

Microsoft Teams experience.
Familiarity with Python, including simple script development.

Additional Information:

High speed home Internet connection (500 mbps or greater download, 10 mbps or higher upload).
This position will located as a distributed employee.
Ability to work up to 10 hours per week.

SWCA Environmental Consultants is a growing employee-owned firm, providing a full spectrum of environmental services. With offices across the United States, SWCA is one of the largest environmental compliance firms and ranks among Engineering News-Record’s Top 200 Environmental Firms.

If you would like to contact SWCA regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the online application process due to a disability, please email accommodations@swca.com or call 800-828-8517. This contact information is for disability accommodation requests only. All other inquiries will not receive a response.

EOE - women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and veterans are encouraged to apply.

#ind-swca",3.5,"SWCA Environmental Consultants
3.5","Albuquerque, NM",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
181,Data Analyst,$60k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What Youll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
allspark

BITS3

Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
182,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
183,AI Ops Data Scientist,$116k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company

AstraZeneca is a global, innovation-driven biopharmaceutical business that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world's most serious diseases. But we're more than one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. At AstraZeneca, we're proud to have a unique workplace culture that inspires innovation and collaboration. Here, employees are empowered to express diverse perspectives and are made to feel valued, energized and rewarded for their ideas and creativity.

Role

We are looking for a data scientist to join our new AI Ops platform team in Science IT. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working in a range of different cloud environments where they devised and deployed large-scale production infrastructure and platforms for data science. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting data & prediction problems in drug discovery.

The successful candidate will be part of a new, close-knit team of deeply technical experts and together have the chance to create tools that will advance the standard of healthcare, improving the lives of millions of patients across the globe. Our data science environments will support major AI initiatives such as clinical trial data analysis, knowledge graphs, imaging & omics for our therapy areas. You will also have responsibility to help provide the frameworks for data scientists to develop scalable machine learning and predictive models with our growing data science community, in a safe and robust manner.

As a strong software leader and an expert in building complex systems, you will be responsible for inventing how we use technology, machine learning, and data to enable the productivity of AstraZeneca. You will help envision, build, deploy and develop our next generation of data engines and tools at scale. You will be bridging the gap between science and engineering and functioning with deep expertise in both worlds.

Key Accountabilities
Liaise with R&D data scientists to understand their challenges and work with them to help productionise models and algorithms.
Be part of the development roadmap to build and operationalise our data science environment, platforms and tooling.
Support any external opportunities, through close partnership and engagement such as Benevolent.AI collaboration.
Deployment of systems, applications and tooling for data science on cloud environments.
Understanding of the necessary guardrails required for different use cases and data sensitivities.
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU).
Provide the necessary infrastructure and platform to support the deployment and monitoring of ML solutions in production Optimizing solutions for performance and scalability.
Liaise with the Data Engineering team to ensure that the platform and the solutions deployment therein benefit from an optimised and scalable data flow between source systems and analytical models
Implementing custom machine learning code and developing benchmarking capabilities to monitor drift of any analyses over time.
Understanding of the latest AI webservices and data science tools, from DataBricks to citizen data science tools like Dataiku, C3.AI and Domino. Experience working on regulatory data would be helpful but not essential.
Liaise with other teams to enhance our technological stack, to enable the adoption of the latest advances in Data Processing and AI
Being an active member of the Data Science team, you will benefit from, and contribute to, our expanding bank of Data Science algorithms and work efficiently with our data science infrastructure.
Testing and assessing the quality of new tools.
Team recruitment, training provision and coaching
Candidate Knowledge, Skills and Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related quantitative field or MSc/Ph.D degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
More than 2 years of experience and demonstrable deep technical skills in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, natural language processing or computer vision.
Experience managing an enterprise platform and service, handling new customer demand and feature requests.
Strong software coding skills, with proficiency in Python and Scala preferred.
Significant experience with AWS cloud environments, working knowledge of Google and Azure platforms. Knowledge of Kubernetes, S3, EC2, Sagemaker, Athena, RDS and Glue is essential. Certification in appropriate areas will be viewed favourably.
Experience with best practice of data transport and storage within cloud system.
Experience building large scale data processing pipelines. e. g. Hadoop/Spark and SQL.
Experience provisioning computational resources in a variety of environments.
Experience with containers and microservice architectures e.g. Kubernetes, Docker and serverless approaches.
Experience with automation strategies e.g. CI/CD, gitops.
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g. R, Python, SAS and Data Science notebooks (e.g. Jupyter).
Creative, collaborative, & product focused.
Ability to just get things done.",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
184,Associate Scientist NGS,-1,"Job title*
Research Associate/Senior Research Associate NGS
Job description*
At Loop Genomics we strive to build genomics tools that bring clarity to genetic data. Our technology platform integrates innovation in molecular biology with the design constrain of
Illumina’s cost-effective short-read sequencers to bring researchers long read-lengths and ultra- low error rates.

We are looking for an outstanding team player to join and lead our NGS sample prep team. The individual will provide next generation sequencing service to our customers that incorporates Loop Genomics's long read technology with Illumina's short read sequencing platforms. This includes managing the timeline and progress of the various sequencing projects, as well as performing custom NGS library preparation for the various projects. The individual will also assist in testing and improving the robustness of Loop Genomics’s library preparation kits. This role requires excellent project management skills, outstanding laboratory liquid handling skills and consistent performance of various wet lab operations.

The ideal candidate is a dedicated and detail-oriented individual who thrives in a fast-paced work environment, has a solid background in molecular biology techniques, and shares our passion in bringing technology to change the current paradigm of DNA sequencing.
Key responsibilities*
• Manage the project details and timelines of the service lab sequencing projects and ensure a timely delivery of sequencing data

• Perform sample quality control, modified NGS library preparation, and sequencing according to established protocols

• Keep a detailed record and tracking the customer samples throughout the sample preparation and sequencing process

• Work closely with team members to analyze sequencing data and deliver results to our customers in a timely manner

• Support method troubleshooting efforts and resolve issues, ranging in complexity and scope

• Perform reagent testing and reagent QA/QC according to established protocols

• Prepare and set up kit shipment to domestic and international destinations
Qualifications*
• B.S./M.S. in one of the following disciplines -- Biotechnology, Molecular Biology,
Bioengineering, Biological Sciences, or equivalent subjects

• 3-5 years of relevant molecular biology laboratory experience such single-channel pipetting, multi-channel pipetting, electrophoresis, DNA bead-based or column-based cleanup, and PCR

• Previous project management, especially at a sequencing core facility, is preferred

• Relevant knowledge of DNA sequencing or other nucleic acid-based technologies

• Good documentation skills and the ability to prioritize and multi-task are a must

• Exhibit strong attention to detail in every aspect of work, including execution, documentation, and communication

• Self-driven, strong ability to work independently as well as collaboratively

• Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Limited personnel in the lab, face masks on at all times, social distancing setup in the lab and office setting.

Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Location:
San Jose, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.loopgenomics.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Loop Genomics,"San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
185,Data Analyst,$34k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"We currently have a new opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our Accounting/Finance/Business Intelligence team. This position will work with data generated by a variety of credit union systems to create, validate, and generate business reports that management will use in decision making. This position will coordinate with various business areas to envision and develop report specifications, track the request pipeline and delivery metrics, suggest system enhancements, and create documentation.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:

Build and maintain queries, dashboards, and reports.
Respond to day to day custom requests for data and reports.
Perform ad hoc data requests and analysis as needed.
Extract data from various systems.
Analyze results of data reports for anomalies, accuracy, and applicability to business unit requests.
Maintain and develop data dictionaries and documentation of deliverables. Actively participate in data quality related tasks.
Identify patterns and trends in data sets.
Provide recommendations and interpretations of data and information.
Assist with application used for workflow and cross sales program.

Desired Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, or data science preferred. MBA a plus.
Four years of experience working in database environments designing reports and working with extracts.
Excellent analytical skills with experience managing large amounts of data from various sources.
Experience combining, analyzing and presenting data in a clear manner.
Working knowledge of SQL preferred. Experience with Oracle databases a plus.
Proficient use of Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and SQL databases.
Exposure to core banking systems a plus.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels of end users and technical resources.
Self-motivated with the ability to react to change, feedback and critique quickly and positively.
Strong attention to detail.
Open and collaborative style, comfortable working in an environment where ideas are shared and challenged.
Ability to conceptualize and implement items in a changing environment.

Fox Communities Credit Union is a $2 billion in assets community-based credit union servicing over 104,000 members at 23 locations. We take pride in being a progressive, member-owned, full service financial institution dedicated to serving the community.

Fox Communities Credit Union believes our employees are our most important asset. We offer a great team environment, competitive salary and an excellent benefit package which includes, medical, dental, vision, life, short-term and long-term disability insurance, 401k (Roth and Traditional), which includes company contributions including match, and paid time off! As part of our commitment to the communities we serve we also offer all employee’s Paid Volunteer Time Off! If you are enthusiastic about a rewarding career with a successful & growing credit union, apply now!

Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individuals with Disabilities.",3.9,"Fox Communities Credit Union
3.9","Appleton, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1953,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
186,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Glassdoor; the application form needs to be completed in order to be considered. TO APPLY, VISIT: https://grnh.se/eb8d01633us.

About Us: At Emendata, we help bridge the gap between data and the real world. We partner with organizations that have a social mission and help them tackle their problems using analytics. Our role in these partnerships goes end to end—we handle everything from wrangling the data to analyzing the problem to turning the results into something actionable. Importantly, we understand that this analytics pipeline does not live in a vacuum. Getting to meaningful numbers requires more than just the right methods; it calls for understanding the people, policies, data, and systems involved. With this approach, our small but fast-growing team is having a big impact, taking on challenges like using analytics to combat fraud, waste, and abuse in Medicare.
About the Role: This role leads the way in producing analytics that reflect a deep level of understanding and a high degree of quality. We are looking for you to:
Take analyses from end to end: Understand the client’s problem, identify the right research question, plan the methodology, corral the data, code the analysis, interpret the results, craft the deliverable, and communicate the story
Apply a research mentality: Use all tools at our disposal (documentation, policy regulations, data investigations, etc.) to make sound analytic decisions
Help the team deliver its best work: Turn direction from clients/senior staff into tactical plans and work closely with data analysts to help them implement (conducting code reviews, teaching/reinforcing analytic strategies, etc.)
This role will be a good fit for people who naturally push towards progress and are undeterred when that requires a lot of effort or stepping into unfamiliar territory. Emendata is growing rapidly, and we are looking for people who are excited to march forward together.
Qualifications: If you do not meet all the criteria below but still think you would be a good fit for this role, please apply so we can see if we can find the right spot for you on the team. We value experience but also welcome aptitude and enthusiasm.
Education: Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a quantitative field or equivalent technical training
Programming: Experience with SAS is a must (comfortable with SAS macro language, advanced DATA step techniques such as hashes, and PROC SQL); experience with Python, Stata, R, or SQL is a plus
Technical Mentorship: Demonstrated experience with reviewing code and providing feedback
Data Management: Comfortable with the process of importing, cleaning, and preparing data for analysis in a reproducible way
Analysis: Exceptional problem-solving skills with a good understanding of statistical/social science research methods; 4+ years hands-on experience in an analytics role (e.g., economic consulting)
Working Style: Intellectually curious (keep pulling on threads until finding an answer), enterprising (eager to tackle the unknown and find a way to make things happen), and collaborative (work with others to explore, build, tear down, and build again)
To be considered for this position, applicants must have the ability to work in the U.S. without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
About the Interview Process: We want both sides to learn what it would be like to work together. Part way through the interview process, we incorporate a lightweight at-home exercise that serves as the basis for a technical interview. The exercise gives us an outlet to show you what kind of problems this role would tackle and offers you an opportunity to show us how you would approach the work.",-1,Emendata,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
187,Data QA Engineer,$48k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description: Data QA Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA
Department: Quality Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Software Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a self-motivated mid-level Data QA Engineer to lead the testing framework design, development, automation for our big data infrastructure leveraging latest technologies such as Hadoop and Spark, both on-premise and in the cloud. This position requires experience in testing and automation of data pipelines, data services, data warehouses, business intelligence and machine learning platforms, especially around unified consumer transactional, demographic and behavioral data.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools/technologies such as SQL/NoSQL, Python, and Tableau to validate products, data pipelines and data deliverables. If you have experience in automation, quality engineering of data centric applications/systems, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Design and implement Test Automation frameworks using Python, node.js, SQL, javascript and React JS.
Develop test strategies, plans, test cases and engineering best practices related to software test engineering, both manual and automated testing with a specific focus on data quality
Work closely with data engineers, data scientists and analysts to inform solution designs in terms of testability.
Building and automating testing frameworks around data ingestion pipelines for master data management, deep-learning, and predictive analytics
Build and maintain testing frameworks for big data environments that are highly secure, scalable, flexible, and performant using appropriate SQL technologies.
Lead data governance and data profiling efforts to ensure data quality and proper meta data documentation for data lineage.
Creating quality metrics to evaluate data pipelines, products and customer deliverables.
Collaborate with diverse technical and non-technical teams located across multiple time-zones on client deliverables and technical support
Participate-in and contribute to design and code reviews
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on data analytics.
3+ years of experience in data integration / data engineering
3+ years of experience in data modeling and architecture
3+ years of experience in QA automation
Experience in working with large scale Enterprise data warehouse, data integration, data migration and data quality verification
Hands-on testing experience in working Hadoop, Spark and other Big data technologies is highly preferred
Knowledge of data pipelines using SQL, Hive, Spark, Spark ML
Excellent analytics, problem-solving and debugging skills",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
188,"Data Analyst, Senior",$74k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Leidos is a Top 10 Health IT provider drawing on decades of success in delivering solutions to meet the healthcare challenges of today. Our unique position as a technology company with deep health and life sciences expertise equips us to transform patient care, as well as provider and payer operations in commercial and government health organizations. Everything we do is built on a commitment to do the right thing for our customers, our people, and our community. We’re looking for talented people to join our team and help us revolutionize the future of health.

The Senior Data Analyst designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources. Develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and models complex business problems. Is familiar with disciplines such as Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis and Hypothesis testing. Works with cross-discipline teams in order to ensure connectivity between various databases and systems. Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations. May develop information tools, algorithms, dashboards, and queries to monitor and improve business performance. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Primary Responsibilities

The Senior Data Analyst will have experience in consolidating data by designing and developing methods and processes. Will have experience in developing software programs, algorithms and automated processes to evaluate datasets and models. Will have experience in using software programs, algorithms and automated processes to evaluate datasets and models. Will have experience in ensuring connectivity between various databases and systems.

Will have the ability to interpret and communicate findings and recommendations. Will have experience in monitoring business performance by developing tools, algorithms and dashboards. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Familiarity with Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis and Hypothesis testing.
Experience with analysis stemming from multiple databases: SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL
Ability to work with cross-discipline teams.
Proficient MS application knowledge (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint).
Excellent analytical and organizational skills.
Ability to work with the customer to define requirements.
Excellent writing and research skills

Preferred Qualifications

Expertise in working with National VHA program deployment centered on patient scheduling (VistA, VSE, Cerner, etc.)

External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible

Potential for Telework:
Yes, 100%

Clearance Level Required:
NACI

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
5
Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
189,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst - Cost and Utilization Analysis,$53k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst is responsible for providing analysis and recommendations regarding the Utilization and Cost of Behavioral Health Services at Community Behavioral Health.This position will provide analysis of based on Budget to Actual utilization and PMPM of services as well as coordinate with various departments including Finance, Data Informatics, Clinical and Provider Network Management in the determination of recommendations regarding Utilization and Cost findings.

Essential Functions:

·Coordinate with various CBH teams and departments through effective communication, report generation, solution development and team building.

·Provide or work with various departments to provide, and present various complex financial analyses and reports to Utilization Management Committee, the Clinical, Finance and Network Operations Departments.

·Maintain, modify and create SQL code used for financial analysis and reports.

·Identify, research and bring to resolution any issues with the financial data and reports.

·Develop detailed financial projections.

·Review monthly Quality Assurance Reports prior to issuance to Finance Executive Staff.

·Coordinate the processing of compliance claims adjustments and reporting results to the Compliance Department.

·Development of Value Based Contracting Models and Evaluation of Value Based Contracting.

Position Requirements:

·Education: Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Accounting, Economics or Mathematics

·License/Certification: N/A

·Relevant Work Experience: Minimum of 5 years of experience in financial forecasting and analysis

·Skills:

·Extensive knowledge of Microsoft Office applications

·Proficient in using SQL, including querying and troubleshooting

·Thorough understanding of data manipulations and reconciliation

·Excellent analytical skills

·Excellent interpersonal and verbal and written communication skills

·Able to work independently",3.2,"Community Behavioral Health
3.2","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
190,Staff Data Scientist,$123k-$196k (Glassdoor Est.),"At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Staff Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
PhD/MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
4+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
191,Senior Data Analytics/Scientist,$73k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Senior Data Analytics/Scientist to support the Chief Human Capital Office (CHCO) for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

Primary Responsibilities

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insights and trends in human capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance HCA across the IC. Centralize IC CHCO data collection and synthesis, including survey data, enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data-driven problem-solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operation questions; and incorporate insights and findings into a range of products.

Create detailed write-ups of processes used, logic applied, and methodologies used for creation, validation, analysis, and visualizations. Write- ups shall occur initially, within a week of when process is created, and updated in writing when changes occur.

Adapt freeware solutions such as R, and modular solutions for maximum flexibility. Provide an advanced capability for data analysis of human capital information from disparate data types, promoting visualization and storytelling to discover insights that help guide business decisions. Be forward leaning, exploring HCA solutions that benefit IC elements individually and collectively. Let the data tell the story including what is inconsistent or contradictory, and automate data cleansing as much as possible. Integrate data solutions and collection with IC Information Technology Enterprise to enhance connectivity with IC Elements.

Identify and customize, if necessary, Commercial Off The Shelf (COTS) Information Technology (IT) tools for administration and data collection, or to leverage, support, and integrate the process with tools built for the IC and/or its component elements. Any tools developed shall be web-based and web-enabled, designed to maximize feedback effectiveness while protecting employee assessment information, and include both structured interview and web-based tools for gathering feedback.

Assist in the development and maintenance of financial procedural guidance, templates and data formats, for identifying IC-wide workforce numbers, to include government, military, and contractor support. Review, assess data, identify data deficiencies and recommend solutions for remediation. Support quantitative and analytic efforts for workforce planning, development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to the Congressional Budget Justification Book (CBJB) planning displays, and analytic support for budget management and planning. Assist with ad hoc data requests from Congress, IC elements or as required by IC CHCO.

Coordinate and facilitate community of practice and working group meetings, to include meeting logistics, agenda development and presenter coordination, day-of execution and facilitation, documentation and distribution of meeting minutes and presentations. Present or coordinate presentations on relevant topics as directed by IC CHCO.

Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.

Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).

Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.

Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative- tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.

Preferred Experience:

C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.

Demonstrated expertise in supporting quantitative and analytical efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.

Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.

Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.

Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on-line and automated survey instruments.

Years of Experience: 7 years of relevant experience in a related field (computer science, mathematics, statistics, etc.).

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance/ SCI Eligibility with a CI Polygraph. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc.
4.5","Bethesda, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
192,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units
Minimum qualifications
Master Degree
Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics
Working knowledge of Python, C++, and Statistics
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Qualifications
Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors",4.3,"Liberty Personnel Services
4.3","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
193,Data Scientist,-1,"About us

Boxy Charm was founded in 2013 and continues to be a leader in the beauty subscription box industry experiencing immense growth of more than 100% year over year. We work with some of the hottest brands including Butter London, Dr. Brandt, Elemis, GlamGlow, Smashbox, Tarte, Too Faced and many more.

Today, Boxy Charm has a community of more than 2.4 million followers across its social media platforms, 10 million monthly visitors online and is the #1 searched beauty box brand on YouTube. In 2018, Inc magazine named it as one of the fastest growing companies in the nation. Boxy Charm is headquartered in South Florida and has an office in Toronto, Canada.

About you

Boxy Charm is seeking a Data Scientist who will use a range of data science and machine learning methodologies to build solutions for a variety of business initiatives. Additionally, the ideal candidate will be able to solve complex problems and apply those solutions within a cutting-edge cloud-based technology platform.

The role will be filled with a solution-oriented candidate that thrives on working in a highly dynamic and engaging environment.

What you will be doing
Work closely with different business units and translate high level business problems into actionable deliverables for the Data & Algorithms team
Work with a wide variety of data ranging between social media and email to customer transactions and logistics
Develop a variety of machine learning models including customer recommendations, customer propensity, forecasting, and marketing performance.
Collaborate closely with the Software Development and DevOps teams to ensure continued delivery of high-quality data through our data processing pipeline
Partner with various business stakeholders and implement solutions that improve their business process
Conduct big data analysis using SQL, Python, Snowflake, Spark and other technologies
Break down complex projects and problems into actionable tasks that be delivered quickly and iteratively and provide value to the business stakeholders
Key Understandings
Customer lifetime value, regression analysis, cohorts, retention, customer lifecycle, customer segmentation, machine learning, large-scale data analysis, classification and propensity modeling
What you will bring to the table
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related field
3+ years of experience programming in languages such as Python, Java, Scala, Ruby, R
3+ years of experience working with SQL and relational databases
3+ years of experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, and data mining techniques
Experience with one or more machine learning algorithms such as neural networks, regression, clustering etc.
Working experience with machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow, Keras, ScikitLearn, H20.ai, MXNet, Caffe, Gluon etc. is highly desirable
Experience working in an Agile (SCRUM, XP etc.) development environment
Experience with AWS or other cloud environments is desirable
Knowledge of Big Data and NoSQL systems such as Snowflake, Hadoop, Spark, MongoDB, etc. is a plus",3.1,"Boxy Charm
3.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
194,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,"Ecolab
3.7","Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
195,Data Scientist-Senior,$107k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Over 10 years of experience and a MA/MS degree.

Typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently.

Oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
196,Data Analyst,$38k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Big Huge Games is looking for a qualified Data Analyst to help provide data insights to our games teams and upcoming BHG titles to assist them in making successful strategic and game direction decisions. This role works closely with our Product and Design teams to structure quantitative questions, gather player data, employ statistical methodology in analysis of the data, and construct insightful reporting and visualizations to communicate those results to the wider team.

Responsibilities
Provide reports and monitoring tools to assist team in daily game health assessment
Perform in-depth analysis of game metrics to inform and support both short and long-term product direction decisions
Communicate the results of analyses to the product team, game studio, and outside partners through data visualization and presentations
Qualifications
3-5 years experience with querying large complex data sets with SQL on relational databases
Several years experience performing quantitative analysis preferably with a games, web, or technology focus
High level of proficiency in data visualization tools such as Tableau, Excel, or equivalent
Passion for problem solving, from generating insightful questions to research, through presentation of results and follow-on steps
Track record of success working in fast-paced environments with shifting priorities and deadlines
Ability to work in both individual and team settings
Excellent organizational, communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field
About Big Huge Games:

Big Huge Games is a small, passionate team led by experienced game development veterans, proudly located just north of Baltimore, MD, who are excited about the rise of touchscreen platforms. We believe in hiring talented team members who enjoy working in a fun and positive environment.

The company was founded in March of 2013 by Brian Reynolds (Civilization II, Rise of Nations, FrontierVille) and a group of longtime collaborators. Big Huge Games is dedicated to ""Finding The Fun"" through rapid prototyping and a focus on great user experience.

In July 2015 we launched our first game, DomiNations, which was awarded “Editors Choice” in the app store and continues to be successful with audiences across the globe. In 2016 we were acquired by our publisher, Nexon, and now operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary, allowing us the stability of a larger studio but the feel of a smaller, indie game team.

Our goals are simple: Make great games, strive to always be improving, and live up to the motto you gotta have fun to make fun.

This a full-time position onsite at our studio in Timonium, MD.
Due to the circumstances surrounding COVID19 positions will begin remote before transitioning to onsite.

Applicants should download DomiNations on iOS or Android and be prepared to discuss the game.",4.9,"Big Huge Games
4.9","Timonium, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
197,Data Analyst,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Data Analyst to work with product and business teams to find key metrics, monitor data quality/consistency, help identify problems, and propose data driven solutions. The analyst should have in-depth experience with SQL reporting and building dashboards, as well as be a self-starter who is curious and detailed in their problem-solving approach. This job will require heavy reporting in SQL Server.

Requirements
Create and maintain complex SQL reporting for product and business teams as well as external clients.
Create Health Check metrics for monitoring data quality and consistency.
Design and build automated reporting dashboards on our FoundryBI platform.
Use statistical analysis to generate clear and effective recommendations.
Proactively analyze data for key insights and metrics.
Ability to understand business operations as a whole and translate questions into effective analysis based on the goals behind the specified task.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree with a minimum GPA of 3.5 in Computer Science or a related field of study.
1-4 years of experience writing optimized and reusable SQL code.
Knowledgeable in either R or Python preferred.
Experience with performance tuning and query optimization.
Benefits

When you join Softheon, you will:
Have an opportunity to add value to a diverse team of innovative professionals
Rise to new challenges everyday
Receive competitive salary and career growth opportunities",4.4,"Softheon
4.4","Stony Brook, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
198,"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT",$58k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT

The Scientist-Engineer, MSAT performs process and analytical experimental studies as part of a team that is effectively delivering cell therapy services to clients in accordance with defined scope of work, timelines, and budgets. This includes leading projects in process development, technology transfer and continuous improvement of our client's novel manufacturing processes. Our goal is to support our clients in developing commercially viable cell therapy products, so that they can become accessible to all.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities

Accountable for the design and execution of experimental studies in the laboratory, for example:
Perform laboratory experiments for client projects; perform analytical testing for client projects
Preparation and scheduling of laboratory equipment for experiments
Provide technical leadership of client products during manufacturing and development, for example:
Direct technical communication with clients during manufacturing and development
Support manufacturing in identifying and resolving manufacturing process constraints
Lead the generation of manufacturing and development documentation, for example:
Generating experiment protocols and reports for development projects
Generating draft batch records and other manufacturing documentation
Generating manufacturing risk assessments, such as FMEA
Perform data analysis to reach actionable conclusions, for example:
Compile and analyze experimental data
Present experimental data internally and externally to clients

Qualifications

Minimum of a Bachelor's degree in relevant life science or engineering discipline
Minimum of 3 years' experience in aseptic cell processing, cell culture and cell analytics under the guidance of scientific protocols
Demonstrated ability to deliver projects to specific timelines and budgets
Experience in working effectively and delegating tasks in a team-based environment
Demonstrated ability in technical writing and the preparation of, protocols and reports, presentations and/or other communications
Basic understanding of the technical principles, theories and concepts of cell therapy or similar products

Competencies/Candidate Profile

Collaboration, Accountability, Adaptability, Can-do, Technical Capacity, Problem Solving, Customer-centric, Communication

Supervisory Responsibility

No supervisory responsibilities

Minimum Required Training (optional)

Aseptic processing, Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP), communication skills, specific process and analytical equipment

Working Environment

This job may require occasional evening and weekend work

Physical Requirements

N/A

Direct reports

N/A

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
in a cell therapy, aseptic environment: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Mountain View, CA 94043 (Preferred)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.pctcelltherapy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.8,"Minaris Regenerative Medicine, LLC
2.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
199,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate In Vivo Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vivo studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.
Responsibilities: *
Dosing (intravenous, subcutaneous), Bleeding and Tissue collection

Development of functional assays to support muscle and CMT1A programs

Tissue processing to support RNA and protein assays (western, qPCR, Immunohistochemistry)

ELISAs to support pharmacokinetics and serum biomarkers

Breeding and Genotyping

Assay development (Target engagement)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation
Requirements: *
BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vivo experiments

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons, muscle

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
